Vermont, session 2025-2026, H493.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Purpose, Definitions, Legend * * *
Sec. A.100 SHORT TITLE
(a) This bill may be referred to as the “BIG BILL – Fiscal Year 2026
Appropriations Act.”
Sec. A.101 PURPOSE; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) The purpose of this act is to provide appropriations for the operations of
State government and for capital appropriations not funded with bond proceeds
during fiscal year 2026. It is the express intent of the General Assembly that
activities of the various agencies, departments, divisions, boards, offices, and
commissions be limited to those that can be supported by funds appropriated in
this act or other acts passed prior to June 30, 2025. Agency and department
heads are directed to implement staffing and service levels at the beginning of
fiscal year 2026 so as to meet this condition unless otherwise directed by
specific language in this act or other acts of the General Assembly.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any interim budget and
appropriation adjustments made in accordance with 32 V.S.A. §§ 133 and 704
prioritize supporting the health, safety, and well-being of Vermonters; a robust
education system; and a strong economy.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 2 of 277
2025
Sec. A.102 APPROPRIATIONS
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act serves as the
primary source and reference for appropriations for the operations of State
government and for capital appropriations not funded with bond proceeds in
fiscal year 2026.
(b) The sums herein stated are appropriated for the purposes specified in
the following sections of this act. When no time is expressly stated during
which any of the operating appropriations are to continue, the appropriations
are single-year appropriations and only for the purpose indicated and shall be
paid from funds shown as the source of funds. Capital appropriations funded
from the Capital Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and
Essential Investments Special Fund shall be subject to the provisions of 32
V.S.A. § 1001b(e). If in this act there is an error in either addition or
subtraction, the totals shall be adjusted accordingly. Apparent errors in
referring to section numbers of statutory titles within this act may be
disregarded by the Commissioner of Finance and Management.
(c) Unless codified or otherwise specified, all narrative portions of this act
apply only to the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2026.
Sec. A.103 DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this act:
(1) “Encumbrances” means a portion of spending authority reserved for
the subsequent payment of existing travel authorizations, purchase orders,
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 3 of 277
2025
grants, or contracts. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall
make final decisions on the appropriateness of encumbrances.
(2) “Grants” means subsidies, aid, or payments to local governments, to
community and quasi-public agencies for providing local services, and to
persons who are not wards of the State for services or supplies and means cash
or other direct assistance, including pension contributions.
(3) “Operating expenses” means property management; repair and
maintenance; rental expenses; insurance; postage; travel; energy and utilities;
office and other supplies; equipment, including motor vehicles, highway
materials, and construction; expenditures for the purchase of land and
construction of new buildings and permanent improvements; and similar items.
(4) “Personal services” means wages and salaries, fringe benefits, per
diems, contracted third-party services, and similar items.
(5) “Capital appropriation” means an appropriation for tangible capital
investments or expenses that are eligible to be funded from general obligation
debt financing and are allowed under federal laws governing the use of State
bond proceeds as described in 32 V.S.A. § 309.
Sec. A.104 RELATIONSHIP TO EXISTING LAWS
(a) Except as specifically provided, this act shall not be construed in any
way to negate or impair the full force and effect of existing laws.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 4 of 277
2025
Sec. A.105 OFFSETTING APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In the absence of specific provisions to the contrary in this act, when
total appropriations are offset by estimated receipts, the State appropriations
shall control, notwithstanding receipts being greater or less than anticipated.
Sec. A.106 FEDERAL FUNDS
(a) In fiscal year 2026, the Governor, with the approval of the General
Assembly or the Joint Fiscal Committee if the General Assembly is not in
session, may accept federal funds available to the State of Vermont, including
block grants in lieu of, or in addition to, funds herein designated as federal.
The Governor, with the approval of the General Assembly or the Joint Fiscal
Committee if the General Assembly is not in session, may allocate all or any
portion of such federal funds for any purpose consistent with the purposes for
which the basic appropriations in this act have been made.
(b) If, during fiscal year 2026, federal funds available to the State of
Vermont and designated as federal in this and other acts of the 2025 session of
the Vermont General Assembly are converted into block grants or are
abolished under their current title in federal law and reestablished under a new
title in federal law, the Governor may continue to accept such federal funds for
any purpose consistent with the purposes for which the federal funds were
appropriated. The Governor may spend such funds for such purposes for not
more than 45 days prior to General Assembly or Joint Fiscal Committee
approval. Notice shall be given to the Joint Fiscal Committee without delay if
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 5 of 277
2025
the Governor intends to use the authority granted by this section, and the Joint
Fiscal Committee shall meet in an expedited manner to review the Governor’s
request for approval.
Sec. A.107 NEW POSITIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the total number of
authorized State positions, both classified and exempt, excluding temporary
positions as defined in 3 V.S.A. § 311(a)(11), shall not be increased during
fiscal year 2026 except for new positions authorized by the General Assembly
during the 2025 session. Limited service positions approved pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 5 shall not be subject to this restriction.
Sec. A.108 LEGEND
(a) The act is organized by functions of government. The sections between
B.100 and B.9999 contain appropriations of funds for the upcoming budget
year. The sections between E.100 and E.9999 contain language that relates to
specific appropriations or government functions, or both. The function areas
by section numbers are as follows:
B.100–B.199 and E.100–E.199 General Government
B.200–B.299 and E.200–E.299 Protection to Persons
and Property
B.300–B.399 and E.300–E.399 Human Services
B.400–B.499 and E.400–E.499 Labor
B.500–B.599 and E.500–E.599 General Education
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 6 of 277
2025
B.600–B.699 and E.600–E.699 Higher Education
B.700–B.799 and E.700–E.799 Natural Resources
B.800–B.899 and E.800–E.899 Commerce and
Community Development
B.900–B.999 and E.900–E.999 Transportation
B.1000–B.1099 and E.1000–E.1099 Debt Service
B.1100–B.1199 and E.1100–E.1199 One-time and other
appropriation actions
(b) The C sections contain amendments to the current fiscal year; the D
sections contain fund allocations, transfers, reversions, and reservations for the
upcoming fiscal year; the F sections also contain amendments to the current
fiscal year; and the G section contains effective dates.
* * * Fiscal Year 2026 Base Appropriations * * *
Sec. B.100 Secretary of administration - secretary’s office
Personal services 2,532,305
Operating expenses 255,891
Grants 755,000
Total 3,543,196
Source of funds
General fund 1,762,509
Special funds 755,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 7 of 277
2025
Interdepartmental transfers 1,025,687
Total 3,543,196
Sec. B.100.1 Secretary of administration - office of racial equity
Personal services 1,687,090
Operating expenses 118,323
Total 1,805,413
Source of funds
General fund 1,144,831
Internal service funds 534,462
Interdepartmental transfers 126,120
Total 1,805,413
Sec. B.101 Secretary of administration - finance
Personal services 1,523,066
Operating expenses 168,424
Total 1,691,490
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 1,691,490
Total 1,691,490
Sec. B.102 Secretary of administration - workers’ compensation insurance
Personal services 871,453
Operating expenses 100,387
Total 971,840
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 8 of 277
2025
Source of funds
Internal service funds 971,840
Total 971,840
Sec. B.103 Secretary of administration - general liability insurance
Personal services 406,346
Operating expenses 65,072
Total 471,418
Source of funds
Internal service funds 471,418
Total 471,418
Sec. B.104 Secretary of administration - all other insurance
Personal services 278,478
Operating expenses 54,925
Total 333,403
Source of funds
Internal service funds 333,403
Total 333,403
Sec. B.104.1 Retired state employees pension plus funding
Grants 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 9 of 277
2025
General fund 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services - communications and information
technology
Personal services 87,034,344
Operating expenses 50,695,231
Total 137,729,575
Source of funds
General fund 233,207
Special funds 1,014,199
Internal service funds 136,482,169
Total 137,729,575
Sec. B.106 Finance and management - budget and management
Personal services 1,843,264
Operating expenses 342,676
Total 2,185,940
Source of funds
General fund 1,254,559
Internal service funds 688,359
Interdepartmental transfers 243,022
Total 2,185,940
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 10 of 277
2025
Sec. B.107 Finance and management - financial operations
Personal services 3,416,478
Operating expenses 894,620
Total 4,311,098
Source of funds
Internal service funds 3,767,171
Interdepartmental transfers 543,927
Total 4,311,098
Sec. B.108 Human resources - operations
Personal services 12,091,729
Operating expenses 1,609,092
Total 13,700,821
Source of funds
General fund 1,931,766
Special funds 171,235
Internal service funds 10,811,922
Interdepartmental transfers 785,898
Total 13,700,821
Sec. B.108.1 Human resources - VTHR operations
Personal services 2,259,639
Operating expenses 922,339
Total 3,181,978
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 11 of 277
2025
Source of funds
Internal service funds 3,181,978
Total 3,181,978
Sec. B.109 Human resources - employee benefits & wellness
Personal services 1,443,574
Operating expenses 727,231
Total 2,170,805
Source of funds
Internal service funds 2,170,805
Total 2,170,805
Sec. B.110 Libraries
Personal services 3,071,139
Operating expenses 523,300
Grants 267,993
Total 3,862,432
Source of funds
General fund 2,371,969
Special funds 96,994
Federal funds 1,273,020
Interdepartmental transfers 120,449
Total 3,862,432
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 12 of 277
2025
Sec. B.111 Tax - administration/collection
Personal services 30,188,806
Operating expenses 7,007,735
Total 37,196,541
Source of funds
General fund 24,668,155
Special funds 12,413,386
Interdepartmental transfers 115,000
Total 37,196,541
Sec. B.112 Buildings and general services - administration
Personal services 1,132,286
Operating expenses 206,653
Total 1,338,939
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 1,338,939
Total 1,338,939
Sec. B.113 Buildings and general services - engineering
Personal services 47,165
Operating expenses 1,116,280
Total 1,163,445
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 13 of 277
2025
General fund 1,163,445
Total 1,163,445
Sec. B.113.1 Buildings and general services engineering - capital projects
Personal services 3,225,944
Operating expenses 500,000
Total 3,725,944
Source of funds
General fund 3,225,944
Interdepartmental transfers 500,000
Total 3,725,944
Sec. B.114 Buildings and general services - information centers
Personal services 3,721,861
Operating expenses 1,973,457
Total 5,695,318
Source of funds
General fund 702,146
Transportation fund 4,542,959
Special funds 450,213
Total 5,695,318
Sec. B.115 Buildings and general services - purchasing
Personal services 2,860,824
Operating expenses 272,026
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 14 of 277
2025
Total 3,132,850
Source of funds
General fund 1,697,210
Interdepartmental transfers 1,435,640
Total 3,132,850
Sec. B.116 Buildings and general services - postal services
Personal services 846,111
Operating expenses 188,303
Total 1,034,414
Source of funds
General fund 93,669
Internal service funds 940,745
Total 1,034,414
Sec. B.117 Buildings and general services - copy center
Personal services 951,063
Operating expenses 223,405
Total 1,174,468
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,174,468
Total 1,174,468
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 15 of 277
2025
Sec. B.118 Buildings and general services - fleet management services
Personal services 1,020,985
Operating expenses 247,895
Total 1,268,880
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,201,997
Interdepartmental transfers 66,883
Total 1,268,880
Sec. B.119 Buildings and general services - federal surplus property
Operating expenses 4,427
Total 4,427
Source of funds
Enterprise funds 4,427
Total 4,427
Sec. B.120 Buildings and general services - state surplus property
Personal services 365,056
Operating expenses 175,786
Total 540,842
Source of funds
Internal service funds 540,842
Total 540,842
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 16 of 277
2025
Sec. B.121 Buildings and general services - property management
Personal services 1,199,933
Operating expenses 605,349
Total 1,805,282
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,805,282
Total 1,805,282
Sec. B.122 Buildings and general services - fee for space
Personal services 21,826,541
Operating expenses 17,638,201
Total 39,464,742
Source of funds
Internal service funds 39,360,459
Interdepartmental transfers 104,283
Total 39,464,742
Sec. B.124 Executive office - governor’s office
Personal services 1,957,078
Operating expenses 567,607
Total 2,524,685
Source of funds
General fund 1,997,850
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 17 of 277
2025
Interdepartmental transfers 526,835
Total 2,524,685
Sec. B.125 Legislative counsel
Personal services 4,589,480
Operating expenses 286,936
Total 4,876,416
Source of funds
General fund 4,876,416
Total 4,876,416
Sec. B.126 Legislature
Personal services 8,457,653
Operating expenses 5,329,448
Total 13,787,101
Source of funds
General fund 13,787,101
Total 13,787,101
Sec. B.126.1 Legislative information technology
Personal services 1,504,560
Operating expenses 912,661
Total 2,417,221
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 18 of 277
2025
General fund 2,417,221
Total 2,417,221
Sec. B.127 Joint fiscal committee
Personal services 2,959,862
Operating expenses 197,907
Total 3,157,769
Source of funds
General fund 3,157,769
Total 3,157,769
Sec. B.128 Sergeant at arms
Personal services 1,639,780
Operating expenses 166,416
Total 1,806,196
Source of funds
General fund 1,806,196
Total 1,806,196
Sec. B.129 Lieutenant governor
Personal services 296,158
Operating expenses 51,993
Total 348,151
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 19 of 277
2025
General fund 348,151
Total 348,151
Sec. B.130 Auditor of accounts
Personal services 4,775,026
Operating expenses 143,505
Total 4,918,531
Source of funds
General fund 408,398
Special funds 53,145
Internal service funds 4,456,988
Total 4,918,531
Sec. B.131 State treasurer
Personal services 7,137,154
Operating expenses 312,956
Total 7,450,110
Source of funds
General fund 2,729,084
Special funds 4,179,251
Interdepartmental transfers 541,775
Total 7,450,110
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 20 of 277
2025
Sec. B.132 State treasurer - unclaimed property
Personal services 801,268
Operating expenses 581,648
Total 1,382,916
Source of funds
Private purpose trust funds 1,382,916
Total 1,382,916
Sec. B.133 Vermont state retirement system
Personal services 221,251
Operating expenses 3,118,092
Total 3,339,343
Source of funds
Pension trust funds 3,339,343
Total 3,339,343
Sec. B.134 Municipal employees’ retirement system
Personal services 228,961
Operating expenses 1,692,059
Total 1,921,020
Source of funds
Pension trust funds 1,921,020
Total 1,921,020
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 21 of 277
2025
Sec. B.134.1 Vermont pension investment commission
Personal services 2,359,198
Operating expenses 303,904
Total 2,663,102
Source of funds
Special funds 2,663,102
Pension trust funds 0
Total 2,663,102
Sec. B.135 State labor relations board
Personal services 295,157
Operating expenses 66,136
Total 361,293
Source of funds
General fund 351,717
Special funds 6,788
Interdepartmental transfers 2,788
Total 361,293
Sec. B.136 VOSHA review board
Personal services 109,521
Operating expenses 25,734
Total 135,255
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 22 of 277
2025
General fund 84,251
Interdepartmental transfers 51,004
Total 135,255
Sec. B.136.1 Ethics commission
Personal services 183,787
Operating expenses 39,775
Total 223,562
Source of funds
Internal service funds 223,562
Total 223,562
Sec. B.137 Homeowner rebate
Grants 19,000,000
Total 19,000,000
Source of funds
General fund 19,000,000
Total 19,000,000
Sec. B.138 Renter rebate
Grants 9,500,000
Total 9,500,000
Source of funds
General fund 9,500,000
Total 9,500,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 23 of 277
2025
Sec. B.139 Tax department - reappraisal and listing payments
Grants 3,410,000
Total 3,410,000
Source of funds
General fund 3,410,000
Total 3,410,000
Sec. B.140 Municipal current use
Grants 21,350,000
Total 21,350,000
Source of funds
General fund 21,350,000
Total 21,350,000
Sec. B.142 Payments in lieu of taxes
Grants 12,200,000
Total 12,200,000
Source of funds
Special funds 12,200,000
Total 12,200,000
Sec. B.144 Payments in lieu of taxes - correctional facilities
Grants 40,000
Total 40,000
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 24 of 277
2025
Special funds 40,000
Total 40,000
Sec. B.145 Total general government
Source of funds
General fund 140,473,564
Transportation fund 4,542,959
Special funds 34,043,313
Federal funds 1,273,020
Internal service funds 209,117,870
Interdepartmental transfers 9,219,740
Enterprise funds 4,427
Pension trust funds 5,260,363
Private purpose trust funds 1,382,916
Total 405,318,172
Sec. B.200 Attorney general
Personal services 15,528,060
Operating expenses 1,810,445
Grants 20,000
Total 17,358,505
Source of funds
General fund 8,115,240
Special funds 2,468,889
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 25 of 277
2025
Tobacco fund 434,660
Federal funds 1,809,676
Interdepartmental transfers 4,530,040
Total 17,358,505
Sec. B.201 Vermont court diversion
Personal services 1,250
Grants 4,874,343
Total 4,875,593
Source of funds
General fund 4,617,596
Special funds 257,997
Total 4,875,593
Sec. B.202 Defender general - public defense
Personal services 18,955,131
Operating expenses 1,650,926
Total 20,606,057
Source of funds
General fund 20,016,404
Special funds 589,653
Total 20,606,057
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 26 of 277
2025
Sec. B.203 Defender general - assigned counsel
Personal services 7,827,975
Operating expenses 64,500
Total 7,892,475
Source of funds
General fund 7,892,475
Total 7,892,475
Sec. B.204 Judiciary
Personal services 64,512,754
Operating expenses 13,865,672
Grants 121,030
Total 78,499,456
Source of funds
General fund 72,601,728
Special funds 1,997,094
Federal funds 1,560,412
Interdepartmental transfers 2,340,222
Total 78,499,456
Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
Personal services 19,010,284
Operating expenses 2,115,052
Total 21,125,336
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 27 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 20,541,309
Federal funds 31,000
Interdepartmental transfers 553,027
Total 21,125,336
Sec. B.206 Special investigative unit
Personal services 126,877
Operating expenses 27,835
Grants 2,136,507
Total 2,291,219
Source of funds
General fund 2,291,219
Total 2,291,219
Sec. B.206.1 Crime victims advocates
Personal services 3,221,461
Operating expenses 117,870
Total 3,339,331
Source of funds
General fund 3,339,331
Total 3,339,331
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 28 of 277
2025
Sec. B.207 Sheriffs
Personal services 6,092,392
Operating expenses 446,237
Total 6,538,629
Source of funds
General fund 6,538,629
Total 6,538,629
Sec. B.208 Public safety - administration
Personal services 6,289,651
Operating expenses 6,380,415
Grants 278,285
Total 12,948,351
Source of funds
General fund 7,630,863
Special funds 4,105
Federal funds 1,089,155
Interdepartmental transfers 4,224,228
Total 12,948,351
Sec. B.209 Public safety - state police
Personal services 83,279,417
Operating expenses 16,733,452
Grants 1,813,523
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 29 of 277
2025
Total 101,826,392
Source of funds
General fund 87,421,532
Special funds 3,223,793
Federal funds 9,734,790
Interdepartmental transfers 1,446,277
Total 101,826,392
Sec. B.210 Public safety - criminal justice services
Personal services 5,116,729
Operating expenses 2,098,944
Total 7,215,673
Source of funds
General fund 1,929,676
Special funds 4,483,740
Federal funds 802,257
Total 7,215,673
Sec. B.211 Public safety - emergency management
Personal services 6,811,020
Operating expenses 1,018,043
Grants 62,529,843
Total 70,358,906
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 30 of 277
2025
General fund 1,645,622
Special funds 710,000
Federal funds 67,941,304
Interdepartmental transfers 61,980
Total 70,358,906
Sec. B.212 Public safety - fire safety
Personal services 10,215,365
Operating expenses 3,872,954
Grants 127,350
Total 14,215,669
Source of funds
General fund 2,245,530
Special funds 10,769,486
Federal funds 1,155,653
Interdepartmental transfers 45,000
Total 14,215,669
Sec. B.213 Public safety - forensic laboratory
Personal services 4,388,176
Operating expenses 1,356,042
Total 5,744,218
Source of funds
General fund 4,162,196
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 31 of 277
2025
Special funds 81,774
Federal funds 951,794
Interdepartmental transfers 548,454
Total 5,744,218
Sec. B.215 Military - administration
Personal services 1,142,600
Operating expenses 810,661
Grants 1,219,834
Total 3,173,095
Source of funds
General fund 3,173,095
Total 3,173,095
Sec. B.216 Military - air service contract
Personal services 11,831,181
Operating expenses 1,427,093
Total 13,258,274
Source of funds
General fund 818,486
Federal funds 12,439,788
Total 13,258,274
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 32 of 277
2025
Sec. B.217 Military - army service contract
Personal services 51,243,591
Operating expenses 8,227,725
Total 59,471,316
Source of funds
Federal funds 59,471,316
Total 59,471,316
Sec. B.218 Military - building maintenance
Personal services 906,250
Operating expenses 908,538
Total 1,814,788
Source of funds
General fund 1,752,288
Special funds 62,500
Total 1,814,788
Sec. B.219 Military - veterans’ affairs
Personal services 1,382,555
Operating expenses 193,170
Grants 27,500
Total 1,603,225
Source of funds
General fund 1,259,653
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 33 of 277
2025
Special funds 222,717
Federal funds 120,855
Total 1,603,225
Sec. B.220 Center for crime victim services
Personal services 2,371,733
Operating expenses 321,928
Grants 8,573,370
Total 11,267,031
Source of funds
General fund 1,650,091
Special funds 4,465,489
Federal funds 5,151,451
Total 11,267,031
Sec. B.221 Criminal justice council
Personal services 2,508,514
Operating expenses 2,142,603
Total 4,651,117
Source of funds
General fund 4,260,265
Interdepartmental transfers 390,852
Total 4,651,117
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 34 of 277
2025
Sec. B.222 Agriculture, food and markets - administration
Personal services 3,384,273
Operating expenses 353,580
Total 3,737,853
Source of funds
General fund 1,519,601
Special funds 1,695,613
Federal funds 522,639
Total 3,737,853
Sec. B.223 Agriculture, food and markets - food safety and consumer
protection
Personal services 5,680,286
Operating expenses 1,109,650
Grants 2,810,000
Total 9,599,936
Source of funds
General fund 3,663,441
Special funds 4,048,844
Federal funds 1,875,651
Interdepartmental transfers 12,000
Total 9,599,936
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 35 of 277
2025
Sec. B.224 Agriculture, food and markets - agricultural development
Personal services 6,358,750
Operating expenses 746,926
Grants 15,633,200
Total 22,738,876
Source of funds
General fund 3,157,499
Special funds 646,995
Federal funds 18,934,382
Total 22,738,876
Sec. B.225 Agriculture, food and markets - agricultural resource management
and environmental stewardship
Personal services 3,053,693
Operating expenses 845,696
Grants 247,000
Total 4,146,389
Source of funds
General fund 822,914
Special funds 2,473,045
Federal funds 482,577
Interdepartmental transfers 367,853
Total 4,146,389
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 36 of 277
2025
Sec. B.225.1 Agriculture, food and markets - Vermont agriculture and
environmental lab
Personal services 2,058,524
Operating expenses 1,359,556
Total 3,418,080
Source of funds
General fund 1,698,826
Special funds 1,647,441
Interdepartmental transfers 71,813
Total 3,418,080
Sec. B.225.2 Agriculture, food and markets - clean water
Personal services 4,120,365
Operating expenses 857,888
Grants 11,487,000
Total 16,465,253
Source of funds
General fund 1,975,832
Special funds 10,511,241
Federal funds 2,171,588
Interdepartmental transfers 1,806,592
Total 16,465,253
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 37 of 277
2025
Sec. B.226 Financial regulation - administration
Personal services 3,011,702
Operating expenses 103,565
Grants 100,000
Total 3,215,267
Source of funds
Special funds 3,215,267
Total 3,215,267
Sec. B.227 Financial regulation - banking
Personal services 2,483,666
Operating expenses 482,337
Total 2,966,003
Source of funds
Special funds 2,966,003
Total 2,966,003
Sec. B.228 Financial regulation - insurance
Personal services 5,825,682
Operating expenses 578,524
Total 6,404,206
Source of funds
Special funds 6,404,206
Total 6,404,206
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 38 of 277
2025
Sec. B.229 Financial regulation - captive insurance
Personal services 5,998,278
Operating expenses 591,092
Total 6,589,370
Source of funds
Special funds 6,589,370
Total 6,589,370
Sec. B.230 Financial regulation - securities
Personal services 1,375,414
Operating expenses 242,541
Total 1,617,955
Source of funds
Special funds 1,617,955
Total 1,617,955
Sec. B.232 Secretary of state
Personal services 21,619,186
Operating expenses 4,242,952
Grants 1,350,000
Total 27,212,138
Source of funds
General fund 1,350,000
Special funds 19,155,734
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 39 of 277
2025
Federal funds 6,706,404
Total 27,212,138
Sec. B.233 Public service - regulation and energy
Personal services 12,790,401
Operating expenses 2,615,047
Grants 25,000
Total 15,430,448
Source of funds
Special funds 12,152,225
Federal funds 2,439,257
ARRA funds 6,627
Interdepartmental transfers 821,491
Enterprise funds 10,848
Total 15,430,448
Sec. B.233.1 VT Community broadband board
Personal services 1,978,960
Operating expenses 571,368
Grants 43,000,000
Total 45,550,328
Source of funds
Special funds 1,589,990
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 40 of 277
2025
Federal funds 43,960,338
Total 45,550,328
Sec. B.234 Public utility commission
Personal services 4,565,693
Operating expenses 578,746
Total 5,144,439
Source of funds
Special funds 5,144,439
Total 5,144,439
Sec. B.235 Enhanced 9-1-1 board
Personal services 4,700,016
Operating expenses 697,379
Total 5,397,395
Source of funds
Special funds 5,397,395
Total 5,397,395
Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
Personal services 1,243,420
Operating expenses 142,164
Total 1,385,584
Source of funds
General fund 1,292,811
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 41 of 277
2025
Federal funds 92,773
Total 1,385,584
Sec. B.236.1 Liquor and lottery commission
Personal services 10,866,788
Operating expenses 7,415,512
Total 18,282,300
Source of funds
Special funds 125,000
Tobacco fund 250,579
Interdepartmental transfers 70,000
Enterprise funds 17,836,721
Total 18,282,300
Sec. B.240 Cannabis control board
Personal services 4,466,288
Operating expenses 2,053,382
Grants 10,000
Total 6,529,670
Source of funds
Special funds 6,529,670
Total 6,529,670
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 42 of 277
2025
Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
Source of funds
General fund 279,384,152
Special funds 121,247,670
Tobacco fund 685,239
Federal funds 239,445,060
ARRA funds 6,627
Interdepartmental transfers 17,289,829
Enterprise funds 17,847,569
Total 675,906,146
Sec. B.300 Human services - agency of human services - secretary’s office
Personal services 17,333,398
Operating expenses 11,231,120
Grants 3,795,202
Total 32,359,720
Source of funds
General fund 15,569,598
Special funds 135,517
Federal funds 14,023,964
Global Commitment fund 2,510,857
Interdepartmental transfers 119,784
Total 32,359,720
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 43 of 277
2025
Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office - global commitment
Grants 2,207,280,248
Total 2,207,280,248
Source of funds
General fund 712,815,861
Special funds 31,339,852
Tobacco fund 21,049,373
State health care resources fund 31,074,772
Federal funds 1,406,003,180
Interdepartmental transfers 4,997,210
Total 2,207,280,248
Sec. B.303 Developmental disabilities council
Personal services 513,359
Operating expenses 96,185
Grants 191,595
Total 801,139
Source of funds
Special funds 12,000
Federal funds 789,139
Total 801,139
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 44 of 277
2025
Sec. B.304 Human services board
Personal services 823,371
Operating expenses 90,892
Total 914,263
Source of funds
General fund 538,324
Federal funds 375,939
Total 914,263
Sec. B.305 AHS - administrative fund
Personal services 330,000
Operating expenses 13,170,000
Total 13,500,000
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000
Total 13,500,000
Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access - administration
Personal services 142,860,018
Operating expenses 36,310,876
Grants 3,112,301
Total 182,283,195
Source of funds
General fund 43,820,359
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 45 of 277
2025
Special funds 4,760,237
Federal funds 126,141,154
Global Commitment fund 4,382,601
Interdepartmental transfers 3,178,844
Total 182,283,195
Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program - global
commitment
Grants 979,554,012
Total 979,554,012
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 979,554,012
Total 979,554,012
Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program - state
only
Grants 67,605,443
Total 67,605,443
Source of funds
General fund 62,133,605
Global Commitment fund 5,471,838
Total 67,605,443
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 46 of 277
2025
Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid non-waiver
matched
Grants 44,034,870
Total 44,034,870
Source of funds
General fund 13,467,770
Federal funds 30,567,100
Total 44,034,870
Sec. B.311 Health - administration and support
Personal services 9,163,996
Operating expenses 8,043,463
Grants 7,985,727
Total 25,193,186
Source of funds
General fund 4,298,710
Special funds 2,423,587
Federal funds 10,954,085
Global Commitment fund 7,361,523
Interdepartmental transfers 155,281
Total 25,193,186
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 47 of 277
2025
Sec. B.312 Health - public health
Personal services 71,272,453
Operating expenses 10,371,654
Grants 48,496,832
Total 130,140,939
Source of funds
General fund 15,160,817
Special funds 25,398,124
Tobacco fund 1,088,918
Federal funds 64,355,699
Global Commitment fund 18,457,507
Interdepartmental transfers 5,654,874
Permanent trust funds 25,000
Total 130,140,939
Sec. B.313 Health - substance use programs
Personal services 7,036,556
Operating expenses 381,500
Grants 61,624,360
Total 69,042,416
Source of funds
General fund 4,795,744
Special funds 7,972,399
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 48 of 277
2025
Tobacco fund 949,917
Federal funds 15,928,439
Global Commitment fund 39,395,917
Total 69,042,416
Sec. B.314 Mental health - mental health
Personal services 12,456,526
Operating expenses 2,420,029
Grants 279,691,678
Total 294,568,233
Source of funds
General fund 13,127,716
Special funds 6,836
Federal funds 13,158,032
Global Commitment fund 266,967,840
Interdepartmental transfers 1,307,809
Total 294,568,233
Sec. B.315 Department of mental health - mental health facilities
Personal services 40,937,117
Operating expenses 3,393,946
Total 44,331,063
Source of funds
General fund 18,868,124
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 49 of 277
2025
Special funds 1,711,256
Global Commitment fund 23,751,683
Total 44,331,063
Sec. B.316 Department for children and families - administration & support
services
Personal services 50,609,972
Operating expenses 17,876,453
Grants 5,914,175
Total 74,400,600
Source of funds
General fund 43,680,871
Special funds 2,954,500
Federal funds 24,518,288
Global Commitment fund 2,780,636
Interdepartmental transfers 466,305
Total 74,400,600
Sec. B.317 Department for children and families - family services
Personal services 49,175,153
Operating expenses 5,497,038
Grants 100,541,760
Total 155,213,951
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 50 of 277
2025
General fund 63,680,993
Special funds 729,150
Federal funds 37,407,542
Global Commitment fund 53,381,266
Interdepartmental transfers 15,000
Total 155,213,951
Sec. B.318 Department for children and families - child development
Personal services 6,563,807
Operating expenses 783,604
Grants 227,780,727
Total 235,128,138
Source of funds
General fund 61,267,870
Special funds 115,409,671
Federal funds 42,924,133
Global Commitment fund 15,526,464
Total 235,128,138
Sec. B.319 Department for children and families - office of child support
Personal services 14,186,272
Operating expenses 3,738,844
Total 17,925,116
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 51 of 277
2025
General fund 5,598,669
Special funds 454,219
Federal funds 11,484,628
Interdepartmental transfers 387,600
Total 17,925,116
Sec. B.320 Department for children and families - aid to aged, blind and
disabled
Personal services 2,558,460
Grants 10,418,567
Total 12,977,027
Source of funds
General fund 7,470,372
Global Commitment fund 5,506,655
Total 12,977,027
Sec. B.321 Department for children and families - general assistance
Personal services 15,000
Grants 10,415,779
Total 10,430,779
Source of funds
General fund 10,189,157
Federal funds 11,098
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 52 of 277
2025
Global Commitment fund 230,524
Total 10,430,779
Sec. B.322 Department for children and families - 3SquaresVT
Grants 51,077,812
Total 51,077,812
Source of funds
Federal funds 51,077,812
Total 51,077,812
Sec. B.323 Department for children and families - reach up
Operating expenses 23,821
Grants 36,532,863
Total 36,556,684
Source of funds
General fund 24,035,417
Special funds 5,970,229
Federal funds 2,806,330
Global Commitment fund 3,744,708
Total 36,556,684
Sec. B.324 Department for children and families - home heating fuel
assistance/LIHEAP
Grants 16,019,953
Total 16,019,953
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 53 of 277
2025
Source of funds
Special funds 1,480,395
Federal funds 14,539,558
Total 16,019,953
Sec. B.325 Department for children and families - office of economic
opportunity
Personal services 1,376,425
Operating expenses 159,458
Grants 39,165,356
Total 40,701,239
Source of funds
General fund 32,312,474
Special funds 83,135
Federal funds 5,118,329
Global Commitment fund 3,187,301
Total 40,701,239
Sec. B.326 Department for children and families - OEO - weatherization
assistance
Personal services 498,837
Operating expenses 275,322
Grants 15,147,885
Total 15,922,044
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 54 of 277
2025
Source of funds
Special funds 7,757,091
Federal funds 8,164,953
Total 15,922,044
Sec. B.327 Department for children and families - secure residential treatment
Personal services 258,100
Operating expenses 38,775
Grants 3,476,862
Total 3,773,737
Source of funds
General fund 3,743,737
Global Commitment fund 30,000
Total 3,773,737
Sec. B.328 Department for children and families - disability determination
services
Personal services 8,322,170
Operating expenses 495,934
Total 8,818,104
Source of funds
General fund 130,556
Federal funds 8,687,548
Total 8,818,104
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 55 of 277
2025
Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - administration &
support
Personal services 48,973,454
Operating expenses 6,544,338
Total 55,517,792
Source of funds
General fund 25,692,412
Special funds 1,390,457
Federal funds 27,258,639
Global Commitment fund 110,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,066,284
Total 55,517,792
Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - advocacy and
independent living grants
Grants 24,909,492
Total 24,909,492
Source of funds
General fund 8,585,909
Federal funds 7,321,114
Global Commitment fund 9,002,469
Total 24,909,492
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 56 of 277
2025
Sec. B.331 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - blind and visually
impaired
Grants 3,407,604
Total 3,407,604
Source of funds
General fund 489,154
Special funds 223,450
Federal funds 2,390,000
Global Commitment fund 305,000
Total 3,407,604
Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - vocational
rehabilitation
Grants 10,179,845
Total 10,179,845
Source of funds
General fund 371,845
Federal funds 8,558,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,250,000
Total 10,179,845
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 57 of 277
2025
Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - developmental
services
Grants 349,987,467
Total 349,987,467
Source of funds
General fund 132,732
Special funds 15,463
Federal funds 403,573
Global Commitment fund 349,385,699
Interdepartmental transfers 50,000
Total 349,987,467
Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - TBI home and
community based waiver
Grants 7,540,256
Total 7,540,256
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 7,540,256
Total 7,540,256
Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging and independent living - long term care
Grants 346,858,094
Total 346,858,094
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 58 of 277
2025
General fund 498,579
Federal funds 2,450,000
Global Commitment fund 343,909,515
Total 346,858,094
Sec. B.335 Corrections - administration
Personal services 5,601,461
Operating expenses 269,950
Total 5,871,411
Source of funds
General fund 5,871,411
Total 5,871,411
Sec. B.336 Corrections - parole board
Personal services 551,497
Operating expenses 60,112
Total 611,609
Source of funds
General fund 611,609
Total 611,609
Sec. B.337 Corrections - correctional education
Personal services 3,900,732
Operating expenses 255,399
Total 4,156,131
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 59 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 4,006,975
Federal funds 372
Interdepartmental transfers 148,784
Total 4,156,131
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 177,107,933
Operating expenses 25,571,966
Grants 801,823
Total 203,481,722
Source of funds
General fund 198,084,766
Special funds 935,963
Federal funds 516,600
Global Commitment fund 3,548,078
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315
Total 203,481,722
Sec. B.338.1 Corrections - justice reinvestment II
Grants 11,055,849
Total 11,055,849
Source of funds
General fund 8,478,161
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 60 of 277
2025
Federal funds 13,147
Global Commitment fund 2,564,541
Total 11,055,849
Sec. B.339 Corrections - correctional services - out of state beds
Personal services 4,130,378
Total 4,130,378
Source of funds
General fund 4,130,378
Total 4,130,378
Sec. B.340 Corrections - correctional facilities - recreation
Personal services 708,510
Operating expenses 457,555
Total 1,166,065
Source of funds
Special funds 1,166,065
Total 1,166,065
Sec. B.341 Corrections - Vermont offender work program
Personal services 243,283
Operating expenses 160,570
Total 403,853
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 61 of 277
2025
Internal service funds 403,853
Total 403,853
Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home - care and support services
Personal services 24,048,875
Operating expenses 6,913,887
Total 30,962,762
Source of funds
General fund 10,033,214
Special funds 12,799,530
Federal funds 8,130,018
Total 30,962,762
Sec. B.343 Commission on women
Personal services 432,073
Operating expenses 89,355
Total 521,428
Source of funds
General fund 516,773
Special funds 4,655
Total 521,428
Sec. B.344 Retired senior volunteer program
Grants 164,960
Total 164,960
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 62 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 164,960
Total 164,960
Sec. B.345 Green mountain care board
Personal services 9,849,952
Operating expenses 416,874
Total 10,266,826
Source of funds
General fund 3,970,074
Special funds 6,296,752
Total 10,266,826
Sec. B.346 Office of the child, youth, and family advocate
Personal services 386,033
Operating expenses 71,330
Total 457,363
Source of funds
General fund 457,363
Total 457,363
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,428,803,059
Special funds 231,430,533
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 63 of 277
2025
Tobacco fund 23,088,208
State health care resources fund 31,074,772
Federal funds 1,946,078,413
Global Commitment fund 2,148,606,890
Internal service funds 403,853
Interdepartmental transfers 32,694,090
Permanent trust funds 25,000
Total 5,842,204,818
Sec. B.400 Labor - programs
Personal services 39,454,824
Operating expenses 5,462,457
Grants 5,870,493
Total 50,787,774
Source of funds
General fund 11,313,657
Special funds 9,710,673
Federal funds 29,640,603
Interdepartmental transfers 122,841
Total 50,787,774
Sec. B.401 Total labor
Source of funds
General fund 11,313,657
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 64 of 277
2025
Special funds 9,710,673
Federal funds 29,640,603
Interdepartmental transfers 122,841
Total 50,787,774
Sec. B.500 Education - finance and administration
Personal services 16,203,356
Operating expenses 4,699,787
Grants 17,772,840
Total 38,675,983
Source of funds
General fund 7,994,162
Special funds 19,793,553
Education fund 3,606,201
Federal funds 6,217,482
Global Commitment fund 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 804,585
Total 38,675,983
Sec. B.501 Education - education services
Personal services 18,418,946
Operating expenses 1,185,388
Grants 192,117,080
Total 211,721,414
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 65 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 6,894,415
Special funds 3,266,001
Tobacco fund 750,388
Federal funds 199,239,149
Interdepartmental transfers 1,571,461
Total 211,721,414
Sec. B.502 Education - special education: formula grants
Grants 270,736,200
Total 270,736,200
Source of funds
Education fund 270,736,200
Total 270,736,200
Sec. B.503 Education - state-placed students
Grants 17,200,000
Total 17,200,000
Source of funds
Education fund 17,200,000
Total 17,200,000
Sec. B.504 Education - adult education and literacy
Grants 4,899,009
Total 4,899,009
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 66 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 3,958,344
Federal funds 940,665
Total 4,899,009
Sec. B.504.1 Education - Flexible Pathways
Grants 11,481,896
Total 11,481,896
Source of funds
General fund 921,500
Education fund 10,560,396
Total 11,481,896
Sec. B.505 Education - adjusted education payment
Grants 1,991,143,238
Total 1,991,143,238
Source of funds
Education fund 1,991,143,238
Total 1,991,143,238
Sec. B.506 Education - transportation
Grants 26,115,792
Total 26,115,792
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 67 of 277
2025
Education fund 26,115,792
Total 26,115,792
Sec. B.507 Education - merger support grants
Grants 1,800,000
Total 1,800,000
Source of funds
Education fund 1,800,000
Total 1,800,000
Sec. B.507.1 Education - EL categorical aid
Grants 2,250,000
Total 2,250,000
Source of funds
Education fund 2,250,000
Total 2,250,000
Sec. B.508 Education - nutrition
Grants 18,500,000
Total 18,500,000
Source of funds
Education fund 18,500,000
Total 18,500,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 68 of 277
2025
Sec. B.509 Education - afterschool grant program
Personal services 500,000
Grants 9,140,000
Total 9,640,000
Source of funds
Special funds 9,640,000
Total 9,640,000
Sec. B.510 Education - essential early education grant
Grants 8,977,737
Total 8,977,737
Source of funds
Education fund 8,977,737
Total 8,977,737
Sec. B.511 Education - technical education
Grants 18,737,850
Total 18,737,850
Source of funds
Education fund 18,737,850
Total 18,737,850
Sec. B.511.1 State board of education
Personal services 54,208
Operating expenses 16,500
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 69 of 277
2025
Total 70,708
Source of funds
General fund 70,708
Total 70,708
Sec. B.513 Retired teachers pension plus funding
Grants 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Source of funds
General fund 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Sec. B.514 State teachers’ retirement system
Grants 199,377,627
Total 199,377,627
Source of funds
General fund 160,566,569
Education fund 38,811,058
Total 199,377,627
Sec. B.514.1 State teachers’ retirement system administration
Personal services 345,352
Operating expenses 3,519,053
Total 3,864,405
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 70 of 277
2025
Pension trust funds 3,864,405
Total 3,864,405
Sec. B.515 Retired teachers’ health care and medical benefits
Grants 71,052,589
Total 71,052,589
Source of funds
General fund 49,091,090
Education fund 21,961,499
Total 71,052,589
Sec. B.516 Total general education
Source of funds
General fund 244,496,788
Special funds 32,699,554
Tobacco fund 750,388
Education fund 2,430,399,971
Federal funds 206,397,296
Global Commitment fund 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 2,376,046
Pension trust funds 3,864,405
Total 2,921,244,448
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 71 of 277
2025
Sec. B.600 University of Vermont
Grants 57,378,104
Total 57,378,104
Source of funds
General fund 57,378,104
Total 57,378,104
Sec. B.602 Vermont state colleges
Grants 52,468,692
Total 52,468,692
Source of funds
General fund 52,468,692
Total 52,468,692
Sec. B.603 Vermont state colleges - allied health
Grants 1,797,087
Total 1,797,087
Source of funds
General fund 297,087
Global Commitment fund 1,500,000
Total 1,797,087
Sec. B.605 Vermont student assistance corporation
Grants 27,084,946
Total 27,084,946
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 72 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 27,084,946
Total 27,084,946
Sec. B.605.1 VSAC - flexible pathways stipend
Grants 82,450
Total 82,450
Source of funds
General fund 41,225
Education fund 41,225
Total 82,450
Sec. B.606 New England higher education compact
Grants 86,520
Total 86,520
Source of funds
General fund 86,520
Total 86,520
Sec. B.607 University of Vermont - morgan horse farm
Grants 1
Total 1
Source of funds
General fund 1
Total 1
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 73 of 277
2025
Sec. B.608 Total higher education
Source of funds
General fund 137,356,575
Education fund 41,225
Global Commitment fund 1,500,000
Total 138,897,800
Sec. B.700 Natural resources - agency of natural resources - administration
Personal services 6,436,257
Operating expenses 1,265,146
Total 7,701,403
Source of funds
General fund 5,344,094
Special funds 722,828
Interdepartmental transfers 1,634,481
Total 7,701,403
Sec. B.701 Natural resources - state land local property tax assessment
Operating expenses 2,705,834
Total 2,705,834
Source of funds
General fund 2,284,334
Interdepartmental transfers 421,500
Total 2,705,834
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 74 of 277
2025
Sec. B.702 Fish and wildlife - support and field services
Personal services 23,876,543
Operating expenses 6,738,504
Grants 833,630
Total 31,448,677
Source of funds
General fund 9,532,865
Special funds 364,696
Fish and wildlife fund 10,097,060
Federal funds 9,927,754
Interdepartmental transfers 1,526,302
Total 31,448,677
Sec. B.703 Forests, parks and recreation - administration
Personal services 1,564,253
Operating expenses 1,796,785
Total 3,361,038
Source of funds
General fund 3,130,308
Special funds 143,765
Federal funds 86,965
Total 3,361,038
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 75 of 277
2025
Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation - forestry
Personal services 11,026,473
Operating expenses 1,122,371
Grants 1,408,910
Total 13,557,754
Source of funds
General fund 6,839,753
Special funds 1,204,005
Federal funds 4,326,877
Interdepartmental transfers 1,187,119
Total 13,557,754
Sec. B.705 Forests, parks and recreation - state parks
Personal services 13,707,058
Operating expenses 4,936,482
Grants 550,000
Total 19,193,540
Source of fund
General fund 2,061,995
Special funds 17,131,545
Total 19,193,540
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 76 of 277
2025
Sec. B.706 Forests, parks and recreation - lands administration and recreation
Personal services 3,818,270
Operating expenses 8,667,107
Grants 6,015,019
Total 18,500,396
Source of funds
General fund 1,324,880
Special funds 2,794,948
Federal funds 13,755,832
Interdepartmental transfers 624,736
Total 18,500,396
Sec. B.708 Forests, parks and recreation - forest and parks access roads
Personal services 130,000
Operating expenses 99,925
Total 229,925
Source of funds
General fund 229,925
Total 229,925
Sec. B.709 Environmental conservation - management and support services
Personal services 9,655,674
Operating expenses 5,226,877
Grants 188,303
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 77 of 277
2025
Total 15,070,854
Source of funds
General fund 2,462,770
Special funds 1,452,358
Federal funds 2,563,636
Interdepartmental transfers 8,592,090
Total 15,070,854
Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation - air and waste management
Personal services 26,481,647
Operating expenses 9,958,684
Grants 4,343,000
Total 40,783,331
Source of funds
General fund 305,347
Special funds 27,825,978
Federal funds 12,531,023
Interdepartmental transfers 120,983
Total 40,783,331
Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation - office of water programs
Personal services 44,324,028
Operating expenses 8,531,648
Grants 136,489,044
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 78 of 277
2025
Total 189,344,720
Source of funds
General fund 12,980,443
Special funds 33,801,176
Federal funds 141,693,623
Interdepartmental transfers 869,478
Total 189,344,720
Sec. B.713 Land use review board
Personal services 5,001,041
Operating expenses 537,905
Total 5,538,946
Source of funds
General fund 4,169,020
Special funds 1,369,926
Total 5,538,946
Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
Source of funds
General fund 50,665,734
Special funds 86,811,225
Fish and wildlife fund 10,097,060
Federal funds 184,885,710
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 79 of 277
2025
Interdepartmental transfers 14,976,689
Total 347,436,418
Sec. B.800 Commerce and community development - agency of commerce
and community development - administration
Personal services 2,515,577
Operating expenses 872,866
Grants 414,320
Total 3,802,763
Source of funds
General fund 3,802,763
Total 3,802,763
Sec. B.801 Economic development
Personal services 4,396,254
Operating expenses 1,199,682
Grants 8,956,544
Total 14,552,480
Source of funds
General fund 5,937,190
Special funds 3,150,350
Federal funds 5,264,940
Interdepartmental transfers 200,000
Total 14,552,480
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 80 of 277
2025
Sec. B.802 Housing and community development
Personal services 6,519,883
Operating expenses 1,528,070
Grants 23,139,431
Total 31,187,384
Source of funds
General fund 7,656,505
Special funds 10,144,339
Federal funds 10,957,973
Interdepartmental transfers 2,428,567
Total 31,187,384
Sec. B.806 Tourism and marketing
Personal services 3,453,707
Operating expenses 4,569,290
Grants 1,020,000
Total 9,042,997
Source of funds
General fund 4,960,125
Federal funds 4,007,872
Interdepartmental transfers 75,000
Total 9,042,997
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 81 of 277
2025
Sec. B.808 Vermont council on the arts
Grants 1,003,063
Total 1,003,063
Source of funds
General fund 1,003,063
Total 1,003,063
Sec. B.809 Vermont symphony orchestra
Grants 154,170
Total 154,170
Source of funds
General fund 154,170
Total 154,170
Sec. B.810 Vermont historical society
Grants 1,202,564
Total 1,202,564
Source of funds
General fund 1,202,564
Total 1,202,564
Sec. B.811 Vermont housing and conservation board
Grants 109,284,304
Total 109,284,304
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 82 of 277
2025
General fund 1,631,582
Special funds 40,490,082
Federal funds 67,162,640
Total 109,284,304
Sec. B.812 Vermont humanities council
Grants 318,270
Total 318,270
Source of funds
General fund 318,270
Total 318,270
Sec. B.813 Total commerce and community development
Source of funds
General fund 26,666,232
Special funds 53,784,771
Federal funds 87,393,425
Interdepartmental transfers 2,703,567
Total 170,547,995
Sec. B.900 Transportation - finance and administration
Personal services 19,914,359
Operating expenses 6,581,104
Grants 50,000
Total 26,545,463
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 83 of 277
2025
Source of funds
Transportation fund 25,152,473
Federal funds 1,392,990
Total 26,545,463
Sec. B.901 Transportation - aviation
Personal services 4,770,561
Operating expenses 8,456,904
Grants 190,000
Total 13,417,465
Source of funds
Transportation fund 7,474,433
Federal funds 5,943,032
Total 13,417,465
Sec. B.902 Transportation - buildings
Personal services 1,000,000
Operating expenses 1,500,000
Total 2,500,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 2,200,000
TIB fund 300,000
Total 2,500,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 84 of 277
2025
Sec. B.903 Transportation - program development
Personal services 83,759,860
Operating expenses 281,446,274
Grants 46,104,466
Total 411,310,600
Source of funds
Transportation fund 62,005,434
TIB fund 15,103,017
Special funds 280,000
Federal funds 308,679,500
Interdepartmental transfers 15,722,027
Local match 9,520,622
Total 411,310,600
Sec. B.904 Transportation - rest areas construction
Personal services 398,500
Operating expenses 791,746
Total 1,190,246
Source of funds
Transportation fund 119,025
Federal funds 1,071,221
Total 1,190,246
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 85 of 277
2025
Sec. B.905 Transportation - maintenance state system
Personal services 48,113,208
Operating expenses 69,113,835
Total 117,227,043
Source of funds
Transportation fund 110,349,507
Federal funds 932,014
Interdepartmental transfers 5,945,522
Total 117,227,043
Sec. B.906 Transportation - policy and planning
Personal services 3,411,138
Operating expenses 1,290,442
Grants 10,346,035
Total 15,047,615
Source of funds
Transportation fund 3,742,314
Federal funds 11,223,301
Interdepartmental transfers 82,000
Total 15,047,615
Sec. B.906.1 Transportation - environmental policy and sustainability
Personal services 8,114,291
Operating expenses 67,686
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 86 of 277
2025
Grants 1,332,030
Total 9,514,007
Source of funds
Transportation fund 389,377
Federal funds 8,150,226
Interdepartmental transfers 21,860
Local match 952,544
Total 9,514,007
Sec. B.907 Transportation - rail
Personal services 18,493,101
Operating expenses 43,394,247
Total 61,887,348
Source of funds
Transportation fund 15,067,669
Federal funds 31,894,435
Interdepartmental transfers 8,228,363
Local match 6,696,881
Total 61,887,348
Sec. B.908 Transportation - public transit
Personal services 1,026,301
Operating expenses 81,224
Grants 51,587,709
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 87 of 277
2025
Total 52,695,234
Source of funds
Transportation fund 10,007,534
Federal funds 42,547,700
Interdepartmental transfers 140,000
Total 52,695,234
Sec. B.909 Transportation - central garage
Personal services 5,957,587
Operating expenses 19,696,966
Total 25,654,553
Source of funds
Internal service funds 25,654,553
Total 25,654,553
Sec. B.910 Department of motor vehicles
Personal services 36,447,934
Operating expenses 13,070,367
Total 49,518,301
Source of funds
Transportation fund 46,709,524
Federal funds 2,687,081
Interdepartmental transfers 121,696
Total 49,518,301
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 88 of 277
2025
Sec. B.911 Transportation - town highway structures
Grants 7,200,000
Total 7,200,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 7,200,000
Total 7,200,000
Sec. B.912 Transportation - town highway local technical assistance program
Personal services 449,763
Operating expenses 31,689
Total 481,452
Source of funds
Transportation fund 121,452
Federal funds 360,000
Total 481,452
Sec. B.913 Transportation - town highway class 2 roadway
Grants 8,600,000
Total 8,600,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 8,600,000
Total 8,600,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 89 of 277
2025
Sec. B.914 Transportation - town highway bridges
Personal services 10,034,000
Operating expenses 27,759,406
Total 37,793,406
Source of funds
TIB fund 3,596,983
Federal funds 31,716,311
Local match 2,480,112
Total 37,793,406
Sec. B.915 Transportation - town highway aid program
Grants 30,418,736
Total 30,418,736
Source of funds
Transportation fund 30,418,736
Total 30,418,736
Sec. B.916 Transportation - town highway class 1 supplemental grants
Grants 128,750
Total 128,750
Source of funds
Transportation fund 128,750
Total 128,750
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 90 of 277
2025
Sec. B.917 Transportation - town highway: state aid for nonfederal disasters
Grants 1,150,000
Total 1,150,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 0
Special funds 1,150,000
Total 1,150,000
Sec. B.918 Transportation - town highway: state aid for federal disasters
Grants 4,000,000
Total 4,000,000
Source of funds
Federal funds 4,000,000
Total 4,000,000
Sec. B.919 Transportation - municipal mitigation assistance program
Personal services 100,000
Operating expenses 325,500
Grants 6,467,500
Total 6,893,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 715,000
Special funds 4,750,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 91 of 277
2025
Federal funds 1,428,000
Total 6,893,000
Sec. B.921 Transportation board
Personal services 181,233
Operating expenses 22,938
Total 204,171
Source of funds
Transportation fund 204,171
Total 204,171
Sec. B.922 Total transportation
Source of funds
Transportation fund 330,605,399
TIB fund 19,000,000
Special funds 6,180,000
Federal funds 452,025,811
Internal service funds 25,654,553
Interdepartmental transfers 30,261,468
Local match 19,650,159
Total 883,377,390
Sec. B.1000 Debt service
Operating expenses 675,000
Total 675,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 92 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 675,000
Total 675,000
Sec. B.1001 Total debt service
Source of funds
General fund 675,000
Total 675,000
* * * Fiscal Year 2026 One-Time Appropriations * * *
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2026 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Agency of Administration Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2026,
funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $1,100,000 General Fund for the Truth and Reconciliation
Commission; and
(2) $110,000 General Fund for the Office of Racial Equity to continue
the Inclusion, Diversity, Equity, Action, Leadership Vermont program an
additional year.
(b) Department of Human Resources. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $1,575,000 General Fund for the Classification Modernization
project.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 93 of 277
2025
(c) Department of Taxes. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $1,000,000 PILOT Special Fund for the Municipal Grand List
Stabilization Program as established per Sec. E.142.2 of this act. These funds
shall carry forward each fiscal year until fully expended or reverted.
(d) Department of Public Safety. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $600,000 General Fund for State match for federal cybersecurity
grant funds;
(2) $800,000 General Fund for the purchase of mobile and portable
radio equipment; and
(3) $150,000 General Fund for the Vermont Community Radio Grant
Program established in Sec. E.208.2 of this act.
(e) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2026,
funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $4,448,520 General Fund and $6,351,480 federal funds for the
Department of Vermont Health Access’ Global Commitment appropriation for
the Support and Services at Home program, the Primary Care Medical Home,
and Community Health Team services under the Blueprint for Health;
(2) $6,200 General Fund for per diems and expense reimbursement for
members of the Office of New Americans Study Committee; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 94 of 277
2025
(3) $514,875 General Fund and $735,125 federal funds for the
Department of Vermont Health Access’ Global Commitment appropriation for
the first year of implementation of the Maple Mountain Family Medicine
Residency Program if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
approves the Agency’s request for federal matching funds pursuant to Sec.
E.306.5(a) of this act.
(f) Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation. In fiscal year 2026, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $250,000 General Fund for the Vermont Serve, Learn, and Earn
Program; and
(2) $275,000 General Fund for the purchase of a fire apparatus.
(g) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $240,000 General Fund for Polychlorinated Biphenyl testing;
(2) $40,000 General Fund for a grant to Empty Arms Vermont;
(3) Notwithstanding 18 V.S.A. § 4812, $300,000 Substance Misuse
Prevention Special Fund for recovery residences certified by the Vermont
Alliance for Recovery Residences;
(4) Notwithstanding 18 V.S.A. § 4812, $800,000 Substance Misuse
Prevention Special Fund for recovery centers;
(5) $200,000 Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund for a grant to
Mentor Vermont; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 95 of 277
2025
(6) $250,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Parent Child
Center Network for smoking cessation initiatives.
(h) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $2,000,000 General Fund for shelter capacity expansion;
(2) $30,500,000 General Fund for the General Assistance Emergency
Housing Program;
(3) $1,000,000 General Fund for direct aid to the Vermont Foodbank’s
network partner food shelves and pantries through an equitable statewide
distribution of food or subgrants or both; and
(4) $156,000 General Fund for the Child Care Apprenticeship Program.
(i) Department of Corrections. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund to retain a consultant and develop an
implementation plan to transition the Northeast Correctional Complex or the
Caledonia County Work Camp, or parts of either or of both, to a treatment-
focused facility for incarcerated Vermonters.
(j) Agency of Education. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1) $150,000 General Fund for administrative costs relating to home-
based child care meals.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 96 of 277
2025
(k) Vermont State Colleges. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $5,000,000 General Fund for the final transformation bridge
financing payment.
(l) Department of Fish and Wildlife. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $185,000 Fish and Wildlife Nondedicated Special Fund to sustain
current operations as the Department undergoes a financial restructuring.
These funds shall carry forward each fiscal year until fully expended or
reverted;
(2) $80,000 General Fund for the purchase of mobile and portable radio
equipment; and
(3) $30,000 General Fund for the Lake Champlain International Fishing
Derby.
(m) Department of Environmental Conservation. In fiscal year 2026, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $50,000 General Fund for a Municipal Wastewater Connections
database;
(2) $850,000 General Fund for the Concentrated Animal Feeding
Operation database project and contractor support;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 97 of 277
2025
(3) $9,520,000 Environmental Contingency Fund For Polychlorinated
Biphenyl testing and remediation in schools. These funds shall carry forward
each fiscal year until fully expended or reverted; and
(4) $14,500,000 Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and
Reserves Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments
for the State match to the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act Drinking
Water State Revolving Fund and Clean Water State Revolving Fund, in
accordance with the provisions of 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
C.108(b).
(n) Department of Housing and Community Development. In fiscal year
2026, funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $7,500,000 General Fund for the Vermont Bond Bank Vermont
Infrastructure Sustainability Fund;
(2) $16,100,000 General Fund for the Vermont Housing Finance
Agency Rental Revolving Loan Fund, the Middle-Income Homeownership
Development Program, and the First Generation Homebuyer Program. No less
than $250,000 of these funds shall be for the First Generation Homebuyer
Program;
(3) $4,000,000 General Fund for the Vermont Housing Improvement
Program 2.0;
(4) $15,000 General Fund for the Residential Universal Design Study
Committee; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 98 of 277
2025
(5) $450,000 General Fund to fund three limited service positions at the
Department.
(o) Department of Economic Development. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for the Vermont Professionals of Color
Network;
(2) $150,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Small Business
Development Center to assist Vermonters starting, acquiring, and growing
businesses;
(3) $150,000 General Fund for the International Business Office;
(4) $1,000,000 General Fund for the brownfields remediation and
redevelopment;
(5) $100,000 General Fund for a grant to the Central Vermont Regional
Planning Commission to support a site study focused on economic
development, parking, housing, and flood mitigation for the 1.6-acre parcel at
87 State Street and parcels at 89 State Street and 42 Court Street; and
(6) $250,000 General Fund for a competitive grant to establish a new
women’s recovery residence, per the criteria of the Vermont Recovery
Housing Program Action Plan, that shall be awarded on or before September
30, 2025.
(p) Vermont Housing and Conservation Board. In fiscal year 2026, funds
are appropriated for the following:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 99 of 277
2025
(1) $5,000,000 General Fund to provide support and enhance capacity
for the production and preservation of affordable mixed-income rental housing
and homeownership units, including improvements to manufactured homes
and communities; permanent homes and emergency shelter for those
experiencing homelessness; recovery residences; and housing available to farm
workers, refugees, and individuals who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded
home and community-based services.
(q) Office of the State Treasurer. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $148,000 General Fund for the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance
Program; and
(2) $350,000 General Fund for financial modeling and the limited
service classified position established in Sec. E.100(b)(1)(A) of this act.
(r) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $835,420 General Fund for the Payment Reform Unit;
(2) $3,119,310 General Fund for the OneCare primary care model
transition;
(3) $10,800,000 Global Commitment for the Support and Services at
Home program, the Primary Care Medical Home, and Community Health
Team services under the Blueprint for Health; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 100 of 277
2025
(4) $1,250,000 Global Commitment for the first year of implementation
of the Maple Mountain Family Medicine Residency Program if the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services approves the Agency of Human Services’
request for federal matching funds pursuant to Sec. E.306.5(a) of this act.
(s) University of Vermont. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $750,000 General Fund for the Vermont Gallium Nitride Tech Hub.
(t) Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. In fiscal year 2026, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $450,000 General Fund for a grant to the Northeast Organic Farming
Association of Vermont for the Crop Cash, Crop Cash Plus, and Farm Share
programs;
(2) $500,000 General Fund for a grant to Vermont Foodbank for the
Vermonters Feeding Vermonters Program;
(3) $500,000 General Fund to offer Vermont Local Food for Schools
and Child Care grants within the Rozo McLaughlin Farm to School Grants
Program to fund grants for the purchase and distribution of local food to
schools and registered or licensed child care programs; and
(4) $250,000 General Fund to support Vermont’s 14 Natural Resources
Conservation Districts.
(u) Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living. In fiscal
year 2026, funds are appropriated for the following:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 101 of 277
2025
(1) $235,000 General Fund for a grant to HomeShare Vermont; and
(2) $500,000 General Fund for grants to skilled nursing facilities to
increase the pipeline of employed licensed nursing assistants, including
increasing the capacity of new and existing facility-based training programs,
and developing or expanding collaborations with other programs, including
career and technical education programs. Grants may support training program
costs, paid internships, student support, and recruitment and retention bonuses.
(A) Of the funds appropriated in subdivision (u)(2) of this section,
$150,000 shall be for grants of $30,000 or less.
(B) Of the funds appropriated in subdivision (u)(2) of this section,
$350,000 shall be for up to three grants.
(v) Vermont Student Assistance Corporation. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $1,500,000 General Fund for Freedom and Unity grants.
(w) Military Department. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $10,000 General Fund for the USS Vermont Support Group.
(x) Vermont Council on the Arts. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $68,737 General Fund for State match for federal funds.
(y) Agency of Transportation. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated
for the following:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 102 of 277
2025
(1) $1,400,000 Transportation Fund for transfer to the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development for programs to increase access to
level 1 and 2 Electric Vehicle Supply Equipment charging ports at workplaces
or multiunit dwellings, or both; and
(2) $600,000 Transportation Fund for the purpose of providing grants to
the public transit agencies to hire volunteer coordinators who shall be
responsible for the identification, recruitment, and retention of volunteers to
provide transportation services to individuals enrolled in the State’s demand
response transportation programs.
(z) Department of Labor. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $150,000 General Fund for a grant to Advance Vermont.
(aa) Office of the Secretary of State. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $50,000 General Fund for awards to support local civic journalism;
and
(2) $25,000 General Fund for staff and IT costs at the Office of
Professional Regulation relating to the implementation of certifications of
perinatal doulas and birthing centers.
(bb) Office of the Defender General. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $30,000 General Fund to enhance IT server capacity;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 103 of 277
2025
(2) $50,000 General Fund for the Orleans County staff office;
(3) $20,000 General Fund for the Addison County staff office; and
(4) $60,000 General Fund for public defender training pursuant to 13
V.S.A. § 5253.
(cc) Land Use Review Board. In fiscal year 2026, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $100,000 General Fund for development of digital infrastructure
relating to Land Use Review Board application and mapping projects.
(dd) Department of Mental Health. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $500,000 General Fund for the Champlain Valley Office of
Economic Opportunity Community Resource Center.
(ee) Office of the Attorney General. In fiscal year 2026, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $80,000 General Fund is added to the appropriation established per
2022 Acts and Resolves No. 182, Sec. 17(b) to extend the limited service
position established in subsection (a) of that section until June 30, 2026.
Sec. B.1101 FISCAL YEAR 2025 CLOSEOUT; FISCAL YEAR 2026
CONTINGENT TRANSACTIONS
(a) As part of the fiscal year 2025 closeout, the Department of Finance and
Management shall execute the requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 308. If any
balance remains after meeting these requirements, then, notwithstanding 32
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 104 of 277
2025
V.S.A. § 308c, the Department of Finance and Management shall designate the
first $138,970,000 as unallocated carryforward for use in meeting the
requirements of the fiscal year 2026 appropriations act as passed by the
General Assembly. The Department of Finance and Management shall then,
notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308c, calculate the maximum number of
contingent transactions that can be funded, in the order provided in subsection
(b) of this section, and designate that money to remain unallocated for such
purpose in fiscal year 2026. Any residual balance remaining after such
designations shall be reserved in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 308c.
(b) In fiscal year 2026, the following contingent transactions shall be
executed in the following order from the designated unallocated balance as
determined in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) $8,000,000 is transferred to the Communications and Information
Technology Special Fund to cover the costs of transitioning billable services
from a service level agreement model to a core enterprise services model.
(2) $50,000,000 is appropriated to the Agency of Administration to be
transferred by the Emergency Board pursuant to 32 V.S.A. §133 while the
General Assembly is not in session in the event of a reduction in federal funds
to the State as set forth in Sec. E.127.2 of this act.
(3) $30,000,000 is reserved in the General Fund for future appropriation
or transfer by the General Assembly for addressing federal funding shortfalls.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 105 of 277
2025
(4) $30,000,000 is reserved in the General Fund for future appropriation
or transfer by the General Assembly for addressing federal funding shortfalls,
Vermont Medicaid and other human services needs, property tax relief,
permanent housing initiatives, or any other uses determined to be in the best
interests of the public.
Sec. B.1103 CASH FUND FOR CAPITAL AND ESSENTIAL
INVESTMENTS; FISCAL YEAR 2026 ONE-TIME CAPITAL
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2026, $13,436,099 is appropriated from the Capital
Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential
Investments for the following:
(1) Department of Buildings and General Services:
(A) $1,506,599 for statewide major maintenance;
(B) $250,000 for statewide planning, reuse, and contingency;
(C) $250,000 for statewide physical security enhancements;
(D) $219,500 for State House repointing;
(E) $250,000 for an uninterruptable power supply system for the
Middlesex print and postal facility; and
(F) $6,900,000 for the Judiciary for renovations at the Windsor
County Courthouse in White River Junction.
(2) Vermont Veterans’ Home:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 106 of 277
2025
(A) $1,500,000 for the design and construction of the American Unit.
Notwithstanding 29 V.S.A. § 152(a)(20), the Commissioner of Buildings and
General Services is authorized to transfer any unexpended project balances
between the amount appropriated in this subdivision (A) and the amounts
appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15(b)(1).
(3) Agency of Commerce and Community Development:
(A) $2,500,000 for infrastructure improvements that are either
municipally leased for a term of at least 30 years or municipally owned and
that support the development of new or rehabilitated housing, provided that a
grant agreement shall be in place between the State and the municipality prior
to the release of funds.
(4) Department of Fish and Wildlife:
(A) $25,000 for the Lake Champlain Walleye Association, Inc. to
upgrade and repair the walleye rearing, restoration, and stocking infrastructure.
(5) Department of Public Safety:
(A) $35,000 for the Vermont Rural Fire Protection Task Force for the
dry hydrant program.
* * * Fiscal Year 2025 Adjustments, Appropriations, and Amendments * * *
Sec. C.100 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.209 is amended to read:
Sec. B.209 Public safety - state police
Personal services 74,755,468 76,655,468
Operating expenses 15,992,094
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 107 of 277
2025
Grants 1,137,841
Total 91,885,403 93,785,403
Source of funds
General fund 57,891,409 59,791,409
Transportation fund 20,250,000
Special funds 3,170,328
Federal funds 8,967,252
Interdepartmental transfers 1,606,414
Total 91,885,403 93,785,403
Sec. C.101 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.702 is amended to read:
Sec. B.702 Fish and wildlife - support and field services
Personal services 22,597,844 22,887,844
Operating expenses 6,843,095
Grants 853,066
Total 30,294,005 30,584,005
Source of funds
General fund 8,267,967 8,557,967
Special funds 365,427
Fish and wildlife fund 10,418,331
Federal funds 9,751,683
Interdepartmental transfers 1,490,597
Total 30,294,005 30,584,005
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 108 of 277
2025
Sec. C.102 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.101 is amended to read:
Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts are
transferred from the funds indicated:
(1) From the General Fund to the:
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$73,212,880 $78,235,088.34.
* * *
(J) Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund (#21555): $830,000
$6,500,000.
(K) Education Fund (#20205): $25,000,000.
(L) Medical Insurance Fund (#55100): $18,500,000.
(M) Correctional Industries Fund (#59100): $3,135,443.
(N) Act 250 Permit Fund (#21260): $900,000.
(O) State Liability Self-Insurance Fund (#56200): $3,000,000.
(P) Emergency Personnel Survivor’s Benefit Fund (#21884):
$220,000.
(2) From the Transportation Fund to the:
(A) Vermont Recreational Trails Fund (#21455): $370,000.
(B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
Fund (#21575): $523,966.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 109 of 277
2025
(C)(B) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$316,745.
(C) Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund (#20191): $900,000.
(D) Notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 13(c), the Transportation Fund
transfer to the Central Garage fund in fiscal year 2025 shall be $0.
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025:
(1) The following amounts shall be transferred to the General Fund from
the funds indicated:
(A) Cannabis Regulation Fund (#21998): $12,000,000
$15,417,084.32.
(B) AHS Central Office Earned Federal Receipts (#22005):
$4,641,960.
(C) Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $7,000,000
$6,139,162.
(D) Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $21,100,000 $9,543,353.
(E) Tobacco Litigation Settlement Fund (#21370): $3,000,000.
(F) Financial Institutions Supervision Fund (#21065): $1,100,000.
(F) Workforce Education and Training Fund (#21913):
$2,598,921.75.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 110 of 277
2025
(G) Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund (#21994): the balance of
the fund at the close of fiscal year 2025.
(2) The following estimated amounts, which may be all or a portion of
unencumbered fund balances, shall be transferred from the following funds to
the General Fund. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall report
to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July meeting the final amounts transferred
from each fund and certify that such transfers will not impair the agency,
office, or department reliant upon each fund from meeting its statutory
requirements.
(A) AG-Fees & Reimbursements-Court Order Fund (#21638):
$2,000,000.
(B) Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100): $6,500,000 $12,262,352.
(3) $66,935,000 $65,060,450.50 of the net unencumbered fund balances
in the Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21075), the Captive
Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21085), and the Securities
Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21080) shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.3 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
under the Federal Public Assistance Program, in fiscal year 2025, the Secretary
of Administration may provide funding from the Emergency Relief and
Assistance Fund that was transferred pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(J) of this
section to subgrantees prior to the completion of a project. In fiscal year years
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 111 of 277
2025
2025 and 2026, up to 70 percent of the State funding match on the nonfederal
share of an approved project for municipalities that were impacted by the
August and December 2023 and 2024 flooding events in counties that are
eligible for Federal Emergency Management Agency Public Assistance funds
under federal disaster declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-4810-
VT, DR-4816-VT, and DR-4826-VT may be advanced at the request of a
municipality.
(2) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.1 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
Under the Federal Public Assistance Program, the Secretary of Administration
shall increase the standard State funding match on the nonfederal share of an
approved project to the highest percentage possible given available funding for
municipalities in counties that were impacted by the August and December
2023 and 2024 flooding events and are eligible for Federal Emergency
Management Agency Public Assistance funds under federal disaster
declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-4810-VT, DR-4816-VT, and
DR-4826-VT.
* * *
Sec. C.103 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100 is amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2025 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 112 of 277
2025
(d) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for
the following:
* * *
(8) $835,073 General Fund for the Bridges to Health Program; and
(9) $400,000 $550,000 General Fund for the Vermont Household Health
Insurance Survey; and
(10) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity.
(e) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $16,500,000 General Fund for the General Assistance Emergency
Housing program;
(2) $1,034,065 General Fund to extend 10 Economic Services Division
limited service positions, including associated operating costs, in support of the
General Assistance Emergency Housing program; and
(3) $332,000 General Fund for a 2-1-1 service line contract to operate
24 hours seven days per week;
(4) $340,000 General Fund and $660,000 federal funds for the Office of
Child Support mainframe transition planning. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 703, unless otherwise reverted by a future act of the General Assembly, these
appropriations shall carry forward until fully expended; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 113 of 277
2025
(5) $1,800,000 General Fund shall be added to the appropriation made
in Sec. B.1102(b)(4) of this act for the Comprehensive Child Welfare
Information System.
* * *
(n) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2025,
funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $3,913,200 $5,586,324 General Fund and $5,366,383 $7,713,259
federal funds to be used for Global Commitment match for the Medicaid
Global Payment Program. To the extent that at a future date the Global
Payment Program ceases to operate as a program or changes methodology to a
retrospective payment program, any resulting one-time General Fund spending
authority remaining at that time shall be reverted. If the Human Services
Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b has not been replenished in
accordance with subdivision (b)(21) of Sec. B.1102 of this act, the remaining
unallocated General Fund balance shall be reserved in the Human Services
Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b up to the amount
appropriated in this subdivision.
(o) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $9,279,583 $13,299,583 Global Commitment for the Medicaid
Global Payment Program;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 114 of 277
2025
(2) $150,000 General Fund to conduct a technical analysis of Vermont’s
health insurance markets; and
(3) $100,000 General Fund to implement the expansion of Medicare
Savings Programs eligibility;
(4) $10,000,000 General Fund for Provider Stabilization Grants; and
(5) $11,000,000 General Fund for an alternative payment model
reconciliation payment to Brattleboro Retreat. All or a portion of these funds
may also be used as matching funds to the Agency of Human Services Global
Commitment Program to provide State match. If funds are used as matching
funds to the Agency of Human Services Global Commitment Program to
provide State match, the commensurate amount of Global Commitment Fund
spending authority may be requested during the Global Commitment Transfer
process pursuant to Sec. E.301.1 of this act.
* * *
(v) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for local economic damage grants to
municipalities that were impacted by the August and December 2023 flooding
events in counties that are eligible for Federal Emergency Management
Agency Public Assistance funds under federal disaster declarations DR-4744-
VT and DR-4762-VT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these local
economic damage grants be distributed to municipalities throughout the State
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 115 of 277
2025
to address the secondary economic impacts of the August and December 2023
flooding events. Monies from these grants shall not be expended on Federal
Emergency Management Agency related projects $1,800,000 General Fund for
local economic damage grants to municipalities in counties that are eligible for
Federal Emergency Management Agency Public Assistance funds under
federal disaster declarations DR-4810-VT and DR-4744-VT. It is the intent of
the General Assembly that these local economic damage grants be distributed
to municipalities throughout the State to address the secondary economic
impacts of 2023 and 2024 flooding events. Monies from these grants shall not
be expended on Federal Emergency Management Agency-related projects.
(A) The funds appropriated in this subdivision (v)(1) for local
economic damage grants shall be distributed as follows:
(i) $75,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has at least
$5,000,000 in estimated reported damages to public infrastructure relating to
2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(ii) $50,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $5,000,000 and at least $2,000,000 in estimated reported damages to
public infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(iii) $30,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $2,000,000 and at least $1,000,000 in estimated reported damages to
public infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 116 of 277
2025
(iv) $20,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $1,000,000 and at least $250,000 in estimated reported damages to public
infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(v) $10,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $250,000 and at least $100,000 in estimated reported damages to public
infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(B) To the extent that the funds appropriated in this subdivision
(v)(1) have not been granted on or before September 30, 2025, they shall revert
to the General Fund and be transferred to the Emergency Relief and Assistance
Fund.
(C) To the extent that the funds appropriated in this subdivision
(v)(1) are insufficient to distribute grants to all eligible municipalities in their
full amount, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall, pursuant to
32 V.S.A. § 511, utilize excess receipt authority to establish spending authority
from the PILOT Special Fund for this purpose; and
(2) $3,800,000 General Fund to ensure the appropriations made in Secs.
B.514 of this act and the fiscal year 2026 appropriations act are sufficient to
meet 100 percent of the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System
Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution. Appropriations made in Secs.
B.513 of this act and the fiscal year 2026 appropriations act pursuant to 16
V.S.A. § 1944(c)(13) shall not be considered for the purposes of determining
whether the appropriations made in Secs. B.514 of this act and the fiscal year
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 117 of 277
2025
2026 appropriations act are sufficient to ensure that the Actuarially Determined
Employer Contribution requirement is funded at 100 percent in fiscal years
2025 and 2026, respectively. Unexpended appropriations shall carry forward
into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose.
(w) Vermont Housing and Conservation Board. In fiscal year 2025, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $2,800,000 General Fund to complete pilot projects identified
pursuant to 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 186.
(x) Judiciary. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $800,000 General Fund to upgrade the network wiring and security
systems in county court houses; and
(2) $50,000 General Fund to upgrade or construct bathrooms in the
Essex Meeting House that are compliant with the Americans with Disabilities
Act.
(y) Agency of Education. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $68,407 Education Fund for a grant to the Essex North Supervisory
Union to eliminate a fiscal year 2025 Transportation Grant shortfall due to a
data submission error; and
(2) $149,666 Education Fund for a grant to the Windham Southwest
Supervisory Union to eliminate a fiscal year 2025 Transportation Grant
shortfall due to a data submission error.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 118 of 277
2025
Sec. C.104 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1100, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 40, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2024 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $2,300,000 General Fund to create, implement, and oversee a
comprehensive statewide language access plan;.
(2) $15,000,000 General Fund to be used to offset the cost of denied
claims for Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) federal
reimbursement related to presidentially declared disasters in fiscal year 2024 or
2025, or to fund unanticipated statewide costs related to recovery efforts from
declared disasters or administering programs created by funds from the
American Rescue Plan Act – State Fiscal Recovery Fund, including the costs
of related limited-service positions, and contracting for programs and services.
(3) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity. These funds shall not be released until the recommendation and report
required by Sec. E.100.1 of this act, regarding the permanent administrative
location for the Office of Health Equity, is provided to the committees of
jurisdiction listed in Sec. E.100.1 of this act and the positions in the Office of
Health Equity created by this act are filled.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 119 of 277
2025
(4) $30,000,000 General Fund to be used as Federal Emergency
Management Agency (FEMA) matching funds nonfederal share related to
disaster spending for costs incurred due to the July 2023 flooding event
federally declared disasters in fiscal years 2024 and 2025.
* * *
(l) Agency of Human Services Central Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds
are appropriated for the following:
* * *
(2) $8,834,000 General Fund and $11,483,302 Federal Revenue Fund
#22005 for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
program. Funds shall be used to expand the substances covered by the
program, include mental health and pediatric screenings, and make strategic
investments with community partners; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *
(m) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2024, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $366,066 General Fund and $372,048 Federal Revenue Fund #22005
for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
program; unexpended appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal
years and remain available for this purpose;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 120 of 277
2025
(2) $15,583,352 Global Commitment Fund #20405 for a two-year pilot
to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended
appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain
available for this purpose; and
* * *
(n) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $4,595,448 Global Commitment Fund #20405 to the Division of
Substance Use Programs for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for
Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *
(o) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2024, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $2,000,000 General Fund to implement the two-year Reach Ahead
Pilot Program. Funds shall be used to increase monthly food assistance
benefits to Reach Ahead participants, expand the eligibility window for those
leaving Reach Up, and provide incentive payments; unexpended appropriations
shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this
purpose;
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 121 of 277
2025
(ee) Joint Fiscal Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1) $250,000 for per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses
for members of the Task Force on Economic Development Incentives and for
consulting services approved by the Task Force consulting services related to
legislative needs identified in the 2025–2026 biennium, including analysis of
legislative staff compensation and organizational structure and implementation
of adjustments in accordance with policies adopted by the Joint Legislative
Management Committee.
* * *
Sec. C.105 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. C.110 is amended to read:
Sec. C.110 EMERGENCY RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
REVERSION AND REALLOCATION
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall revert may reimburse up to
$5,000,000 $14,300,000 of prior fiscal year federal funds appropriated
expended through the Emergency Rental Assistance Program, as approved by
the Joint Fiscal Committee pursuant to Grant Request #3034. An amount of
spending authority equal to these reversions shall be provided, pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 511, to existing State programs that meet the eligibility criteria
established by the U.S. Treasury with new General Fund appropriations
transferred from existing State programs that meet the eligibility criteria
established by the U.S. Treasury. These programs shall receive an amount of
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 122 of 277
2025
spending authority from the Emergency Rental Assistance Program equal to
the amount of General Fund appropriation transferred.
Sec. C.106 BUSINESS EMERGENCY GAP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
VERMONT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
GRANT
(a) Of the $7,000,000 General Fund provided to the Department of
Housing and Community Development by unanimous vote of the Emergency
Board on August 8, 2024 for the Business Emergency Gap Assistance
Program, $2,000,000 shall be used for a grant to the Vermont Economic
Development Authority to establish a disaster relief fund for use by businesses
following a natural disaster.
Sec. C.107 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.103 is amended to read:
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
* * *
(b) In fiscal year 2025, $5,000,000 shall be reserved within the Child Care
Contribution Special Fund. If in fiscal year 2026 the Child Care Contribution
Special Fund is found to have an undesignated fund deficit, these funds shall
be unreserved and used to the extent necessary to offset the deficit as
determined by Generally Accepted Accounting Principles. If these funds are
used in fiscal year 2026, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall
report to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations, or the Joint
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 123 of 277
2025
Fiscal Committee when the General Assembly is not in session, on the amount
used.
* * * Fiscal Year 2026 Fund Transfers and Reserve Allocations * * *
Sec. D.100 PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX ALLOCATIONS
(a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
exceed available revenues.
(1) The sum of $591,137 is allocated from the Current Use
Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
the Use Tax Reimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
amounts in excess of $591,137 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $36,964,250
from the property transfer tax and the surcharge established by 32 V.SA.
§ 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund
shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
transfer tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the
affordable housing bond pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 314 shall be offset by the
reduction of $1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established by 32
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 124 of 277
2025
V.S.A. § 9602a. The fiscal year 2026 appropriation of $36,964,250 to the
Vermont Housing and Conservation Board reflects the $1,500,000 reduction.
The affordable housing bond and related property transfer tax and surcharge
provisions are repealed after the life of the bond on July 1, 2039. Once the
bond is retired, the $1,500,000 reduction in the appropriation to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board shall be restored.
(3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a)(2), amounts in excess of
$10,000,705 from the property transfer tax deposited into the Municipal and
Regional Planning and Resilience Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund. Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a)(3), the $10,000,705 shall be
allocated as follows:
(A) $7,740,546 for disbursement to regional planning commissions in
a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
(B) $1,260,089 for disbursement to municipalities in a manner
consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
(C) $1,000,070 to the Agency of Digital Services for the Vermont
Center for Geographic Information.
Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts
shall be transferred from the funds indicated:
(1) From the General Fund (#10000) to the:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 125 of 277
2025
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$81,155,462.
(B) Capital Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital
and Essential Investments (#21952): $9,647,469.
(C) Tax Computer System Modernization Fund (#21909):
$4,300,000.
(D) Fish and Wildlife Fund – Nondedicated (#20305): $185,000.
(E) Education Fund (#20205): $77,200,000.
(F) Communications and Information Technology Fund (#58100):
$7,000,000.
(G) Environmental Contingency Fund (#21275): $9,520,000.
(i) The transfer in subdivision (a)(1)(G) of this section shall be
increased by the amount reverted in Sec. D.102(b) of this act. For the purpose
of developing the fiscal year 2026 budget this amount is estimated to be no less
than $2,000,000.
(H) Domestic and Sexual Violence Fund (#21926): $450,000.
(2) From the Transportation Fund (#20105) to the:
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$305,825.
(B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
Fund (#21575): $523,966.
(3) From the Education Fund (#20205) to the:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 126 of 277
2025
(A) Tax Computer System Modernization Fund (#21909):
$1,500,000.
(4) From the Clean Water Fund (#21932) to the:
(A) Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund (#21933): $11,000,000.
(B) Lake in Crisis Response Program Special Fund (#21938):
$120,000.
(5) From the Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments and Reserves
Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments (#21953)
to the:
(A) Transportation Fund (#20105): $12,500,000.
(B) Capital Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital
and Essential Investments Fund (#21952): $1,000,000.
(6) From the Agency of Human Services Central Office Earned Federal
Receipts (#22005) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $4,641,960.
(7) From the Attorney General Fees and Reimbursement Court Order
Fund (#21638) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $2,000,000.
(8) From the Cannabis Regulation Fund (#21998) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): 70 percent of the unencumbered and
unexpended balance of the fund in excess of $4,035,000 following the close of
fiscal year 2025. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall report
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 127 of 277
2025
the amount of this transfer to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July 2025
meeting. For purposes of developing the fiscal year 2026 budget, this amount
is estimated to be $8,900,000.
(B) Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund (#21995): 30 percent
of the unencumbered and unexpended balance of the fund in excess of
$4,035,000 following the close of fiscal year 2025. The Commissioner of
Finance and Management shall report the amount of this transfer to the Joint
Fiscal Committee at its July 2025 meeting. For purposes of developing the
fiscal year 2026 budget, this amount is estimated to be $3,800,000.
(b) The following transfers shall be in accordance with the citations
provided. Transfer estimates are for purposes of developing the fiscal year
2026 budget and do not supersede the actual year-end transfer amounts.
(1) To the General Fund (#10000) from the:
(A) 8 V.S.A. § 80(d). Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund
(#21075): $46,204,523.
(B) 9 V.S.A. § 5613(c). Securities Regulatory and Supervision Fund
(#21085): $21,745,635.
(C) 27 V.S.A. § 1543. Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100):
$7,389,063.
(2) To the Captive Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21085)
from the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $1,053,073
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 128 of 277
2025
(c) Transfers from the following enterprise funds to the General Fund
(#10000) shall not exceed the actual fiscal year end profits earned by the
enterprise net of any amount necessary to absolve the fund of a deficit. The
following estimated transfers are for purposes of developing the fiscal year
2026 budget only.
(1) From the Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $7,600,000.
(2) From the Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $14,849,754.
Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2026, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
accounts indicated:
1100892208 AOA – VHFA $2,000,000.00
1210892201 LEG – Pension Benefit Consul $8,821.25
1220891803 VT Tax Structure Comm $59,673.09
1220891901 Contract Services for Research $25,000.00
1220892201 JFO – AAHC Task Force Consult $7,155.00
1220892301 JFO – Studies and Reports $21,125.50
1230891301 Security $39.10
1230892301 SAA – Capitol Police $0.99
1260892201 TRE – Bond Redemption $6,000,000.00
(b) Any unencumbered balance remaining in the appropriation established
pursuant to 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1103(h), as amended by
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 129 of 277
2025
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 43, at the close of fiscal year 2025 shall
revert in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 703 and shall be exempt from the
carryforward authority provided to the Secretary of Administration in Sec.
F.182(a) of this act.
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2026, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
provided:
(1) General Fund.
(A) The General Fund Budget Stabilization Reserve shall be adjusted
in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 308. For purposes of developing this budget,
$1,685,385 is expected to be unreserved in fiscal year 2026.
(B) The General Fund Human Services Caseload Reserve shall be
adjusted in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 308b. For purposes of developing
this budget, $2,721,375 is expected to be unreserved in fiscal year 2026.
(C) The General Fund 27/53 Reserve shall be adjusted in accordance
with 32 V.S.A. § 308e. For purposes of developing this budget, $5,700,000 is
expected to be reserved in fiscal year 2026.
(2) Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments and Reserves Subaccount
in the Cash for Capital and Essential Investments Fund.
(A) $12,500,000 is unreserved for transfer to the Transportation Fund
for use by the Agency of Transportation in accordance with the provisions for
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 130 of 277
2025
which the funds were originally reserved in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113,
Sec. B.1102(b)(17).
(B) $14,500,000 is unreserved for use by the Department of
Environmental Conservation in accordance with the provisions for which the
funds were originally reserved in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
C.108(b).
(3) Transportation Fund.
(A) For the purpose of calculating the fiscal year 2026 Transportation
Fund Stabilization Reserve’s requirement of five percent of prior year
appropriations, fiscal year 2025 Transportation Fund reversions are deducted
from the fiscal year 2025 total appropriations amount.
* * * General Government * * *
Sec. E.100 POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of three permanent positions is authorized in fiscal
year 2026 for the following:
(1) Permanent classified positions:
(A) Department of Fish and Wildlife:
(i) one Fish and Wildlife Specialist.
(2) Permanent exempt positions:
(A) Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs:
(i) one Financial and IT Specialist; and
(ii) one Transport Deputy.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 131 of 277
2025
(b) The establishment of three limited service classified position is
authorized in fiscal year 2026:
(1) Office of the State Treasurer:
(A) one Climate Superfund Specialist.
(2) Office of the Attorney General:
(A) one Pre-Charge Administrator.
(3) Office of the Secretary of State:
(A) one Administrative Coordinator IV.
(c) The establishment of one limited service exempt position is authorized
in fiscal year 2026:
(1) Office of the Attorney General:
(A) one Solicitor General.
(d) The conversion of two limited service exempt positions to permanent
classified status is authorized in fiscal year 2026 as follows:
(1) Land Use Review Board:
(A) two District Coordinators.
(e) The conversion of nine limited service exempt positions to permanent
exempt status is authorized in fiscal year 2026 as follows:
(1) Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs:
(A) six Deputy State’s Attorneys;
(B) two Legal Assistants; and
(C) one Victim Advocate.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 132 of 277
2025
Sec. E.100.1 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.100, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 56, is further amended to read:
Sec. E.100 EXECUTIVE BRANCH POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of 75 permanent positions is authorized in fiscal year
2024 for the following:
* * *
(2) Permanent exempt positions:
* * *
(F) Office of the State Treasurer:
(i) one Director – VT Saves Economic Empowerment Division;
and
(ii) one Communications and Outreach Manager – VT Saves
Economic Empowerment Division;
* * *
(d) The establishment of 23 new exempt limited service positions is
authorized in fiscal year 2024 as follows:
* * *
(2) Agency of Administration Department of Health – Health Equity
Advisory Commission:
(A) one Private Secretary.
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 133 of 277
2025
Sec. E.100.2 SECRETARY OF ADMINISTRATION; REPORT ON
STATUS OF FEDERAL FUNDS
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall report to the Joint Fiscal
Committee at its July, September, and November 2025 meetings, and at other
meetings as requested, on any reductions to federal revenues to the State and
the status of any appropriations impacted by such reductions.
Sec. E.100.3 AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT; CORONAVIRUS STATE
FISCAL RECOVERY FUND APPROPRIATIONS;
REPORTING
(a) In fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration shall report to the
Joint Fiscal Committee on a quarterly basis, and upon the request of the
Committee, on the status of appropriations made from the American Rescue
Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund.
(1) Reports shall include information on:
(A) the original amounts appropriated;
(B) outstanding obligations against appropriations; and
(C) any remaining spending authority.
(b) In fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration shall report to the
Joint Fiscal Committee on a quarterly basis, and upon the request of the
Committee, on the status of any spending authority established pursuant to
2023 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.106.
(1) Reports shall include information on:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 134 of 277
2025
(A) the original amounts appropriated;
(B) outstanding obligations against appropriations; and
(C) any remaining spending authority.
(c) Any spending authority established pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves
No. 113, Sec. E.106(a) and (c) that remains unexpended and unencumbered on
December 31, 2027 shall revert to the General Fund. Any unallocated balance
resulting from this reversion shall be reserved in the General Fund Balance
Reserve.
(d) The Secretary of Administration shall report to the House and Senate
Committees on Appropriations on or before January 15, 2028 on the amount
reverted to the General Fund and reserved in the General Fund Balance
Reserve pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
Sec. E.105 AGENCY OF DIGITAL SERVICES; COMMUNICATIONS
AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FUND TRANSFER
(a) In fiscal year 2026, the Agency of Digital Services shall utilize from the
Internal Service Fund appropriation in Sec. B.105 of this act an amount of
funds equal to that transferred from the General Fund to the Communications
and Information Technology Fund in this act to cover the costs of transitioning
billable services from a service level agreement model to a core enterprise
services model. To the extent to which these funds are insufficient to complete
this transition, the Agency shall, as part of its fiscal year 2026 budget
adjustment presentation, request an additional appropriation or transfer of
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 135 of 277
2025
funds and shall not bill other agencies or departments to cover the costs of the
transition.
Sec. E.111 32 V.S.A. § 5824 is amended to read:
§ 5824. ADOPTION OF FEDERAL INCOME TAX LAWS
The statutes of the United States relating to the federal income tax, as in
effect on December 31, 2023 2024, but without regard to federal income tax
rates under 26 U.S.C. § 1, are hereby adopted for the purpose of computing the
tax liability under this chapter and shall continue in effect as adopted until
amended, repealed, or replaced by act of the General Assembly.
Sec. E.111.1 32 V.S.A. § 7402 is amended to read:
§ 7402. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(8) “Laws of the United States” means the U.S. Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended through December 31, 2023 2024. As used in this
chapter, “Internal Revenue Code” has the same meaning as “laws of the United
States” as defined in this subdivision. The date through which amendments to
the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986 are adopted under this subdivision
shall continue in effect until amended, repealed, or replaced by act of the
General Assembly.
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 136 of 277
2025
Sec. E.111.2 32 V.S.A. § 5861(c) is amended to read:
(c) Spouses or a surviving spouse may shall file a joint Vermont personal
income tax return for any taxable year for which the spouses file or the
surviving spouse are permitted to file files a joint federal income tax return
under the laws of the United States, unless the Commissioner allows a different
filing status.
Sec. E.111.3 TAX EXEMPT ORGANIZATIONS; TAX YEAR 2025
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for purposes of
determining the tax-exempt status of an organization, Vermont tax laws for tax
year 2025 shall follow 26 U.S.C. §§ 501–506 and all other federal statutory
provisions, federal regulations, and federal case law relating to the
determination of an organization’s tax-exempt status for purposes of federal
income taxation, as in effect on April 1, 2025, regardless of any amendments
or other changes affecting implementation or interpretation of those sections
between April 1, 2025 and December 31, 2025, whether due to an act of
Congress, federal regulation, federal bulletin, federal guidance, presidential
executive order, federal administrative or judicial decision, or other federal
source.
Sec. E.126 FISCAL YEAR 2026 INCREASED LEGISLATURE BASE
FUNDING; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that of the General Fund
appropriation in Sec. B.126 of this act, $1,500,000 be for expenses including
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 137 of 277
2025
meetings of the General Assembly not budgeted for in prior, current, or future
appropriations acts. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the
proposed fiscal year 2027 General Assembly budget exclude this $1,500,000
from any calculation of its base appropriation amount.
Sec. E.127 32 V.S.A. § 704 is amended to read:
§ 704. INTERIM BUDGET AND APPROPRIATION ADJUSTMENTS
(a) The General Assembly recognizes that acts of appropriations and their
sources of funding reflect the priorities for expenditures of public funds
enacted by the General Assembly and that major reductions or transfers, when
required by reduced State revenues or other reasons, ought to be made
whenever possible by an act of the General Assembly reflecting its revisions of
those priorities. Nevertheless, the General Assembly also recognizes that
when it is not in session, it may be necessary to reduce authorized
appropriations and their sources of funding, and funds may need to be
transferred, to maintain a balanced State budget. Under these limited
circumstances, it is the intent of the General Assembly that appropriations may
be reduced and funds transferred when the General Assembly is not in session
pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, in
each instance that the official State revenue estimate for the General Fund, the
Transportation Fund, or federal funds has been reduced by one percent or more
from the estimates determined and assumed for purposes of the current fiscal
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 138 of 277
2025
year’s appropriations, the Secretary of Administration shall prepare an
expenditure reduction plan for consideration and approval by the Joint Fiscal
Committee pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, provided that any total
reductions in appropriations and transfers of funds are not greater than the
reductions in the official State revenue estimate.
(2) In each instance that the official State revenue estimate for the
General Fund, the Transportation Fund, or federal funds has been reduced by
less than one percent from the estimates determined and assumed for purposes
of the current fiscal year’s appropriations, the Secretary of Administration may
prepare and implement an expenditure reduction plan without the approval of
the Joint Fiscal Committee, provided that any total reductions in appropriations
and transfers of funds are not greater than the reductions in the official State
revenue estimate. The Secretary may implement an expenditure reduction plan
under this subdivision if plan reductions to the total amount appropriated in
any section or subsection do not exceed five percent, the plan is designed to
minimize any negative effects on the delivery of services to the public, and the
plan does not have any unduly disproportionate effect on any single function,
program, service, benefit, or county. Plans not requiring the approval of the
Joint Fiscal Committee shall be filed with the Joint Fiscal Office prior to
implementation. If the Secretary’s plan consists of reductions greater than five
percent to the total amount appropriated in any section or subsection, such plan
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 139 of 277
2025
shall only be implemented in the manner provided for in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
* * *
Sec. E.127.1 32 V.S.A. § 308c is amended to read:
§ 308c. GENERAL FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND BALANCE
RESERVES
(a) There is hereby created within the General Fund a General Fund
Balance Reserve, also known as the “Rainy Day Reserve.” After satisfying the
requirements of section 308 of this title, and after other reserve requirements
have been met, any remaining unreserved and undesignated end of fiscal year
General Fund surplus shall be reserved in the General Fund Balance Reserve.
The General Fund Balance Reserve shall not exceed five 10 percent of the
appropriations from the General Fund for the prior fiscal year without
legislative authorization.
(1), (2) [Repealed.]
(3) Of the funds that would otherwise be reserved in the General Fund
Balance Reserve under this subsection, the following amounts shall be
reserved as necessary and transferred from the General Fund as follows:
(A) 25 percent to the Vermont State Retirement Fund established by
3 V.S.A. § 473; and
(B) 25 percent to the Postretirement Adjustment Allowance Account
established in 16 V.S.A. § 1949a.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 140 of 277
2025
(b)(1) The General Assembly may specifically unreserve and appropriate
the use of up to 50 percent of the amounts added in the prior fiscal year from or
transfer an amount not to exceed 10 percent of the General Fund Balance
Reserve to fund unforeseen or emergency needs. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any General Fund Balance Reserve funds utilized in accordance
with this section be replenished.
(2) If the official State revenue estimates of the Emergency Board for
the General Fund, determined under section 305a of this title, have been
reduced by two percent or more from the estimates determined and assumed
for purposes of the general appropriations act or budget adjustment act, funds
in the General Fund Balance Reserve may be unreserved and appropriated or
transferred by the General Assembly to compensate for a reduction of
revenues.
(c) There is hereby created within the Transportation Fund a Transportation
Fund Balance Reserve. After satisfying the requirements of section 308a of
this title, and after other reserve requirements have been met, any remaining
unreserved and undesignated end of fiscal year Transportation Fund surplus
shall be reserved in the Transportation Fund Balance Reserve. Monies from
this Reserve shall be available for appropriation by the General Assembly.
(d) Determination of the amounts of the General Fund and Transportation
Fund Balance Reserves shall be made by the Commissioner of Finance and
Management and reported, along with the amounts appropriated pursuant to
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 141 of 277
2025
subsection (a) of this section, to the legislative Joint Fiscal Committee at its
first meeting following September 1 of each year.
Sec. E.127.2 FEDERAL FUNDING; CALCULATION OF
APPROPRIATION REDUCTION; SECRETARY OF
ADMINISTRATION; JOINT FISCAL COMMITTEE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Unduplicated function total” means the individual function totals
set forth in this act excluding Global Commitment funds, Interdepartmental
Transfer funds, and Internal Service funds. For purposes of this section, the
determination of an unduplicated function total shall not include Education
Funds.
(2) “Governmental function unit” refers to the governmental function
areas set forth in Sec. A.108 of this act.
(b) In each instance that a reduction in federal revenues to the State results
in a decrease of the unduplicated function total for any governmental function
unit by:
(1) Less than 0.5 percent of the unduplicated function total or
$2,000,000, whichever threshold amount is greater, the Secretary of
Administration shall notify the Joint Fiscal Committee and may prepare and
implement a spending authority reduction plan without the approval of the
Joint Fiscal Committee, provided that any total reductions in appropriations
and transfers of funds are not greater than the reduction in the federal
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 142 of 277
2025
revenues. If the Secretary’s plan consists of reductions greater than five
percent to the total amount appropriated in any section or subsection of any
appropriations act, such plan shall only be implemented in the manner
provided for in 32 V.S.A. § 704(b)(2).
(2) Greater than $2,000,000 and 0.5 percent of the unduplicated function
total for any governmental function unit, but less than 25 percent or
$50,000,000, whichever threshold amount is lower:
(A) the Secretary of Administration shall prepare a spending
authority reduction and transfer plan for consideration and approval by the
Joint Fiscal Committee pursuant to the same process established in 32 V.S.A.
§ 704(e), notwithstanding the reference to subdivision (b)(1) of this section,
provided that the total reductions to federal spending authority are not greater
than the reductions in federal revenues; and
(B) to maintain a balanced State budget, to minimize the impact to
Vermonters and to abide by the legislative intent set forth by the General
Assembly in this act, the Joint Fiscal Committee may make a recommendation
to the Emergency Board to:
(i) utilize the appropriation in Sec. B.1101(b)(2) of this act to
support impacted programs at not more than the current fiscal year funding
level until the General Assembly is in session;
(ii) revert any unexpended and unobligated funds; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 143 of 277
2025
(iii) make such reductions or transfers in appropriations necessary
to support the priorities of the General Assembly.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for the
purpose of calculating any appropriation reduction that triggers the actions set
forth in this section, the baseline federal funding amounts shall be the federal
funding set forth in this act. The Secretary of Administration shall monitor any
changes in federal funding as the difference between the baseline federal
funding amount for use in fiscal year 2026 and any updated State federal funds
revenue forecast adopted by the Emergency Board and shall calculate the
percent reduction of the unduplicated function totals for each governmental
function unit.
Sec. E.127.3 FISCAL YEAR 2026 FEE REPORT; GENERAL
GOVERNMENT
(a) Fiscal year 2026 fee information. Agencies, departments, boards, and
offices that receive appropriations in Secs. B.100-199, B.400-599, and B. 800-
999 of this act shall, in collaboration with the Joint Fiscal Office, prepare a
comprehensive fee report for each fee that is in effect in fiscal year 2026. The
fee report shall contain the following information for each fee:
(1) the statutory authorization and termination date, if any;
(2) the current rate or amount of the fee and the date the fee was last set
or adjusted by the General Assembly or Joint Fiscal Committee;
(3) the Fund into which the fee revenues are deposited;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 144 of 277
2025
(4) the amount of the revenues derived from the fee in each of the five
fiscal years preceding fiscal year 2026;
(5) the number of times that the fee was paid in each of the two fiscal
years preceding fiscal year 2026;
(6) a projection of the fee revenues in fiscal years 2026 and 2027;
(7) a description of the service or product provided or the regulatory
function performed by the agency, department, board or office supported by
the fee;
(8) the amount of the fee if adjusted for inflation from the last time the
fee amount was modified using an appropriate index chosen in consultation
with the Joint Fiscal Office. The inflation adjustment shall be calculated as the
percentage change between the value of the index in the July of the year the fee
was last adjusted by the General Assembly and July 2025;
(9) if any portion of the fee revenue is deposited into a special fund, the
percentage of the special fund’s revenues that the fee represents;
(10) any available information regarding comparable fees in other
jurisdictions;
(11) any polices or trends that might affect the viability of the fee
amount; and
(12) any other relevant considerations for setting the fee amount.
(b) Reports.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 145 of 277
2025
(1) The Joint Fiscal Office shall provide guidance as necessary to the
agencies, departments, boards, and offices described in subsection (a) of this
section on the methodology to be used for compiling the information requested
in the fee reports. On or before October 15, 2025, the agencies, departments,
boards, and offices described in subsection (a) of this section shall submit a
draft report of the information required in subdivisions (a)(1)–(12) of this
section to the Joint Fiscal Office for review. Agencies, departments, boards,
and offices shall work with the Joint Fiscal Office to finalize the report before
submitting the final report described in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) On or before December 15, 2025, the agencies, departments, boards,
and offices described in subsection (a) shall submit a jointly prepared final
report to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Ways and Means
and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Finance.
(3) If any of the information requested in this section cannot be provided
for any reason, the agencies, departments, boards, and offices described in
subsection (a) shall include in both the draft and final reports a written
explanation for why the information cannot be provided.
(c) As used in this section, as it pertains to Executive Branch agencies,
departments, boards, and offices, “fee” means any source of State revenue
classified by the Department of Finance and Management Accounting System
as “fees,” “business licenses,” “nonbusiness licenses,” and “fines and
penalties.”
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 146 of 277
2025
(d) Executive Branch fee report moratorium. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 605, in fiscal year 2026, the Governor shall not be required to submit the
consolidated Executive Branch fee annual report and request to the General
Assembly.
Sec. E.131 3 V.S.A. chapter 18 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 18. VT VERMONT SAVES
§ 531. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Covered employer” means a person, entity, or subsidiary engaged
in a business, industry, profession, trade, or other enterprise in the State,
whether for profit or not for profit, that has does not offered currently offer to
an employee, or is within a control group that maintains or contributes to,
effective in form or operation at any time within the current calendar year or
two preceding calendar years, a specified tax-favored retirement plan. If an
employer does not maintain a specified tax-favored retirement plan for a
portion of a calendar year ending on or after the effective date of this chapter
but does adopt such a plan for the remainder of that calendar year, the
employer is not a covered employer for the remainder of the year. A covered
employer does not include:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 147 of 277
2025
(A) the federal government, the State or any other state, any county
or municipal corporation, or any of the State’s or any other state’s units or
instrumentalities;
(B) any employer that has not only been in business during both the
current calendar year and the preceding calendar year.
(4) “ERISA” means the federal Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C § 1001 et seq.
(5) “Internal Revenue Code” means the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended.
(6) “IRA” means a traditional IRA or a Roth IRA.
(7) “Participant” means an individual who has an IRA under the
Program.
(8) “Payroll deduction IRA or payroll deduction IRA arrangement”
means an arrangement by which an employer allows employees to contribute
to an IRA by means of payroll deduction.
(9) “Program” means the VT Vermont Saves Program established in
accordance with this chapter.
* * *
§ 532. VT VERMONT SAVES PROGRAM; ESTABLISHMENT
(a) Establishment; purpose. There is established the VT Vermont Saves
Program (Program), administered by the Office of the State Treasurer, for the
purpose of increasing financial security for Vermonters by providing access to
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 148 of 277
2025
an IRA for Vermont employees of companies that do not currently offer a
retirement savings program. The Program shall be designed to facilitate
portability of benefits through withdrawals, rollovers, and direct transfers from
an IRA and achieve economies of scale and other efficiencies to minimize
costs. The Program shall:
* * *
(b) Type of IRA. The type of IRA to which contributions are made
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be a Roth IRA; provided,
however, the State Treasurer is authorized to add an option for all participants
to:
(1) affirmatively elect to contribute to a traditional IRA instead of a
Roth IRA; or
(2) open both a Roth IRA and a traditional IRA.
(c) Contributions.
(1) Unless otherwise specified by the covered employee, a covered
employee shall automatically initially contribute five percent of the covered
employee’s salary or wages to the Program. A covered employee may elect to
opt out of the Program at any time or contribute at any higher or lower rate,
expressed as a percentage of salary or wages, or, as permitted by the State
Treasurer, expressed as a flat dollar amount, subject in all cases to the IRA
contribution and eligibility limits applicable under the Internal Revenue Code
at no additional charge.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 149 of 277
2025
(2) The State Treasurer shall provide for, on a uniform basis, an annual
increase of each active participant’s contribution rate, by not less than one
percent, but not more than eight percent, of salary or wages each year. Any
such increases shall apply to active participants, including participants by
default with an option to opt out or participants who are initiated by affirmative
participant election, provided that any increase is subject to the IRA
contribution and eligibility limits applicable under the Internal Revenue Code.
* * *
Sec. E.131.1 29 V.S.A. chapter 61 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 61. MUNICIPAL EQUIPMENT AND VEHICLE LOAN FUND
§ 1601. MUNICIPAL EQUIPMENT AND VEHICLE LOAN FUND
(a) There is hereby created the Municipal Equipment and Vehicle Loan
Fund for the purpose of providing loans on favorable terms to municipalities
for the purchase of construction, fire, emergency, or heavy equipment or
motorized highway building and maintenance equipment, heavy equipment,
and authorized emergency vehicles as set forth in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
(b) The Municipal Equipment and Vehicle Loan Fund shall be
administered by a committee composed of the State Treasurer and the State
Traffic Committee established by 19 V.S.A. § 1(24), pursuant to policies and
procedures approved by the Traffic this Committee established by 19 V.S.A.
§ 1(24) with administrative support from the Office of the State Treasurer.
The Committee shall establish criteria for distribution of available loan funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 150 of 277
2025
among municipalities considering at least financial need, equitable geographic
distribution, and ability to repay. The Fund shall be a revolving fund and all
principal and interest earned on loans and the fund balance remaining in the
Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert but be carried over in the
Fund available for use in the succeeding fiscal year. The Committee shall
meet upon request of the State Treasurer to consider applications.
§ 1602. APPLICATION; LOANS; CONDITIONS
(a) Application forms shall be furnished by the Committee on request.
Upon Committee approval of an application of a municipality or two or more
municipalities applying jointly for purchases as set forth in subsection 1601(a)
of this title, the State Treasurer may loan money from the Fund to that
municipality or municipalities for the purchase of equipment. Purchases of
equipment eligible for loans the applicants. Loans from the Fund shall have be
used on equipment and vehicles with a useful life of at least five years and a
purchase price of at least $20,000.00 but shall not be eligible for loans in
excess of $150,000.00 from this Fund.
(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to establish terms and conditions,
including repayment schedules of up to five years for loans from the Fund to
ensure repayment of loans to the Fund. The amount of any loan shall be not
more than 75 percent of the purchase price or $150,000.00, whichever is lower.
Before a municipality may receive a loan from the Fund, it shall give to the
State Treasurer security for the repayment of the funds. The security shall be
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 151 of 277
2025
in such form and amount as the State Treasurer may determine and may
include a lien on the equipment or emergency vehicle financed by the loan.
(c) The rates of interest shall be as established by this section to assist
municipalities in purchasing equipment upon terms more favorable than in the
commercial market. Such rates shall be not more than two percent per annum
for a loan to a single municipality, and loans shall bear no interest charge if
made to two or more municipalities purchasing equipment jointly.
(d) In any fiscal year, new loans from the Municipal Equipment Loan Fund
shall not exceed an aggregate of $1,500,000.00. The Treasurer shall put forth
recommendations to the General Assembly on maximum loan amount every
five years, commencing January 15, 2028, based on requests received and
loans granted pursuant to this chapter.
(e) When a municipality suffers the destruction of more than one piece of
equipment or a vehicle at or near the same time or suffers some unanticipated
hardship relating to the equipment or vehicle and the Committee finds that
replacement would place an undue financial hardship on the municipality, the
Committee may waive one or both of the following loan limiting factors in
subsection (b) of this section:
(1) the $150,000.00 annual limitation on each municipality; or
(2) the 75 percent of the purchase price limitation.
(f) The State Treasurer shall put forth recommendations to the General
Assembly on the maximum individual loan amount from the Fund every five
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 152 of 277
2025
years, commencing on January 15, 2028, based on requests received and loans
granted pursuant to this chapter in the five preceding years.
* * *
Sec. E.131.2 32 V.S.A. § 1001 is amended to read:
§ 1001. CAPITAL DEBT AFFORDABILITY ADVISORY COMMITTEE
* * *
(c) Committee estimate of a prudent amount of net State tax-supported
debt; affordability considerations. On or before September 30 of each year, the
Committee shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly the
Committee’s estimate of net State tax-supported debt that prudently may be
authorized for the next fiscal year, together with a report explaining the basis
for the estimate. The Committee’s estimate shall not take into consideration
the balance remaining at the end of each fiscal year in the subaccounts of the
Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments, established pursuant to
section 1001b of this title. The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of
required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.
In developing its annual estimate, and in preparing its annual report, the
Committee shall consider:
* * *
(4) The criteria that recognized bond rating agencies use to judge the
quality of issues of State bonds, including:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 153 of 277
2025
(A) existing and projected total debt service on net tax-supported
debt as a percentage of combined General and Transportation Fund revenues,
excluding surpluses in these revenues that may occur in an individual fiscal
year; and
(B) existing and projected total net tax-supported debt outstanding as
a percentage of total State personal income;
(C) existing and projected pension and other postemployment benefit
liability metrics; and
(D) other metrics at the Committee’s discretion, including long-term
liabilities not covered in subdivisions (A)–(C) of this subdivision (4).
(5) The principal amounts currently outstanding, and balances for the
next fiscal year, and annually for the following nine fiscal years, of existing:
(A) obligations of instrumentalities of the State for which the State
has a contingent or limited liability;
(B) any other long-term debt of instrumentalities of the State not
secured by the full faith and credit of the State, or for which the General
Assembly is permitted to replenish reserve funds; and
(C) to the maximum extent obtainable, all long-term debt of
municipal governments in Vermont that is secured by general tax or user fee
revenues.
(6) The impact of capital spending upon the economic conditions and
outlook for the State.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 154 of 277
2025
(7) The cost-benefit of various levels of debt financing, types of debt,
and maturity schedules.
(8) Any projections of capital needs authorized or prepared by the
Agency of Transportation, the Joint Fiscal Office, or other agencies or
departments.
(9) Any other factor that is relevant to:
(A) the ability of the State to meet its projected debt service
requirements for the next five fiscal years; or
(B) the interest rate to be borne by the credit rating on, or other
factors affecting the marketability of State bonds.
(10) The effect of authorizations of new State debt on each of the
considerations of this section.
(11) The capital asset depreciation ratio reflecting unfunded capital
maintenance costs.
* * *
Sec. E.133 VERMONT STATE EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION;
OPERATING BUDGET, SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $3,339,343 appropriated in Sec. B.133 of this act, $2,247,471
constitutes the Vermont State Employees’ Retirement System operating
budget, and $1,091,872 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 155 of 277
2025
Investment Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont State
Employees’ Retirement System.
Sec. E.134 VERMONT MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT
SYSTEM AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT
COMMISSION; OPERATING BUDGET; SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $1,921,020 appropriated in Sec. B.134 of this act, $1,494,924
constitutes the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System operating
budget, and $426,096 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont Municipal
Employees’ Retirement System.
Sec. E.134.1 3 V.S.A. § 525 is added to read:
§ 525. VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION; MARKET
FACTOR ANALYSIS FOR CLASSIFIED POSITIONS
The Department of Human Resources shall conduct and implement a
market factor analysis for all classified positions within the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission not later than January 15, 2026, and every three years
thereafter. The market factor analysis may:
(1) follow all policies and procedures established by the Department
of Human Resources for conducting market factor analyses;
(2) compare total compensation for comparable positions in relevant
public labor markets, with particular attention to other public pension
investment organizations of similar asset size and investment complexity;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 156 of 277
2025
(3) consider the specialized skills, education, certifications, and
experience required for investment-related positions;
(4) evaluate recruitment and retention challenges specific to these
positions;
(5) recommend appropriate market factor adjustments when
warranted by the analysis; and
(6) include an assessment of the fiscal impact of any recommended
market factor adjustments.
Sec. E.139 GRAND LIST LITIGATION ASSISTANCE
(a) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.139 of this act, $9,000 shall be
transferred to the Attorney General and $70,000 shall be transferred to the
Department of Taxes’ Division of Property Valuation and Review and used
with any remaining funds from the amount previously transferred for final
payment of expenses incurred by the Department or towns in defense of grand
list appeals regarding the reappraisals of the hydroelectric plants and other
expenses incurred to undertake utility property appraisals in Vermont.
Sec. E.142 PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES
(a) This appropriation is for State payments in lieu of property taxes under
32 V.S.A. chapter 123, subchapter 4, and the payments shall be calculated in
addition to and without regard to the appropriations for correctional facilities
elsewhere in this act. Payments in lieu of taxes under this section shall be paid
from the PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 157 of 277
2025
Sec. E.142.1 32 V.S.A. § 3709 is amended to read:
§ 3709. PILOT SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is hereby established a PILOT Special Fund consisting of local
option tax revenues paid to the State Treasurer pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138.
This Fund shall be managed by the Commissioner of Taxes pursuant to chapter
7, subchapter 5 of this title. Notwithstanding subdivision 588(3) of this title,
all interest earned on the Fund shall be retained in the Fund for use in meeting
future obligations. The Fund shall be exclusively for payments required under
chapter 123, subchapter subchapters 4 and 4C of this title, and for any
additional State payments in lieu of taxes for correctional facilities and to the
City of Montpelier. The Commissioner of Finance and Management may draw
warrants for disbursements from this Fund in anticipation of receipts.
* * *
Sec. E.142.2 32 V.S.A. chapter 123, subchapter 4C is added to read:
Subchapter 4C. Municipal Grand List Stabilization Program
§ 3710. MUNICIPAL GRAND LIST STABILIZATION PROGRAM
(a) There is established the Municipal Grand List Stabilization Program
within the Department of Taxes to reimburse municipalities for municipal
property taxes assessed under chapter 133 of this title for flood-prone
properties acquired by a municipality through a voluntary buyout program
operated by the Division of Emergency Management.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 158 of 277
2025
(b) On or before September 1 of each year, the Commissioner of Public
Safety shall certify to the Commissioner of Taxes the properties eligible for the
Municipal Grand List Stabilization Program and shall submit any other
information required by the Commissioner of Taxes. To be eligible for the
Program under this subchapter, a municipality must have acquired an eligible
property on or after July 1, 2023 and preserved the property as open space with
a deed restriction or covenant prohibiting development of the property. The
Commissioner of Public Safety shall first certify properties to the
Commissioner of Taxes pursuant to this subsection on or before September 1,
2025.
(c) Upon notification by the Commissioner of Public Safety, the
Commissioner of Taxes shall certify the payment amounts and make an annual
payment to each municipality for each eligible property to compensate for the
loss of municipal property tax. The payment shall be calculated using the
grand list value of the acquired property for the year during which the property
was either damaged by flooding or identified as flood-prone by the
Commissioner of Public Safety, multiplied by the municipal tax rate, including
any submunicipal tax rates, in effect each year. This payment shall be made on
or before January 1 of each year for five years.
(d) A property shall not be eligible for reimbursement payments for more
than 10 years. The Commissioner shall make an annual payment for the full
amount calculated under subsection (c) of this section for five years. After a
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 159 of 277
2025
municipality has received payments for an eligible property for five
consecutive years, the Commissioner shall make an annual payment to the
municipality for any subsequent year of eligibility in an amount equal to one-
half of the amount calculated under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Payment under this section shall be calculated and issued from the
PILOT Special Fund under section 3709 of this title only after all other grants
under subchapter 4 of this chapter are calculated and issued. If the PILOT
Special Fund balance is insufficient to pay the full amount of all payments
authorized under this subchapter, then payments calculated under this section
and due to each municipality for each property shall be reduced
proportionately.
Sec. E.144 PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES; CORRECTIONAL
FACILITIES
(a) Payments in lieu of taxes under this section shall be paid from the
PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. E.200 ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Office of the Attorney
General, Medicaid Fraud and Residential Abuse Unit, is authorized to retain,
subject to appropriation, one-half of the State share of any recoveries from
Medicaid fraud settlements, excluding interest, that exceed the State share of
restitution to the Medicaid Program. All such designated additional recoveries
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 160 of 277
2025
retained shall be used to finance Medicaid Fraud and Residential Abuse Unit
activities.
(b) Of the revenue available to the Attorney General under 9 V.S.A.
§ 2458(b)(4), $1,802,200 is appropriated in Sec. B.200 of this act.
Sec. E.200.1 9 V.S.A. § 2473 is amended to read:
§ 2473. NOTICE OF SOLICITATION
* * *
(f)(1) For each calendar year in which a paid fundraiser solicits in this State
on behalf of a charitable organization, the paid fundraiser shall pay a
registration fee of $500.00 $675.00 to the Attorney General no not later than
ten 10 days prior to its first solicitation in this State.
(2) Each notice of solicitation filed in accordance with this section shall
be accompanied by a fee of $200.00 $270.00. In the case of a campaign
lasting more than 12 months, an additional $200.00 $270.00 fee shall be paid
annually on or before the date of the anniversary of the commencement of the
campaign.
(3) Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in a special fund
managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and shall be available
to the Attorney General for the costs of administering sections 2471–2479 of
this title.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 161 of 277
2025
Sec. E.200.2 18 V.S.A. § 4632 is amended to read:
§ 4632. DISCLOSURE OF ALLOWABLE EXPENDITURES AND GIFTS
BY MANUFACTURERS OF PRESCRIBED PRODUCTS
* * *
(b)(1) Annually on or before April 1, the Office of the Attorney General
shall collect a $500.00 $765.00 fee from each manufacturer of prescribed
products filing annual disclosures of expenditures greater than zero described
in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Fees collected under this section shall fund collection and analysis of
information on activities related to the marketing of prescribed products under
section 4631a of this title and under this section. The fees shall be collected in
a special fund assigned to the Office.
* * *
Sec. E.208 PUBLIC SAFETY; ADMINISTRATION
(a) The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized to enter into a
performance-based contract with the Essex County Sheriff’s Department to
provide law enforcement service activities agreed upon by both the
Commissioner of Public Safety and the Sheriff.
Sec. E.208.1 PUBLIC SAFETY; CAPITAL PLAN
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2027 budget presentation, the Department of
Public Safety shall submit a capital plan for the replacement of firearms and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 162 of 277
2025
mobile and portable radio equipment to the House and Senate Committees on
Appropriations.
Sec. E.208.2 VERMONT COMMUNITY RADIO GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont’s seven active community radio stations currently serve
over 200,000 Vermonters, many in rural and underserved areas.
(2) Community radio stations have consistently provided critical
information during emergencies, including Tropical Storm Irene, recent severe
flooding, and other natural disasters.
(3) These stations operate with small budgets, primarily relying on
volunteer staff and listener donations, and are ineligible for federal funding
through the Corporation for Public Broadcasting due to their size.
(4) Upcoming FCC-approved stations in Bristol, Richmond-Underhill-
Jericho, and Ludlow will expand coverage to nearly all Vermont counties,
increasing statewide accessibility to vital community radio services.
(5) Investment in these stations strengthens Vermont’s public safety
network and promotes civic engagement by providing local, hyper-focused
content that commercial and statewide media cannot replicate.
(b) Intent. The intent of this section is to ensure Vermont’s community
radio stations remain resilient and prepared to serve as lifelines during
emergencies while fostering local engagement and preserving Vermont’s
unique community fabric.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 163 of 277
2025
(c) Grant program.
(1) The Vermont Community Radio Grant Program is established to
provide one-time funding to community radio stations for the purpose of:
(A) upgrading equipment and infrastructure necessary for reliable
emergency broadcasting;
(B) procuring and installing backup generators; and
(C) enhancing operational sustainability through software
improvements and technical training.
(2) The Program shall be administered by the Commissioner of Public
Safety or designee in collaboration with the Vermont Association of
Broadcasters.
(3) Grants shall be allocated as follows:
(A) up to $25,000 per station for seven active community radio
stations; and
(B) up to $10,000 per station for three upcoming stations currently
under construction.
(4) To be eligible for a grant under the Program, an applicant shall:
(A) be a nonprofit, noncommercial community radio station licensed
in Vermont;
(B) demonstrate a history of providing emergency broadcasting
services or show the capacity to provide those services upon funding; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 164 of 277
2025
(C) submit a detailed implementation plan for the proposed use of
grant funding.
(d) Report. On or before June 30, 2026, a community radio station that
receives a grant under the Program shall provide to the Commissioner of
Public Safety a report detailing the:
(1) use of grant funds, including itemized expenses;
(2) improvements achieved in emergency readiness and operational
capacity; and
(3) impact on community service and engagement.
Sec. E.209 PUBLIC SAFETY; STATE POLICE
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209, $35,000 shall be
available to the Southern Vermont Wilderness Search and Rescue Team, which
is composed of the State Police, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, county
sheriffs, and local law enforcement personnel in Bennington, Windham, and
Windsor Counties, for snowmobile enforcement.
(b) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209 of this act, $405,000 is
allocated for grants in support of the Drug Task Force. Of this amount,
$190,000 shall be used by the Vermont Drug Task Force to fund three town
task force officers. These town task force officers shall be dedicated to
enforcement efforts with respect to both regulated drugs as defined in 18
V.S.A. § 4201(29) and the diversion of legal prescription drugs. Any
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 165 of 277
2025
unobligated funds may be allocated by the Commissioner to fund the work of
the Drug Task Force or be carried forward.
(c) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209 of this act, $2,100,000
is allocated exclusively for the purchase, outfitting, assignment, and disposal of
State Police vehicles.
Sec. E.212 PUBLIC SAFETY; FIRE SAFETY
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.212 of this act, $55,000
shall be granted to the Vermont Rural Fire Protection Task Force for the
purpose of designing dry hydrants.
Sec. E.215 MILITARY; ADMINISTRATION
(a) The amount of $1,219,834 shall be disbursed to the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation for the National Guard Tuition Benefit Program
established in 16 V.S.A. § 2857.
Sec. E.219 MILITARY; VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.219 of this act, $1,000 shall be used
for continuation of the Vermont Medal Program; $2,000 shall be used for the
expenses of the Governor’s Veterans Advisory Council; $7,500 shall be used
for the Veterans’ Day parade; and $10,000 shall be granted to the American
Legion for the Boys’ State and Girls’ State programs.
Sec. E.221 CRIMINAL JUSTICE COUNCIL; POOL POSITION
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.221 of this act, $115,000 is
to fund one permanent classified position taken from the position pool. The
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 166 of 277
2025
position shall be used to establish a Canine Head Trainer at the Criminal
Justice Council.
Sec. E.232 SECRETARY OF STATE; VERMONT ACCESS NETWORK
BUDGET
(a) The Secretary of State shall grant the $1,350,000 General Fund
appropriation, provided in Section B.232 of this act, to the Vermont Access
Network to maintain current operations and programming.
Sec. E.232.1 SECRETARY OF STATE; LOCAL CIVIC JOURNALISM
AWARDS
(a) As part of its civic engagement and education activities, the Office of
the Secretary of State shall, in collaboration with the University of Vermont
Center for Community News, make cash awards to local civic journalism
organizations or businesses with funds appropriated to it in Sec. B.1100(aa)(1)
of this act. The Office of the Secretary of State shall, in collaboration with the
University of Vermont Center for Community News, establish award criteria
and assemble a panel of three to five journalists, academics, and industry
veterans who neither work for eligible organizations nor are eligible to receive
awards themselves to determine award recipients. Awards shall be made in
amounts between $1,000 and $10,000.
Sec. E.236 HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION; POOL POSITION
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.236 of this act, $250,000 is
to fund two permanent exempt positions taken from the position pool. The
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 167 of 277
2025
positions shall be used to establish an Intake Specialist and a Staff Attorney
Investigator at the Human Rights Commission.
Sec. E.236.1 LIQUOR AND LOTTERY; APPROPRIATION; BUSINESS-
TO-BUSINESS WEBSITE
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.236.1 of this act, $1,820,000
Enterprise Fund shall be used for the business-to-business website design and
implementation to improve the ordering and payment for on-premise licensees.
Sec. E.300 FUNDING FOR THE OFFICE OF THE HEALTH CARE
ADVOCATE, VERMONT LEGAL AID
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.300 of this act:
(1) $2,000,406 shall be used for the contract with the Office of the
Health Care Advocate;
(2) $1,717,994 for Vermont Legal Aid services, including the Poverty
Law Project and mental health services; and
(3) $650,000 is for the purposes of maintaining current Vermont Legal
Aid program capacity and addressing increased requests for services, including
eviction prevention and protection from foreclosure and consumer debt.
Sec. E.300.1 REPORT; RESIDENTIAL BEDS FOR YOUTH
(a) As part of their fiscal year 2027 budget presentations to the General
Assembly, the Agency of Human Services and departments within the Agency
of Human Services shall provide coordinated information regarding:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 168 of 277
2025
(1) the basis for the projected number of beds per facility to create 41
new beds for youth in high-end facilities under the Departments for Children
and Families, of Mental Health, and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent
Living for inpatient, psychiatric residential, stabilization, and treatment
services, including projected reductions in out-of-state placements;
(2) the status of capacity at lower level residential and crisis facilities
and their capabilities in preventing higher level needs if investments would
enable full capacity use; and
(3) a projected five-year operating budget across the Agency and
departments for full utilization of the new high-end system components as
currently planned, including:
(A) costs to the Department of Vermont Health Access’ budget; and
(B) how these costs will impact the overall budgets for lower-level,
community-based, prevention, and other services needed to prevent escalation
to higher levels of care.
Sec. E.300.2 SETTLEMENT FUNDS; PRIMARY CARE; LEGISLATIVE
INTENT; REPORT
(a) The Green Mountain Care Board shall report to the House Committee
on Health Care; the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare; and the House
and Senate Committees on Appropriations within 30 days of the determination
on the distribution of the $11,000,000 from the University of Vermont Medical
Center to non-hospital primary care providers pursuant to the Settlement
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 169 of 277
2025
Agreement entered into by the University of Vermont Medical Center, Inc.,
University of Vermont Health Network, Inc., and the Green Mountain Care
Board in April 2025.
Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall use the funds appropriated in Sec.
B.301 of this act for payment required under the intergovernmental agreement
between the Agency of Human Services and the managed care entity, the
Department of Vermont Health Access, as provided for in the Global
Commitment for Health Waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act.
(b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
total estimated sum of $27,887,533 is anticipated to be certified as State
matching funds as follows:
(1) $24,714,000 certified State match available from local education
agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid services under
Global Commitment. This amount, combined with $35,286,000 of federal
funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, equals a total estimated
expenditure of $60,000,000. An amount equal to the amount of the federal
matching funds for eligible special education school-based Medicaid services
under Global Commitment shall be transferred from the Global Commitment
Fund to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund established by 16 V.S.A.
§ 2959a.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 170 of 277
2025
(2) $3,173,533 certified State match available from local designated
mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
services provided under Global Commitment.
(c) Up to $4,997,210 is transferred from the Agency of Human Services
Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer Fund
consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act.
Sec. E.301.1 GLOBAL COMMITMENT APPROPRIATIONS; TRANSFER;
REPORT
(a) To facilitate fiscal year 2026 closeout, the Secretary of Human Services,
with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, may make transfers
among the appropriations authorized for Medicaid and Medicaid waiver
program expenses, including Global Commitment appropriations outside the
Agency of Human Services. At least three business days prior to any transfer,
the Agency of Human Services shall submit to the Joint Fiscal Office a
proposal of transfers to be made pursuant to this section. A final report on all
transfers made under this section shall be made to the Joint Fiscal Committee
for review at the Committee’s September 2026 meeting. The purpose of this
section is to provide the Agency with limited authority to modify the
appropriations to comply with the terms and conditions of the Global
Commitment section 1115 demonstration approved by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services under section 1115 of the Social Security
Act.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 171 of 277
2025
Sec. E.301.2 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 72a, as amended by 2022
Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.105, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
E.301.2, and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.300.2, is further
amended to read:
Sec. 72a. MEDICAID HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
(HCBS) PLAN
* * *
(f) The Global Commitment Fund appropriated in subsection (e) of this
section obligated in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025, and 2026 for the
purposes of bringing HCBS plan spending authority forward into fiscal year
years 2024, and fiscal year 2025, and 2026, respectively. The funds
appropriated in subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section may be transferred
on a net-neutral basis in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025, and 2026 in the
same manner as the Global Commitment appropriations in 2022 Acts and
Resolves No. 185, Sec. E.301. The Agency shall report to the Joint Fiscal
Committee in September 2023, September 2024, and September 2025, and
September 2026, respectively, on transfers of appropriations made and final
amounts expended by each department in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025,
and 2026, respectively, and any obligated funds carried forward to be
expended in fiscal year years 2024, and fiscal year 2025, and 2026,
respectively.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 172 of 277
2025
Sec. E.301.3 GLOBAL COMMITMENT FUND; HOSPITAL DIRECTED
PAYMENT PROGRAM
(a) The Agency of Human Services may seek a State Directed Payment
model with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. This payment
model will be for a Hospital Directed Payment program. Upon approval from
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Agency of Human
Services’ Department of Vermont Health Access, the University of Vermont,
and the University of Vermont Medical Center may enter into a mutual
agreement on the implementation of the Hospital Directed Payment program.
(b) If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves a Vermont
Hospital Directed Payment program within the State’s Global Commitment to
Health Section 1115 Demonstration Waiver in fiscal year 2026 while the
General Assembly is not in session, then, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 511 and
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commissioner
of Finance and Management may approve the Agency of Human Services’
allocation and expenditure of excess receipts for Global Commitment Fund
spending up to the amount approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services for the Vermont Hospital Directed Payment program.
(c) In fiscal year 2026, the Agency of Human Services may, to the extent
permitted under federal law, reasonably manage the timing of federal fiscal
year 2026 Disproportionate Share Hospital payments to hospitals due to the
impact the Vermont Hospital Directed Payment program payments received in
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 173 of 277
2025
fiscal year 2026 may have on hospitals’ eligibility for Disproportionate Share
Hospital payments.
(d) The Agency of Human Services shall report on the status of the
Vermont Hospital Directed Payment program, the expenditure of excess
receipts, and the status of the program’s potential impacts on Disproportionate
Share Hospital payments at the September and November 2025 meetings of the
Joint Fiscal Committee.
Sec. E.306 NURSING HOMES; SKILLED NURSING FACILITIES;
EXTRAORDINARY FINANCIAL RELIEF
(a) On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of Vermont Health
Access’ Division of Rate Setting shall submit a report to the House Committee
on Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare
containing proactive measures and targeted interventions that may be used to
reduce the use and amount of future extraordinary financial relief for nursing
homes.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Departments of Vermont Health
Access and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall present to the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and to the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare on the
following:
(1) the number and name of all nursing homes in the State, including:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 174 of 277
2025
(A) whether a nursing home is a for-profit or nonprofit organization
and the owner’s contact information;
(B) the payer mix of each nursing home;
(C) the ratio of employees versus contracted traveler positions at each
nursing home and the specific job titles of the contracted traveler positions;
and
(D) the average length of patient stay at each nursing home;
(2) the number of skilled nursing facilities seeking extraordinary
financial relief in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025; and
(3) the number of skilled nursing facilities receiving extraordinary
financial relief in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025, including:
(A) the name of each skilled nursing facility;
(B) whether a skilled nursing facility receiving extraordinary
financial relief is a for-profit or nonprofit organization;
(C) the amount of extraordinary financial relief received by each
skilled nursing facility;
(D) the reason extraordinary financial relief was sought by each
skilled nursing facility; and
(E) the reason extraordinary financial relief was awarded to each
skilled nursing facility.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 175 of 277
2025
Sec. E.306.1 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.306.4 is amended to
read:
Sec. E.306.4 MEDICARE SAVINGS PROGRAMS; INCOME
ELIGIBILITY
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall make the following changes to the
Medicare Savings Programs:
(1) increase the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary Program income
threshold to 145 150 percent of the federal poverty level; and
(2) increase the Qualifying Individual Program income threshold to the
maximum percent of the federal poverty level allowed under federal law based
on the increase to the income threshold for the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary
Program in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Sec. E.306.2 OPEN ENROLLMENT FOR THE VERMONT HEALTH
BENEFIT EXCHANGE
(a) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall maintain open
enrollment for the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange from November 1, 2025
through January 15, 2026. The Department of Vermont Health Access and
registered carriers shall allow a period of one calendar month beyond the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ deadline of December 15, 2025
for 2026 plan selection in order to encourage enrollment and to allow enrollees
to make plan selection changes.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 176 of 277
2025
Sec. E.306.3 33 V.S.A. § 1811 is amended to read:
§ 1811. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS AND SMALL
EMPLOYERS
* * *
(l)(1) A registered carrier shall allow for the enrollment of a pregnant
individual, and of any individual who is eligible for coverage under the terms
of the health benefit plan because of a relationship to the pregnant individual,
at any time after the commencement of the pregnancy. Coverage shall be
effective as of the first of the month following the individual’s selection of a
health benefit plan.
(2) A registered carrier shall allow an individual who is eligible for
advance payments of federal premium tax credits under 26 U.S.C. § 36B and
whose household income for the year is expected to be not greater than 200
percent of the federal poverty level, and any individual who is eligible for
coverage because of a relationship to that individual, to enroll in a health
benefit plan through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange at any time during
the plan year.
Sec. E.306.4 SKILLED NURSING FACILITIES GRANTS; REPORT
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2027 budget presentation, the Department of
Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living shall report to the House and
Senate Committees on Appropriations on the grants to skilled nursing facilities
funded through the appropriation made in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113,
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 177 of 277
2025
Sec. B.1102(b)(11). The Department shall include in its report information on
the following:
(1) facilities to which grants were distributed;
(2) amounts of each grant distributed; and
(3) any available information on direct impacts of grants, including
reduction of reliance on travel nurses and workforce retention and expansion.
(b) As part of its fiscal year 2027 budget presentation, the Department of
Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall, to the extent the information
in subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection is available, report to the House and
Senate Committees on Appropriations on the grants to skilled nursing facilities
funded through the appropriation made in Sec. B.1100(u)(2) of this act. The
Department shall include in its report information on the following:
(1) facilities to which grants were distributed;
(2) amounts of each grant distributed; and
(3) any available information on direct impacts of grants, including
reduction of reliance on travel nurses and workforce retention and expansion.
Sec. E.306.5 TEACHING HEALTH CENTER GRADUATE MEDICAL
EDUCATION PROGRAM; IMPLEMENTATION FUNDING;
LEGISLATIVE INTENT; REPORT
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall seek approval from the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services to obtain federal matching funds for the
first year of implementation of the Maple Mountain Family Medicine
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 178 of 277
2025
Residency Program, a new Teaching Health Center Graduate Medical
Education Program that will increase the number of family medicine residents
practicing in rural regions of Vermont. It is the intent of the General Assembly
to appropriate funds in future fiscal years, with additional federal matching
funds if available, to allow for full implementation of the Program.
(b) If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve the
Agency’s request for federal matching funds pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Agency shall evaluate potential opportunities to obtain federal
matching funds in future fiscal years to provide greater support to the Maple
Mountain Family Medicine Residency Program during its implementation
stage, including matching State dollars as a Global Commitment investment, as
a graduate medical education expenditure, or through another mechanism.
(c) The Agency shall report to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July 2025
meeting on whether the Agency was successful in receiving approval for
federal matching funds pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and, if not, its
findings and recommendations regarding future federal matching fund
opportunities pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. E.307 33 V.S.A. § 1902 is amended to read:
§ 1902. QUALIFICATION FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
* * *
(b) Workers with disabilities whose income is less than 250 percent of the
federal poverty level shall be eligible for Medicaid. The income also must not
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 179 of 277
2025
exceed the Medicaid protected income level for one or the Supplemental
Security Income (SSI) payment level for two, whichever is higher, after
disregarding the earnings of the working individual with disabilities; Social
Security disability insurance benefits, including Social Security retirement
benefits converted automatically from Social Security Disability Insurance
(SSDI), if applicable; any veteran’s disability benefits; and, if the working
individual with disabilities is married, all income of the spouse. Earnings of
the working individual with disabilities shall be documented by evidence of
Federal Insurance Contributions Act tax payments, Self-Employment
Contributions Act tax payments, or a written business plan approved and
supported by a third-party investor or funding source. The Agency of Human
Services shall adopt rules governing documentation of earnings of working
individuals with disabilities. The resource limit for this program shall be
$10,000.00 for an individual and $15,000.00 for a couple at the time of
enrollment in the program. Assets attributable to earnings made after
enrollment in the program shall be disregarded.
Sec. E.307.1 MEDICAID AND EXCHANGE; EMERGENCY
RULEMAKING
(a) The Agency of Human Services may adopt or amend rules regarding
Vermont’s Medicaid program and the operation of the Vermont Health Benefit
Exchange in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as needed to respond to
changes in State and federal law. The Agency may use the emergency rules
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 180 of 277
2025
process pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 844, but only in the event that the new State or
federal law requires Vermont to amend or adopt its rules in a time frame that
cannot be accomplished under the traditional rulemaking process. An
emergency rule adopted under these exigent circumstances shall be deemed
to meet the standard for the adoption of emergency rules required pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 844(a).
Sec. E.311 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 109, Sec. 4 is amended to read:
Sec. 4. SUNSET OF STATE YOUTH COUNCIL
3 V.S.A. § 3097 (State Youth Council) is repealed on February 1, 2026.
[Repealed.]
Sec. E.312 HEALTH; PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) HIV/AIDS funding:
(1) In fiscal year 2026 and as provided in this section, the Department of
Health shall provide grants in the amount of $475,000 in AIDS Medication
Rebates special funds to the Vermont AIDS service and peer-support
organizations for client-based support services. The Department of Health
AIDS Program shall meet at least quarterly with the Community Advisory
Group with current information and data relating to service initiatives. The
funds shall be allocated according to a Request for Proposal process.
(2) In fiscal year 2026, and as provided by this section, the Department
of Health shall provide grants in the amount of $295,000 from the General
Fund for HIV and Harm Reduction Services to the following organizations:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 181 of 277
2025
(A) Vermont CARES: $140,000;
(B) AIDS Project of Southern Vermont: $100,000; and
(C) HIV/HCV Resource Center: $55,000.
(3) Ryan White Title II funds for AIDS services and the Vermont
Medication Assistance Program shall be distributed in accordance with federal
guidelines. The federal guidelines shall not apply to programs or services
funded solely by State General Fund.
(A) The Secretary of Human Services shall immediately notify the
Joint Fiscal Committee if at any time there are insufficient funds in Vermont
Medication Assistance Program to assist all eligible individuals. The Secretary
shall work in collaboration with persons living with HIV/AIDS to develop a
plan to continue access to Vermont Medication Assistance Program
medications until such time as the General Assembly can take action.
(B) As provided in this section, the Secretary of Human Services
shall work in collaboration with the Vermont Medication Assistance Program
Advisory Committee, which shall be composed of not less than 50 percent of
members who are living with HIV/AIDS. If a modification to the program’s
eligibility requirements or benefit coverage is considered, the Committee shall
make recommendations regarding the program’s formulary of approved
medication, related laboratory testing, nutritional supplements, and eligibility
for the program.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 182 of 277
2025
(4) In fiscal year 2026, the Department of Health shall provide grants in
the amount of $400,000 General Fund for HIV and Harm Reduction Services
not later than September 1, 2025. The method by which these prevention
funds are distributed shall be determined by mutual agreement of the
Department of Health and the Vermont AIDS service organizations and other
Vermont HIV/AIDS prevention providers.
(5) In fiscal year 2026, the Department of Health shall not reduce any
grants to the Vermont AIDS service and peer-support organizations or syringe
service programs from funds appropriated for HIV/AIDS services to levels
below those in fiscal year 2025 without receiving prior approval from the Joint
Fiscal Committee.
Sec. E.312.1 3 V.S.A. § 5003 is amended to read:
§ 5003. DUTIES OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF RACIAL EQUITY
(a) The Executive Director of Racial Equity (Director) shall work with the
agencies and departments to implement a program of continuing coordination
and improvement of activities in State government in order to combat systemic
racial disparities and measure progress toward fair and impartial governance,
including:
(1) overseeing a comprehensive organizational review to identify
systemic racism in each of the three branches of State government and
inventory systems in place that engender racial disparities;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 183 of 277
2025
(2) managing and overseeing the statewide collection of race-based data
to determine the nature and scope of racial discrimination within all systems of
State government; and
(3) developing a model fairness and diversity policy and reviewing and
making recommendations regarding the fairness and diversity policies held by
all State government systems; and
(4) temporarily overseeing the establishment of the Health Equity
Advisory Commission established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 252 until the Office
of Health Equity is established.
* * *
Sec. E.312.2 18 V.S.A. § 252 is amended to read:
§ 252. HEALTH EQUITY ADVISORY COMMISSION
* * *
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Commission shall:
(1) provide guidance advice to the Department of Health and the
General Assembly on the continued development of the Office of Health
Equity, which shall be established based on the Advisory Commission’s
recommendations not later than January 1, 2023, including on:
(A) the structure, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Office;
(B) whether the Office shall be independent and, if not, in which
State agency or department it shall be situated;
(C) how the Office shall be staffed;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 184 of 277
2025
(D)(C) the populations served and specific issues addressed by the
Office; and
(E)(D) the duties of the Office, including how grant funds shall be
managed and distributed; and
(F) the time frame and necessary steps to establish the Office;
(2) provide advice and make recommendations to the Office of Health
Equity, Department of Health, and General Assembly once established,
including input on:
(A) any rules or policies proposed by the Office of Health Equity or
Department of Health;
(B) the awarding of grants and the development of programs and
services;
(C) the needs, priorities, programs, and policies relating to the health
of individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals
who are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities; and
(D) any other issue on which the Office of Health Equity,
Department of Health, or General Assembly requests assistance from the
Advisory Commission;
(3) review, monitor, and advise all State agencies regarding the impact
of current and emerging State policies, procedures, practices, laws, and rules
on the health of individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color;
individuals who are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 185 of 277
2025
(4) identify and examine the limitations and problems associated with
existing laws, rules, programs, and services related to the health status of
individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals who
are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities;
(5) advise the Department of Health and the General Assembly on any
funding decisions relating to eliminating health disparities and promoting
health equity, including the distribution of federal monies related to COVID-
19;
(6) to the extent funds are available for the purpose, distribute grants
that stimulate the development of community-based and neighborhood-based
projects that will improve the health outcomes of individuals who are Black,
Indigenous, and Persons of Color; individuals who are LGBTQ; and
individuals with disabilities; and
(7) advise the General Assembly on efforts to improve cultural
competency, cultural humility, and antiracism in the health care system
through training and continuing education requirements for health care
providers and other clinical professionals.
(d) Assistance. The Advisory Commission shall have the administrative,
legal, and technical assistance of the Agency of Administration at the request
of the Executive Director of Racial Equity Department of Health.
* * *
(f) Meetings.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 186 of 277
2025
(1) The Executive Director of Racial Equity or designee shall call the
first meeting of the Advisory Commission to occur on or before September 1,
2021.
(2) The Advisory Commission shall select a chair and vice chair at its
first meeting and annually thereafter.
(3)(2) The Advisory Commission shall adopt procedures to govern its
proceedings, including voting procedures and how the staggered terms shall be
apportioned among members.
(4)(3) All meetings of the Advisory Commission and any
subcommittees of the Advisory Commission shall be open to the public with
opportunities for public comment provided on a regular basis.
* * *
(h) Compensation and reimbursement. Appointed members of the
Advisory Commission shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for meetings
as deemed appropriate by the Advisory Commission within the appropriation
provided. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
Agency of Administration Department of Health.
Sec. E.312.3 18 V.S.A. § 254 is added to read:
§ 254. OFFICE OF HEALTH EQUITY
(a) There is established the Office of Health Equity within the Department
of Health for the purpose of eliminating avoidable and unjust disparities in
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 187 of 277
2025
health among Vermonters. The Office shall use a systemic and comprehensive
approach that addresses those social, economic, and environmental factors that
influence health outcomes.
(b) The Office of Health Equity shall be managed by an Executive
Director, an individual who shall be qualified by reason of education,
expertise, and experience and who may have a professional degree in public
health, social or environmental justice, or a related field. The Executive
Director shall report to the Commissioner of Health, serve on a full-time basis,
and be exempt from classified service.
Sec. E.312.4 SMOKING CESSATION GRANT REQUIREMENTS;
REPORT
(a) Prior to providing the grant to the Vermont Parent Child Center
Network from the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.1100(g)(6) of this act,
the Department of Health shall require that information on the use of the funds
be provided by grantees in an agreed-upon time frame, including the specific
activities supported by the funds, a description of the number of individuals
served, and information on the anticipated outcomes of this investment. On or
before January 15, 2026, the Department shall provide the House and Senate
Committees on Appropriations, the House Committees on Health Care and on
Human Services, and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare with this
information and information on the outcomes achieved by previous
investments, including the number of pregnant smokers who quit smoking as a
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 188 of 277
2025
result of cessation initiatives and the number of families who reported reducing
tobacco usage and secondhand smoke around infants and children. Previous
investments made for cessation initiatives include those made in 2022 Acts and
Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.110(a)(1) and 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
B.1100(n)(4).
Sec. E.313 18 V.S.A. § 4812 is added to read:
§ 4812. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund is established and
managed by the Vermont Department of Health in accordance with 32 V.S.A.
chapter 7, subchapter 5.
(b) Thirty percent of the revenues raised by the cannabis excise tax
imposed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 7902, not to exceed $10,000,000.00 per fiscal
year, shall be deposited into this fund for substance misuse prevention costs.
(c) Any unencumbered and unexpended spending authority reverted in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 703 may be immediately re-established the
following fiscal year in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 511.
(d) Notwithstanding any provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 to
the contrary, all interest earned by this fund shall be retained by this fund.
Sec. E.313.1 SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION FUNDING; REPEAL
(a) 32 V.S.A. § 7909 (substance misuse prevention funding) is repealed.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 189 of 277
2025
Sec. E.313.2 PREVENTION EXPENDITURES; REPORT
(a) On or before January 15, 2026, the Department of Health shall, in
consultation with other departments of the Agency of Human Services, provide
a report to the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and
to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare with information on total or
estimated expenditures made by the State on substance use prevention efforts
in fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026.
(1) The report shall include information on the following:
(A) all State and federal funds, including special funds, and monies
that have been appropriated or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts;
(B) the total amounts appropriated from the funds specified in
subdivision (1)(A) of this section or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts;
(C) the recipients of appropriations made from the funds specified in
subdivision (1)(A) of this section or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts or the beneficiaries of grants or subgrants and how these
monies have been used by expenditure category;
(D) the amount of monies appropriated from the funds specified in
subdivision (1)(A) of this section or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts that have been obligated;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 190 of 277
2025
(E) the amount of monies appropriated from the funds specified in
subdivision (1)(A) of this section or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts that remain unencumbered or unexpended; and
(F) the extent to which monies appropriated from the funds specified
in subdivision (1)(A) of this section or otherwise designated for substance use
prevention efforts are subject to reversion or any federal obligation deadlines.
Sec. E.313.3 REPEAL
(a) 2022 Acts and Resolves No.185, Sec. E.240.6 is repealed.
Sec. E.316 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.316 is amended to read:
Sec. E.316 STAKEHOLDER WORKING GROUP; FACILITY
PLANNING FOR JUSTICE-INVOLVED YOUTH
(a) The Department for Children and Families, in consultation with the
Department of Buildings and General Services, shall assemble a stakeholder
working group to provide regular input on the planning, design, development,
and implementation of the temporary stabilization facility for youth and on the
development of a long-term plan for the high-end system of care.
* * *
(f) The stakeholder working group shall cease to exist on June 30, 2025
2027.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 191 of 277
2025
Sec. E.316.1 33 V.S.A. § 125 is added to read:
§ 125. BUDGETARY INFLATION; DIRECT SERVICE PROVIDERS
Annually, as part of its budget presentation, the Department shall inform the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare the cost of adding a
one percent increase over the previous fiscal year’s funding for community-
contracted direct service providers.
Sec. E.316.2 SUPERVISED VISITATION PROGRAMS; REPORT
(a) On or before January 15, 2026, the Commissioner for Children and
Families and the Chief Superior Judge shall jointly submit a report to the
House Committees on Human Services and on Judiciary and the Senate
Committees on Health and Welfare and on Judiciary containing a proposal for
funding supervised visitation programs. The proposal shall address and
recommend sustainable funding for statewide coordination, equitable funding
among supervised visitation locations, and access for residents of counties that
do not currently provide supervised visitation services. The Commissioner and
Chief Superior Judge shall consult the Center for Crime Victim Services, the
Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence, and supervised
visitation providers in the preparation of the report.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 192 of 277
2025
Sec. E.317 33 V.S.A. § 4922 is amended to read:
§ 4922. RULEMAKING
(a) On or before September 1, 2025 April 1, 2026, the Commissioner shall
file proposed rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 implementing the
provisions of this subchapter to become effective on April September 1, 2026.
These shall include:
(1) rules setting forth criteria for determining whether to conduct an
assessment or an investigation;
(2) rules setting out procedures for assessment and service delivery;
(3) rules outlining procedures for investigations;
(4) rules for conducting the administrative review conference;
(5) rules regarding access to and maintenance of Department records of
investigations, assessments, reviews, and responses;
(6) rules regarding the tiered Registry as required by section 4916 of this
title;
(7) rules requiring notice and appeal procedures for alternatives to
substantiation; and
(8) rules implementing subsections 4916(c) and (e) of this title.
(b) The rules shall strike an appropriate balance between protecting
children and respecting the rights of a parent or guardian, including a parent or
guardian with disabilities, and shall recognize that persons with a disability can
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 193 of 277
2025
be successful parents. The rules shall include the possible use of adaptive
equipment and supports.
(c) These rules shall be adopted no later than July 1, 2009.
Sec. E.318 33 V.S.A. § 3505 is amended to read:
§ 3505. SUPPLEMENTAL CHILD CARE GRANTS
(a)(1)(A) The Commissioner for Children and Families may reserve utilize
up to one-half of one percent of the child care family assistance program funds
appropriated for the Child Care Financial Assistance Program in a fiscal year
for extraordinary financial relief to assist child care programs that are at risk of
closing or not opening due to experiencing financial hardship. The
Commissioner may provide extraordinary financial relief under this
subdivision (A) to both licensed and registered child care programs and to
child care programs that are in the process of becoming licensed or registered.
The Commissioner shall develop guidelines for providing assistance and shall
prioritize extraordinary financial relief to child care programs in areas of the
State with high poverty and low access to high quality child care.
(B) If the Commissioner determines a child care program is at risk of
closure because its operations are not fiscally sustainable, he or she may
provide assistance to In order to transition children who are currently served by
the a child care operator program that is closing to a new child care program in
an orderly fashion and to help secure other child care opportunities for children
served by the program in an effort to minimize the disruption of services, the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 194 of 277
2025
Commissioner may provide assistance to the existing or new program to
minimize the disruption of services to the affected children.
(C) The As needed to implement this subdivision (1), the
Commissioner has the authority to request tax returns and other financial
documents to verify the a child care program’s financial hardship and its
ability to sustain or increase operations.
* * *
Sec. E.318.1 CHILD CARE FUNDING; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the fiscal year 2026
reduction of the General Fund appropriation to the Department for Children
and Families for the Child Care Financial Assistance Program in Sec. B.318 of
this act shall not occur in future fiscal years and that, in future fiscal years, the
appropriation from the General Fund to the Department for Children and
Families for the Child Care Financial Assistance Program shall be not less than
the appropriation from the General Fund to the Department for Children and
Families for the Child Care Financial Assistance Program in 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 113 as passed by the General Assembly.
Sec. E.321 GENERAL ASSISTANCE EMERGENCY HOUSING
(a) To the extent emergency housing is available and within the funds
appropriated, the Commissioner for Children and Families shall ensure that
General Assistance Emergency Housing is provided in fiscal year 2026 to
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 195 of 277
2025
households that attest to lack of a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence and have a member who:
(1) is 65 years of age or older;
(2) has a disability that can be documented by:
(A) receipt of Supplemental Security Income or Social Security
Disability Insurance; or
(B) a form developed by the Department as a means of documenting
a qualifying disability or health condition that requires:
(i) the applicant’s name, date of birth, and the last four digits of
the applicant’s Social Security number or other identifying number;
(ii) a description of the applicant’s disability or health condition;
(iii) a description of the risk posed to the applicant’s health, safety,
or welfare if temporary emergency housing is not authorized pursuant to this
section; and
(iv) a certification of a health care provider, as defined in 18
V.S.A. § 9481, that includes the provider’s credentials, credential number,
address, and phone number;
(3) is a child 19 years of age or under;
(4) is pregnant;
(5) has experienced the death of a spouse, domestic partner, or minor
child that caused the household to lose its housing;
(6) has experienced a natural disaster, such as a flood, fire, or hurricane;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 196 of 277
2025
(7) is under a court-ordered eviction or constructive eviction due to
circumstances over which the household has no control; or
(8) is experiencing domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault,
stalking, human trafficking, hate violence, or other dangerous or life-
threatening conditions that relate to violence against the individual or a
household member that caused the household to lose its housing.
(b)(1) General Assistance Emergency Housing shall be provided in a
community-based shelter whenever possible. If there is inadequate
community-based shelter space available within the Agency of Human
Services district in which the household presents itself, the household shall be
provided emergency housing in a hotel or motel within the district, if available,
until adequate community-based shelter space becomes available in the
district. The utilization of hotel and motel rooms pursuant to this subdivision
shall be capped at 1,100 rooms per night between July 1, 2025 through
November 30, 2025 and between April 1, 2026 through June 30, 2026.
(2) The maximum number of days that an eligible household receives
emergency housing in a hotel or motel under this section, per 12-month period,
shall not exceed 80 days.
(3) The Department shall provide emergency winter housing to
households meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (a) of this section
between December 1, 2025 and March 31, 2026. Emergency housing in a
hotel or motel provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not count toward the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 197 of 277
2025
maximum days of eligibility per 12-month period provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection.
(4)(A) Notwithstanding any rule or law to the contrary, the Department
shall require all households applying for or receiving General Assistance
Emergency Housing to engage in their own search for and accept any available
alternative housing placements. All applicants and eligible households shall
regularly provide information to the Department, not less frequently than
monthly, about their efforts to secure an alternative housing placement. If the
Department determines that a household, at the time of application or during
the term of the household’s authorization, has not made efforts to secure an
alternative housing placement, or has access to an alternative housing
placement, the Department shall deny the application or terminate the
authorization at the end of the current authorization period.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision (4), “alternative housing
placements” may include shelter beds and pods; placements with family or
friends; permanent housing solutions, including tiny homes, manufactured
homes, and apartments; residential treatment beds for physical health, long-
term care, substance use, or mental health; nursing home beds; and recovery
homes.
(c) Emergency housing provided pursuant to this section shall replace the
catastrophic and noncatastrophic categories previously adopted by the
Department in rule.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 198 of 277
2025
(d) Emergency housing required pursuant to this section may be provided
through approved community-based shelters, new unit generation, open units,
licensed hotels or motels, or other appropriate shelter space. The Department
shall, when available, prioritize emergency housing at housing or shelter
placements other than hotels or motels.
(e) Case management services provided by case managers employed by or
under contract with the Agency of Human Services or reimbursed through an
Agency-funded grant shall include assisting clients with finding appropriate
housing.
(f) The Commissioner for Children and Families shall apply the General
Assistance Emergency Housing rules approved by the Legislative Committee
on Administrative Rules on March 13, 2025 for the administration of this
section.
(g) On or before the last day of each month from July 2025 through June
2026, the Department for Children and Families, or other relevant agency or
department, shall continue submitting a similar report to that due pursuant to
2023 Acts and Resolves No. 81, Sec. 6(b) to the Joint Fiscal Committee,
House Committee on Human Services, and Senate Committee on Health and
Welfare. Additionally, this report shall include the Department’s monthly
expenditure on General Assistance Emergency Housing.
(h) For emergency housing provided in a hotel or motel beginning on July
1, 2024 and thereafter, the Department for Children and Families shall not pay
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 199 of 277
2025
a hotel or motel establishment more than the hotel’s lowest advertised room
rate and not more than $80 a day per room to shelter a household experiencing
homelessness. The Department for Children and Families may shelter a
household in more than one hotel or motel room depending on the household’s
size and composition.
(i) The Department for Children and Families shall apply the following
rules to participating hotels and motels:
(1) Section 2650.1 of the Department for Children and Families’
General Assistance (CVR 13-170-260);
(2) Department of Health, Licensed Lodging Establishment Rule (CVR
13-140-023); and
(3) Department of Public Safety, Vermont Fire and Building Safety
Code (CVR 28-070-001).
(j)(1) The Department for Children and Families may work with either a
shelter provider or a community housing agency to enter into a full or partial
facility lease or sales agreement with a hotel or motel provider. Any facility
conversion under this section shall comply with the Office of Economic
Opportunity’s shelter standards.
(2) If the Department for Children and Families determines that a
contractual agreement with a licensed hotel or motel operator to secure
temporary emergency housing capacity is beneficial to improve the quality,
cleanliness, or access to services for those households temporarily housed in
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 200 of 277
2025
the facility, the Department shall be authorized to enter into such an agreement
in accordance with the per-room rate identified in subsection (h) of this
section; provided, however, that in no event shall such an agreement cause a
household to become unhoused. The Department for Children and Families
may include provisions to address access to services or related needs within the
contractual agreement.
(k) Of the amount appropriated to implement this section, not more than
$500,000 shall be used for security costs.
(l) As used in this section:
(1) “Community-based shelter” means a shelter that meets the Vermont
Housing Opportunity Grant Program’s Standards of Provision of Assistance.
(2) “Household” means an individual and any dependents for whom the
individual is legally responsible and who live in Vermont. “Household”
includes individuals who reside together as one economic unit, including those
who are married, parties to a civil union, or unmarried.
Sec. E.321.1 CONTRACTING FOR EMERGENCY SHELTER
OPERATIONS AND SERVICES
(a) In contracting with emergency shelter organizations for operations and
services, the Department for Children and Families shall prioritize contracts
with organizations that are in close proximity to the community served to
ensure that an organization familiar with the specific needs of a community
serve its population of unhoused residents.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 201 of 277
2025
Sec. E.324 EXPEDITED CRISIS FUEL ASSISTANCE
(a) The Commissioner for Children and Families or designee may authorize
crisis fuel assistance to those income-eligible households that have applied for
an expedited seasonal fuel benefit but have not yet received it if the benefit
cannot be executed in time to prevent them from running out of fuel. The
crisis fuel grants authorized pursuant to this section count toward the crisis fuel
grants allowed per household for the winter heating season pursuant to
33 V.S.A. § 2609(b).
Sec. E.325 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES; OFFICE
OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.325 of this act,
$29,343,655 shall be used by the Department for Children and Families’ Office
of Economic Opportunity to issue grants to community agencies to assist
individuals experiencing homelessness by preserving existing services,
increasing services, or increasing resources available statewide. These funds
may be granted alone or in conjunction with federal Emergency Solutions
Grants funds. Grant decisions and the administration of funds shall be done in
consultation with the two U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development-recognized continuum of care programs.
Sec. E.326 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES; OFFICE
OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY; WEATHERIZATION
ASSISTANCE
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 202 of 277
2025
(a) Of the special fund appropriation in Sec. B.326 of this act, $750,000 is
for the replacement and repair of home heating equipment.
Sec. E.329 33 V.S.A. § 506 is added to read:
§ 506. BUDGETARY INFLATION; DIRECT SERVICE PROVIDERS
Annually, as part of its budget presentation, the Department shall inform the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare the cost of adding a
one percent increase over the previous fiscal year’s funding for community-
contracted direct service providers.
Sec. E.333 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES, AGING, AND
INDEPENDENT LIVING; DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES
PAYMENT REFORM
(a)(1) The Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall
submit a written progress report to the Joint Fiscal Committee in advance of
the Committee’s July 2025 meeting regarding the Department’s design of a
developmental services payment reform model for potential implementation on
October 1, 2025, with a final written report to the Joint Fiscal Committee in
advance of the Committee’s September 2025 meeting. The final report shall
explain the methodology and identify how the model:
(A) meets all federal conflict-free case management requirements and
aligns funding mechanisms with assessed needs; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 203 of 277
2025
(B) ensures standardized rates for providers that are reasonable and
adequate and reflect the cost of service delivery to achieve the required
outcomes for the populations served.
(2) The final report required pursuant to this subsection shall include a
summary of stakeholder input, including perspectives from providers and
individuals served, the identification of any unresolved issues, including the
impact on designated agency and specialized service agency staff and the
financial status of the providers, and a plan for addressing those unresolved
issues in the final payment model.
(b) On or before February 15, 2026, the Department shall provide a
presentation update to the House Committees on Appropriations and on
Human Services and to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on
Health and Welfare regarding its progress implementing the developmental
services payment reform model.
Sec. E.338 CORRECTIONS; CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3709(a), the special fund appropriation of
$152,000 for the supplemental facility payments to Newport and Springfield
shall be paid from the PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. E.338.1 JUSTICE REINVESTMENT II; ALLOCATION OF FUNDS
(a) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.338.1 of this act, $390,000 shall be for a
grant to Lund for the Kids-A-Part Program and $100,000 shall be for a grant to
Pathways Vermont for the Forensic Assertive Community Treatment Team.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 204 of 277
2025
Sec. E.338.2 CORRECTIONS; TREATMENT-FOCUSED FACILITY
(a) The $200,000 General Fund appropriated to the Department of
Corrections in Sec. B.1100(i)(1) of this act shall be used to retain a consultant
and develop an implementation plan to transition the Northeast Correctional
Complex or the Caledonia County Work Camp, or parts of either or of both, to
a treatment-focused facility for incarcerated Vermonters.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department of Corrections shall
submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee
concerning the consultant’s findings and recommendations related to
transitioning either the Northeast Correctional Complex or the Work Camp, or
parts of either or of both, to a treatment-focused facility. The report shall
contain the following:
(1) a detailed transition plan;
(2) expected outcomes and measures of success;
(3) an assessment of how transitioning either the Northeast Correctional
Complex or Caledonia County Work Camp, or parts of either or of both, to a
treatment-focused facility aligns with best practices for residential treatment
programs; and
(4) input from the Department’s current medical providers, including an
analysis of how the program developed would impact any contract with the
Department’s third-party medical provider.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 205 of 277
2025
Sec. E.345 18 V.S.A. § 9374(h) is amended to read:
(h)(1)(A) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (1)(C) and (2) of
this subsection (h), the expenses of the Board shall be borne as follows:
(i) 40.0 percent by the State from State monies;
(ii) 28.8 36.0 percent by the hospitals;
(iii) 23.2 24.0 percent by nonprofit hospital and medical service
corporations licensed under 8 V.S.A. chapter 123 or 125, health insurance
companies licensed under 8 V.S.A. chapter 101, and health maintenance
organizations licensed under 8 V.S.A. chapter 139; and
(iv) 8.0 percent by accountable care organizations.
(B) Expenses under subdivision (A)(iii) of this subdivision (1) shall
be allocated to persons licensed under Title 8 based on premiums paid for
health care coverage, which for the purposes of this subdivision (1) shall
include major medical, comprehensive medical, hospital or surgical coverage,
and comprehensive health care services plans, but shall not include long-term
care, limited benefits, disability, credit or stop loss, or excess loss insurance
coverage.
(C) Expenses Amounts assessed pursuant to the provisions of section
sections 9441 and 9382 of this title shall not be assessed in accordance with the
formula set forth in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1).
(2) The Board may determine the scope of the incurred expenses to be
allocated pursuant to the formula set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 206 of 277
2025
if, in the Board’s discretion, the expenses to be allocated are in the best
interests of the regulated entities and of the State.
(3) If the amount of the proportional assessment to any entity calculated
in accordance with the formula set forth in subdivision (1)(A) of this
subsection would be less than $150.00, the Board shall assess the entity a
minimum fee of $150.00. The Board shall apply the amounts collected based
on the difference between each applicable entity’s proportional assessment
amount and $150.00 to reduce the total amount assessed to the regulated
entities pursuant to subdivisions (1)(A)(ii)–(iv)(iii) of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. E.500 EDUCATION; FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
(a) The Global Commitment appropriation in Sec. B.500 of this act shall be
used for physician claims for determining medical necessity of Individualized
Education Programs. These services are intended to increase access to quality
health care for uninsured persons, underinsured persons, and Medicaid
beneficiaries.
Sec. E.502 EDUCATION; SPECIAL EDUCATION: FORMULA GRANTS
(a) Of the appropriation authorized in Sec. B.502 of this act, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount not to exceed
$5,236,200 shall be used by the Agency of Education in fiscal year 2026 as
funding for 16 V.S.A. § 2967(b)(2)-(6). In distributing such funds, the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 207 of 277
2025
Secretary shall not be limited by the restrictions contained within 16 V.S.A.
§ 2969(c) and (d).
(b) Of the appropriation authorized in Sec. B.502 of this act, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount not to exceed
$2,000,000 shall be used by the Agency of Education in fiscal year 2026 as
funding for 16 V.S.A. § 2975. In distributing such funds, the Secretary shall
not be limited by the restrictions contained within 16 V.S.A. § 2969(c) and (d).
Sec. E.503 EDUCATION; STATE-PLACED STUDENTS
(a) The Independence Place Program of ANEW Place shall be considered a
24-hour residential program for the purposes of reimbursement of education
costs.
Sec. E.504 ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY
(a) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.504 of this act, $3,958,344 General Fund
shall be granted to adult education and literacy providers, pursuant to the Adult
Education and Secondary Credential Program established in 16 V.S.A. § 945.
Sec. E.504.1 EDUCATION; FLEXIBLE PATHWAYS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, of the Education Fund appropriation
in Sec. B.504.1 of this act, the amount of:
(1) $921,500 is available for dual enrollment programs notwithstanding
16 V.S.A. § 944(f)(2);
(2) $2,400,000 is available to support the Vermont Virtual High School;
(3) $400,000 is available for secondary school reform grants;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 208 of 277
2025
(4) $4,200,000 is available for Early College pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 947(b); and
(5) $2,638,896 is available for the Adult Education and Secondary
Credential Program.
(b) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.504 of this act, $921,500 from the
General Fund is available for dual enrollment programs.
Sec. E.504.2 16 V.S.A. § 4011(f) is amended to read:
(f) Annually, the Secretary shall pay to a local adult education and literacy
provider, as defined in section 942 of this title, that provides an adult education
and secondary credential program an amount equal to 26 percent of the base
education amount for each student who completes the diagnostic portions of
the adult education and secondary credential program, based on an average of
the previous two completed fiscal years; 40. Forty percent of the payment
required under this subsection shall be from State funds appropriated from the
Education Fund and 60 percent of the payment required under this subsection
shall be from State funds appropriated from the General Fund.
Sec. E.504.3 ADULT EDUCATION; FUNDING; REPORT
(a) On or before December 1, 2025, the Agency of Administration, the
Agency of Education, and local adult education and literacy providers shall
jointly submit a written report to the House Committee on Commerce and
Economic Development; the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs; and the House and Senate Committees on
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 209 of 277
2025
Education and on Appropriations with recommendations to modernize adult
education funding to ensure funds are equitably distributed across all regions
of the State, including recommendations for updates to the statutes and rules
that govern the adult education funding formula. The Agency of
Administration shall call and facilitate not fewer than five meetings with the
Agency of Education and local adult education and literacy providers to
develop the recommendations in the report.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary of Administration shall
submit a written report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development; the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and
General Affairs; and the House and Senate Committees on Education and on
Appropriations with recommendations for any administrative changes to adult
education, including which agency or department outside the Agency of
Education is best suited to manage adult education grants. The report shall
also include any additional recommendations from the Secretary of
Administration regarding updates to the adult education funding formula
should the Secretary have recommendations that differ from the
recommendations contained in the report submitted pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section.
(c) For fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4011(f), the Agency
of Education shall award the funds appropriated for the Adult Education and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 210 of 277
2025
Secondary Credential Program in Secs. B.504 and B.504.1 of this act as
follows:
(1) $3,984,607 to Vermont Adult Learning;
(2) $1,320,874 to Central Vermont Adult Education;
(3) $400,919 to The Tutorial Center; and
(4) $890,840 to Northeast Kingdom Learning Services.
Sec. E.507.1 ENGLISH LEARNER; CATEGORICAL AID
(a) The funds appropriated in Sec. B.507.1 of this act shall be used to
provide categorical aid to school districts for English Learner services,
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 4013.
Sec. E.511 EDUCATION; TECHNICAL EDUCATION
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. 1561(c) and (d) or any other provision of
law to the contrary, in fiscal year 2026 career technical center supplemental
assistance grants shall be calculated using the fiscal year 2025 base education
amount.
Sec. E.514 STATE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944(g)(2), the annual contribution to
the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System shall be $212,752,627, of
which $199,377,627 shall be the State’s contribution and $13,375,000 shall be
contributed from local school systems or educational entities pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 1944c.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 211 of 277
2025
(b) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944(c)(2), of the annual contribution,
$41,414,649 is the “normal contribution” and $171,337,978 is the “accrued
liability contribution.”
Sec. E.514.1 VERMONT STATE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION;
OPERATING BUDGET; SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $3,864,405 appropriated in Sec. B.514.1 of this act, $2,719,271
constitutes the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System operating budget,
and $1,145,134 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement
System.
Sec. E.515 RETIRED TEACHERS’ HEALTH CARE AND MEDICAL
BENEFITS
(a) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944b(b)(2) and 16 V.S.A.
§ 1944b(h)(1), the annual contribution to the Retired Teachers’ Health and
Medical Benefits plan shall be $79,952,589, of which $71,052,589 shall be the
State’s contribution and $8,900,000 shall be from the annual charge for teacher
health care contributed by employers pursuant to 16 V.S.A. §1944d. Of the
annual contribution, $24,712,382 is the “normal contribution” and $55,240,207
is the “accrued liability contribution.”
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 212 of 277
2025
Sec. E.600 UNIVERSITY OF VERMONT
(a) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants to
pay 1/12 of the appropriation in Sec. B.600 of this act to the University of
Vermont on or about the 15th day of each calendar month of the year.
(b) Of this appropriation, $380,362 shall be transferred to the Experimental
Program to Stimulate Competitive Research to comply with State matching
fund requirements necessary for the receipt of available federal or private
funds, or both.
Sec. E.602 VERMONT STATE COLLEGES
(a) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants to
pay 1/12 of the appropriation in Sec. B.602 of this act to the Vermont State
Colleges on or about the 15th day of each calendar month of the year.
(b) Of this appropriation, $427,898 shall be transferred to the Vermont
Manufacturing Extension Center to comply with State matching fund
requirements necessary for the receipt of available federal or private funds, or
both.
Sec. E.602.1 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. E.602.2, as amended by
2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 67, 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185,
Sec. C.101, and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113 Sec. E.602.1, is further
amended to read:
Sec. E.602.2 VERMONT STATE COLLEGES
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 213 of 277
2025
(a) The Vermont State College (VSC) system shall transform itself into a
fully integrated system that achieves financial stability in a responsible and
sustainable way in order to meet each of these strategic priorities:
* * *
(b) VSC shall meet the following requirements during the transformation of
its system required under subsection (a) of this section and shall accommodate
the oversight of the General Assembly in so doing.
(1) VSC shall reduce its structural deficit by $5,000,000.00 per year for
three years and by $3,500,000.00 per year for the following two years year
through a combination of annual operating expense reductions and increased
enrollment revenues, for a total $22,000,000.00 $18,500,000.00 by the end of
fiscal year 2026. These reductions shall be structural in nature and shall not be
met by use of one-time funds. The VSC Board of Trustees, through the
Chancellor or designee, shall report the results of these structural reductions to
the House and Senate Committees on Education and on Appropriations
annually during the Chancellor’s budget presentation.
* * *
Sec. E.603 VERMONT STATE COLLEGES; ALLIED HEALTH
(a) If Global Commitment Fund monies are unavailable, the total grant
funding for the Vermont State Colleges shall be maintained through the
General Fund or other State funding sources.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 214 of 277
2025
(b) The Vermont State Colleges shall use the Global Commitment
appropriation in Sec. B.603 of this act to support the dental hygiene,
respiratory therapy, and nursing programs that graduate approximately 315
health care providers annually. These graduates deliver direct, high-quality
health care services to Medicaid beneficiaries or uninsured or underinsured
persons.
Sec. E.605 VERMONT STUDENT ASSISTANCE CORPORATION
(a) Of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act:
(1) $25,000 shall be deposited into the Trust Fund established in 16
V.S.A. § 2845;
(2) not more than $300,000 may be used by the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation for a student aspirational initiative to serve one or more
high schools; and
(3) not less than $1,000,000 shall be used to continue the Vermont
Trades Scholarship Program established in 2022 Act and Resolves No. 183,
Sec. 14.
(b) Of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act that remain after accounting for the
expenditures set forth in subsection (a) of this section, not less than 93 percent
shall be used for direct student aid.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 215 of 277
2025
(c) After accounting for the expenditures set forth in subsection (a) of this
section, up to seven percent of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act or otherwise currently or
previously appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation or
provided to the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation by an agency or
department of the State for the administration of a program or initiative may be
used by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation for its costs of
administration. The Vermont Student Assistance Corporation may recoup its
reasonable costs of collecting the forgivable loans in repayment. Funds shall
not be used for indirect costs. To the extent that any of these funds are federal
funds, allocation for expenses associated with administering the funds shall be
consistent with federal grant requirements.
Sec. E.605.1 NEED-BASED STIPEND FOR DUAL ENROLLMENT AND
EARLY COLLEGE STUDENTS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, the $41,225 Education Fund and
$41,225 General Fund appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605.1 of this act is for dual enrollment and need-based
stipend purposes to fund a flat-rate, need-based stipend or voucher program for
financially disadvantaged students enrolled in a dual enrollment course
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 944 or in early college pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 946 to
be used for the purchase of books, cost of transportation, and payment of fees.
The Vermont Student Assistance Corporation shall establish the criteria for
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 216 of 277
2025
program eligibility. Funds shall be granted to eligible students on a first-come,
first-served basis until funds are depleted.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation shall report on the program to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Commerce and Economic Development and to the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs.
Sec. E.715 REPEALS; SUNSET OF PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
CLEAN WATER SURCHARGE
(a) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.10 (sunset of clean water
surcharge), as amended by 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, is repealed.
(b) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.11(a)(5) (effective date of sunset
of clean water surcharge) is repealed.
Sec. E.715.1 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.1(b) is amended to read:
(b) Purpose and intent.
(1) The purpose of Secs. I.1–I.12 of this act is to promote the
development and improvement of housing for Vermonters.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly:
(A) to extend the clean water surcharge to provide an interim a
source of revenue for addressing water quality issues throughout the State; and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 217 of 277
2025
(B) to continue its work on identifying a long-term funding source or
sources that are sufficient in scope and targeted in design to address these
water quality issues; and
(C) once one or more long-term funding sources are identified and
enacted, but not later than July 1, 2027, to reduce the amount of the clean
water surcharge to 0.04 percent.
Sec. E.715.2 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.12 is amended to read:
Sec. I.12. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. I.1–I.12 shall take effect on July 1, 2017, except that Sec. I.10
(allocating clean water surcharge revenue to Vermont Housing and
Conservation Trust Fund) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
Sec. E.715.3 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.7(d) is amended to read:
(d) To compensate for this reduction of available property transfer tax
revenue, it is the intent of the General Assembly through this act to provide for
the transfer of $2,500,000.00 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
Fund, as follows:
(1) Sec. D.100 of this act appropriates $11,304,840.00 in fiscal year
2018 from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board. Upon the effective date of this act,
$1,500,000.00 shall revert to the Fund, resulting in a fiscal year 2018 total
appropriation to the Board of $9,804,840.00. In fiscal year 2018 only, the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 218 of 277
2025
amount of $1,500,000.00 from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(2) As provided in Sec. I.9 of this act, from July 1, 2017 until
July 1, 2027, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9602a, the first $1,000,000.00 in revenue
generated by the clean water surcharge of 0.2 0.22 percent shall be transferred
to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund. In fiscal year 2018
only, the Commissioner shall transfer the amount of $1,000,000.00 from the
Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund to the General Fund.
(3) After July 1, 2027, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9602a as amended in
Sec. I.10 of this act, $1,000,000.00 in total revenue generated by the clean
water surcharge of 0.04 percent shall be transferred to the Vermont Housing
and Conservation Trust Fund. [Repealed.]
(4) As provided in Sec. I.11 of this act, the clean water surcharge will be
repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2039. [Repealed.]
Sec. E.900 19 V.S.A. § 11a is amended to read:
§ 11a. TRANSPORTATION FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY FUND APPROPRIATIONS
(a) No transportation funds shall be appropriated for the support of
government other than for the Agency, the Board, Transportation Pay Act
Funds, construction of transportation capital facilities, transportation debt
service, and the operation of information centers by the Department of
Buildings and General Services, and the Department of Public Safety. The
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 219 of 277
2025
amount of transportation funds appropriated to the Department of Public
Safety shall not exceed:
(1) $25,250,000.00 in fiscal year 2014;
(2) $22,750,000.00 in fiscal years 2015 and 2016;
(3) $21,150,000.00 in fiscal year 2017; and
(4) $20,250,000.00 in fiscal year 2018 and in succeeding fiscal years.
(b) In fiscal year 2018 and in succeeding fiscal years, of the funds
appropriated to the Department of Public Safety pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section, the amount of $2,100,000.00 is allocated exclusively for the
purchase, outfitting, assignment, and disposal of State Police vehicles. Any
unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in this allocation at the close
of a fiscal year shall revert to the Transportation Fund. The Department of
Public Safety may periodically recommend to the General Assembly that this
allocation be adjusted to reflect market conditions for the vehicles and
equipment.
Sec. E.917 TOWN HIGHWAY NON-FEDERAL DISASTERS; PILOT
FUND
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3709(a), the amount of $1,150,000 is
appropriated in fiscal year 2026 from the PILOT Special Fund established
pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 3709 to the Agency of Transportation for the Town
Highway Non-Federal Disasters Program.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 220 of 277
2025
(b) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section shall only be spent
for the purpose of providing grants in relation to non-federal disasters pursuant
to the provisions of 19 V.S.A. § 306(d). Any amounts appropriated pursuant
to this section that remain unused at the close of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to
the PILOT Special Fund established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
* * * Fiscal Year 2025 Adjustments, Appropriations, and Amendments * * *
Sec. F.100 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.105 is amended to read:
Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services - communications and information
technology
Personal services 82,994,362 82,994,362
Operating expenses 62,547,212 61,761,212
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Source of funds
General fund 209,808 209,808
Special funds 511,723 511,723
Internal service funds 144,820,043 144,034,043
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Sec. F.101 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.145 is amended to read:
Sec. B.145 Total general government
Source of funds
General fund 117,405,610 117,405,610
Transportation fund 4,292,149 4,292,149
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 221 of 277
2025
Special funds 31,882,209 31,882,209
Federal funds 1,467,374 1,467,374
Internal service funds 214,635,950 213,849,950
Interdepartmental transfers 7,053,789 7,053,789
Enterprise funds 4,298 4,298
Pension trust funds 4,800,305 4,800,305
Private purpose trust funds 1,329,205 1,329,205
Total 382,870,889 382,084,889
Sec. F.102 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.204 is amended to read:
Sec. B.204 Judiciary
Personal services 58,439,095 58,827,799
Operating expenses 12,479,384 14,640,960
Grants 121,030 121,030
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
Source of funds
General fund 63,414,698 65,964,978
Special funds 4,503,401 4,503,401
Federal funds 953,928 953,928
Interdepartmental transfers 2,167,482 2,167,482
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 222 of 277
2025
Sec. F.103 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.205 is amended to read:
Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
Personal services 17,309,679 17,548,979
Operating expenses 2,034,016 2,202,516
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Source of funds
General fund 18,734,634 19,142,434
Federal funds 31,000 31,000
Interdepartmental transfers 578,061 578,061
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Sec. F.104 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.206.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.206.1 Crime Victims Advocates
Personal services 3,016,156 3,016,156
Operating expenses 104,396 142,396
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Source of funds
General fund 3,120,552 3,158,552
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Sec. F.105 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.208 is amended to read:
Sec. B.208 Public safety - administration
Personal services 4,620,756 5,397,783
Operating expenses 6,022,923 6,022,923
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 223 of 277
2025
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Source of funds
General fund 6,179,193 8,092,770
Special funds 4,105 4,105
Federal funds 396,362 396,362
Interdepartmental transfers 4,064,019 2,927,469
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Sec. F.106 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.210 is amended to read:
Sec. B.210 Public safety - criminal justice services
Personal services 5,387,100 4,705,897
Operating expenses 2,152,467 2,152,467
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Source of funds
General fund 1,829,099 2,172,295
Special funds 4,975,847 3,951,448
Federal funds 734,621 734,621
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Sec. F.107 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.236 is amended to read:
Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
Personal services 927,697 952,559
Operating expenses 115,103 125,378
Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 224 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 953,800 988,937
Federal funds 89,000 89,000
Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
Sec. F.108 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.241 is amended to read:
Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
Source of funds
General fund 228,238,448 233,526,438
Transportation fund 20,250,000 20,250,000
Special funds 119,824,272 118,799,873
Tobacco fund 672,579 672,579
Federal funds 162,959,452 162,959,452
Interdepartmental transfers 16,031,869 14,895,319
Enterprise funds 15,070,107 15,070,107
Total 563,046,727 566,173,768
Sec. F.109 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.300 is amended to read:
Sec. B.300 Human services - agency of human services - secretary’s office
Personal services 16,219,746 18,219,746
Operating expenses 7,220,486 6,062,286
Grants 3,795,202 3,795,202
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 225 of 277
2025
General fund 12,913,202 11,923,905
Special funds 135,517 135,517
Federal funds 13,565,080 11,606,177
Global Commitment fund 0 4,300,000
Interdepartmental transfers 621,635 111,635
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Sec. F.110 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.301 is amended to read:
Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office - global commitment
Grants 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Total 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Source of funds
General fund 668,380,623 716,109,638
Special funds 32,047,905 32,047,905
Tobacco fund 21,049,373 21,049,373
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
Federal funds 1,285,494,243 1,363,223,270
Interdepartmental transfers 4,487,210 4,124,245
Total 2,039,512,911 2,164,607,988
Sec. F.111 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.305 is amended to read:
Sec. B.305 AHS - administrative fund
Personal services 330,000 330,000
Operating expenses 13,170,000 16,870,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 226 of 277
2025
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000 17,200,000
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Sec. F.112 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.306 is amended to read:
Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access - administration
Personal services 134,929,148 136,693,560
Operating expenses 44,171,193 39,250,661
Grants 3,112,301 3,112,301
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Source of funds
General fund 39,872,315 42,023,781
Special funds 4,733,015 4,733,015
Federal funds 128,790,580 124,836,223
Global Commitment fund 4,308,574 4,308,574
Interdepartmental transfers 4,508,158 3,154,929
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Sec. F.113 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.307 is amended to read:
Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
global commitment
Personal services 547,983 547,983
Grants 899,550,794 964,407,046
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 227 of 277
2025
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 900,098,777 964,955,029
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Sec. F.114 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.309 is amended to read:
Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
state only
Grants 63,033,948 67,780,595
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Source of funds
General fund 62,151,546 62,308,757
Global Commitment fund 882,402 5,471,838
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Sec. F.115 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.310 is amended to read:
Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid non-waiver
matched
Grants 34,994,888 38,232,431
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
Source of funds
General fund 12,511,405 13,459,034
Federal funds 22,483,483 24,773,397
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 228 of 277
2025
Sec. F.116 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.311 is amended to read:
Sec. B.311 Health - administration and support
Personal services 8,373,168 8,373,168
Operating expenses 7,519,722 8,166,662
Grants 7,985,727 7,985,727
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Source of funds
General fund 3,189,843 3,513,313
Special funds 2,308,186 2,308,186
Federal funds 11,040,433 11,363,903
Global Commitment fund 7,173,924 7,173,924
Interdepartmental transfers 166,231 166,231
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Sec. F.117 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.312 is amended to read:
Sec. B.312 Health - public health
Personal services 67,812,371 67,812,371
Operating expenses 11,025,497 11,025,497
Grants 46,766,832 46,866,832
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
Source of funds
General fund 12,908,892 13,008,892
Special funds 24,906,804 24,906,804
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 229 of 277
2025
Tobacco fund 1,088,918 1,088,918
Federal funds 64,038,301 64,038,301
Global Commitment fund 17,036,150 17,036,150
Interdepartmental transfers 5,600,635 5,600,635
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
Sec. F.118 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.313 is amended to read:
Sec. B.313 Health - substance use programs
Personal services 6,570,967 6,570,967
Operating expenses 511,500 511,500
Grants 58,215,510 59,240,635
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Source of funds
General fund 6,672,061 7,697,186
Special funds 2,413,678 2,413,678
Tobacco fund 949,917 949,917
Federal funds 15,456,754 15,456,754
Global Commitment fund 39,805,567 39,805,567
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Sec. F.119 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.314 is amended to read:
Sec. B.314 Mental health - mental health
Personal services 50,191,086 50,191,086
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 230 of 277
2025
Operating expenses 5,517,999 5,709,973
Grants 270,625,138 272,536,080
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Source of funds
General fund 25,555,311 26,279,270
Special funds 1,718,092 1,718,092
Federal funds 11,436,913 12,661,803
Global Commitment fund 287,609,767 287,763,834
Interdepartmental transfers 14,140 14,140
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Sec. F.120 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.316 is amended to read:
Sec. B.316 Department for children and families - administration &
support services
Personal services 46,644,080 44,844,080
Operating expenses 17,560,755 19,402,705
Grants 5,627,175 5,627,175
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
Source of funds
General fund 39,722,724 40,113,958
Special funds 2,781,912 2,781,912
Federal funds 24,448,223 24,098,939
Global Commitment fund 2,417,024 2,417,024
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 231 of 277
2025
Interdepartmental transfers 462,127 462,127
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
Sec. F.121 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.317 is amended to read:
Sec. B.317 Department for children and families - family services
Personal services 45,197,694 45,286,553
Operating expenses 5,315,309 5,315,309
Grants 98,251,027 97,732,465
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
Source of funds
General fund 58,838,741 59,984,059
Special funds 729,587 729,587
Federal funds 34,666,196 36,180,206
Global Commitment fund 54,514,506 51,425,475
Interdepartmental transfers 15,000 15,000
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
Sec. F.122 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.318 is amended to read:
Sec. B.318 Department for children and families - child development
Personal services 5,908,038 5,908,038
Operating expenses 813,321 813,321
Grants 223,329,336 211,815,836
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Source of funds
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 232 of 277
2025
General fund 76,723,518 51,443,165
Special funds 96,312,000 109,512,000
Federal funds 43,511,414 42,902,383
Global Commitment fund 13,503,763 14,679,647
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Sec. F.123 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.319 is amended to read:
Sec. B.319 Department for children and families - office of child support
Personal services 13,157,660 13,061,794
Operating expenses 3,759,992 3,759,992
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Source of funds
General fund 5,200,064 5,163,429
Special funds 455,719 455,719
Federal funds 10,874,269 10,815,038
Interdepartmental transfers 387,600 387,600
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Sec. F.124 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.320 is amended to read:
Sec. B.320 Department for children and families - aid to aged, blind and
disabled
Personal services 2,252,206 2,481,741
Grants 10,717,444 10,369,155
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 233 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 7,376,133 7,368,843
Global Commitment fund 5,593,517 5,482,053
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
Sec. F.125 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.321 is amended to read:
Sec. B.321 Department for children and families - general assistance
Personal services 15,000 15,000
Grants 11,054,252 10,702,625
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Source of funds
General fund 10,811,345 10,486,987
Federal funds 11,320 11,070
Global Commitment fund 246,587 219,568
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Sec. F.126 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.322 is amended to read:
Sec. B.322 Department for children and families - 3SquaresVT
Grants 44,377,812 45,677,812
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
Source of funds
Federal funds 44,377,812 45,677,812
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 234 of 277
2025
Sec. F.127 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.323 is amended to read:
Sec. B.323 Department for children and families - reach up
Operating expenses 23,821 23,821
Grants 37,230,488 36,730,493
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
Source of funds
General fund 24,733,042 24,233,047
Special funds 5,970,229 5,970,229
Federal funds 2,806,330 2,806,330
Global Commitment fund 3,744,708 3,744,708
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
Sec. F.128 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.325 is amended to read:
Sec. B.325 Department for children and families - office of economic
opportunity
Personal services 817,029 1,042,639
Operating expenses 100,407 100,407
Grants 35,466,283 35,812,536
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Source of funds
General fund 28,178,010 28,687,068
Special funds 83,135 83,135
Federal funds 4,935,273 4,998,078
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 235 of 277
2025
Global Commitment fund 3,187,301 3,187,301
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Sec. F.129 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.329 is amended to read:
Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - administration &
support
Personal services 45,217,977 46,217,977
Operating expenses 6,472,558 6,714,680
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
Source of funds
General fund 22,916,281 24,037,342
Special funds 1,390,457 1,390,457
Federal funds 26,063,097 26,184,158
Global Commitment fund 35,000 35,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,285,700 1,285,700
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
Sec. F.130 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.330 is amended to read:
Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - advocacy and
independent living grants
Grants 24,571,060 24,781,798
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Source of funds
General fund 8,392,303 8,504,605
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 236 of 277
2025
Federal funds 7,321,114 7,321,114
Global Commitment fund 8,857,643 8,956,079
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Sec. F.131 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.332 is amended to read:
Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - vocational
rehabilitation
Grants 10,179,845 9,179,845
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
Source of funds
General fund 1,371,845 371,845
Federal funds 7,558,000 7,558,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,250,000 1,250,000
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
Sec. F.132 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.333 is amended to read:
Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - developmental
services
Grants 329,299,344 331,262,271
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Source of funds
General fund 132,732 132,732
Special funds 15,463 15,463
Federal funds 403,573 403,573
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 237 of 277
2025
Global Commitment fund 328,697,576 330,660,503
Interdepartmental transfers 50,000 50,000
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Sec. F.133 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - TBI home and
community based waiver
Grants 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
Sec. F.134 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging and independent living - Long Term Care
Grants 293,584,545 347,376,122
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
Source of funds
General fund 498,579 498,579
Federal funds 2,450,000 2,450,000
Global Commitment fund 290,635,966 344,427,543
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 238 of 277
2025
Sec. F.135 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.338 is amended to read:
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 147,472,104 148,472,104
Operating expenses 24,914,205 25,249,795
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Source of funds
General fund 162,807,888 163,643,478
Special funds 935,963 935,963
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
Federal funds 499,888 999,888
Global Commitment fund 2,746,255 2,746,255
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315 396,315
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Sec. F.136 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.342 is amended to read:
Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home - care and support services
Personal services 17,631,222 17,595,290
Operating expenses 5,013,462 13,247,462
Grants 0 1,583,157
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Source of funds
General fund 4,320,687 11,224,018
Special funds 10,051,903 12,450,095
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 239 of 277
2025
Federal funds 8,272,094 8,751,796
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Sec. F.137 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.347 is amended to read:
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,328,118,806 1,364,156,647
Special funds 202,800,452 218,398,644
Tobacco fund 23,088,208 23,088,208
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
Federal funds 1,803,398,922 1,882,012,745
Global Commitment fund 1,980,839,553 2,108,560,133
Internal service funds 490,853 490,853
Interdepartmental transfers 32,893,535 34,367,341
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 5,404,708,886 5,664,153,128
Sec. F.138 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.501 is amended to read:
Sec. B.501 Education - education services
Personal services 28,237,700 28,312,700
Operating expenses 1,134,912 1,134,912
Grants 322,345,763 322,345,763
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 240 of 277
2025
Source of funds
General fund 6,387,955 6,462,955
Special funds 3,033,144 3,033,144
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Federal funds 340,584,414 340,584,414
Interdepartmental transfers 962,474 962,474
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
Sec. F.139 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.503 is amended to read:
Sec. B.503 Education - state-placed students
Grants 20,000,000 19,000,000
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,000,000 19,000,000
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Sec. F.140 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504 Education - adult education and literacy
Grants 4,694,183 4,997,820
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
Source of funds
General fund 3,778,133 4,081,770
Federal funds 916,050 916,050
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 241 of 277
2025
Sec. F.141 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504.1 Education - Flexible Pathways
Grants 11,361,755 11,564,179
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
Source of funds
General fund 921,500 921,500
Education fund 10,440,255 10,642,679
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
Sec. F.142 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.505 is amended to read:
Sec. B.505 Education - adjusted education payment
Grants 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Source of funds
Education fund 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,394 1,882,267,394
Sec. F.143 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.508 is amended to read:
Sec. B.508 Education - nutrition
Grants 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 242 of 277
2025
Sec. F.144 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.516 is amended to read:
Sec. B.516 Total general education
Source of funds
General fund 228,890,519 229,269,156
Special funds 23,651,687 23,651,687
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Education fund 2,323,283,242 2,308,585,666
Federal funds 354,654,849 354,654,849
Global Commitment fund 260,000 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,467,771 1,467,771
Pension trust funds 3,572,780 3,572,780
Total 2,936,531,236 2,922,212,297
Sec. F.145 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.704 is amended to read:
Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation - forestry
Personal services 7,880,566 7,913,766
Operating expenses 1,005,046 1,005,046
Grants 1,712,423 1,713,923
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Source of funds
General fund 6,299,512 6,334,212
Special funds 547,215 547,215
Federal funds 3,394,931 3,394,931
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 243 of 277
2025
Interdepartmental transfers 356,377 356,377
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Sec. F.146 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.710 is amended to read:
Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation - air and waste management
Personal services 27,995,328 27,995,328
Operating expenses 10,788,954 10,816,954
Grants 4,943,000 4,943,000
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Source of funds
General fund 199,372 227,372
Special funds 24,643,580 24,643,580
Federal funds 18,800,064 18,800,064
Interdepartmental transfers 84,266 84,266
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Sec. F.147 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.711 is amended to read:
Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation - office of water programs
Personal services 50,153,806 50,153,806
Operating expenses 8,362,915 8,370,915
Grants 92,365,140 92,365,140
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
Source of funds
General fund 11,887,629 11,895,629
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 244 of 277
2025
Special funds 30,967,150 30,967,150
Federal funds 107,154,542 107,154,542
Interdepartmental transfers 872,540 872,540
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
Sec. F.148 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.714 is amended to read:
Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
Source of funds
General fund 42,792,800 42,863,500
Special funds 81,275,829 81,275,829
Fish and wildlife fund 10,418,331 10,418,331
Federal funds 152,068,301 152,068,301
Interdepartmental transfers 14,131,324 14,131,324
Total 300,686,585 300,757,285
Sec. F.149 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.100 is amended to read:
Sec. D.100 ALLOCATIONS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
(a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
exceed available revenues.
(1) The sum of $575,662 is allocated from the Current Use
Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
the Use Tax Reimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
amounts in excess of $575,662 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 245 of 277
2025
Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $22,106,740
$28,238,050 from the property transfer tax and surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Trust Fund shall be transferred into the General Fund.
(A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
transfer tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the
affordable housing bond pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 314 shall be offset by the
reduction of $1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a. The fiscal year 2025 appropriation of $22,106,740
$28,238,050 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board reflects the
$1,500,000 reduction. The affordable housing bond and related property
transfer tax and surcharge provisions are repealed after the life of the bond on
July 1, 2039. Once the bond is retired, the $1,500,000 reduction in the
appropriation to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall be
restored.
(3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), amounts in excess of
$7,772,373 $9,052,113 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund. The $7,772,373 $9,052,113 shall be allocated as follows:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 246 of 277
2025
(A) $6,404,540 $7,300,358 for disbursement to regional planning
commissions in a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
(B) $931,773 $1,187,721 for disbursement to municipalities in a
manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
(C) $436,060 $564,034 to the Agency of Digital Services for the
Vermont Center for Geographic Information.
Sec. F.150 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.102 is amended to read:
Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
accounts indicated:
* * *
3150892104 MH – Case Management Serv $350,000.00 $350,199.34
* * *
1100892208 AOA – VT Housing Finance Agency $3,000,000.00
1100892403 AOA – Health Equity Community Grants $500,000.00
1120020000 Tuition Assistance Program $133,877.86
1120892401 DHR – New Position in DHR Ops $477,769.00
1120892402 DHR – New Position in VTHR Ops $40,726.07
1140010000 Tax Operation Costs $1,267,062.22
1140060000 Reappraisal and Listing Payments $35,270.75
1140070000 Use Tax Reimbursement Program $37,864.25
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 247 of 277
2025
1140330000 Renter Rebates $2,186,940.33
1140892403 Tax – Child Care Contr Positions $3,591,823.02
1260980000 Debt Service $235,445.15
1266892401 VPIC – Pension System Assets $5,000.00
2100892201 AG – Racial Disparities $48,465.00
2120892203 JUD – County Court House HVAC $800,000.00
2120892402 JUD – Essex County Courthouse Reno $50,000.00
2130400000 SIUS Parent Account $395,749.64
2150010000 Mil Admin/TAGO $142,789.80
2150050000 Mil Vet Affairs Office $100,000.00
2160892201 CCVS – VT Forensic Nursing $246.43
2160892304 CCVS – Kurn Hattin Survivor $250.00
2200010000 Administration Division $167,222.00
3310000000 Commission on Women $25,390.43
3330892401 GMCB – VHCURES Database Implemen $545,782.90
3400892111 Supp New Americans Refugee $23,431.00
3400892301 AHSCO – Refugee Resettlement $1,293.00
3420892405 HD – Regional Emergency Med $8,295.01
3440050000 DCFS – AABD $35,310.73
3440892110 DCF – Grants to Reachup $5.10
3440892203 DCF – Parent Child Ctrs Cap Imp $20,708.22
3440892214 DCF – Child Care Provider Workfor $294.79
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 248 of 277
2025
4100500000 VT Department of Labor $8,000,000.00
5100070000 Education Services $100,000.00
5100892101 AOE – VSC Committee Per Diem $16,295.33
5100892102 AOA – Advisory Group Per Diem $9,018.00
5100892103 AOE – ESESAG Per Diems $8,960.00
5100892201 AOE – Comm Pub Sch Emp Hlth Ben $29,050.00
5100892202 AOE – Task Force Equit Inclusive $6,150.00
5100892302 AOE – Ethnic&Social Equity Per D $14,386.24
6100010000 Administration Management and Planning $402,052.99
6100040000 Property Tax Assessment Approp $11,692.11
6140880005 152/00 State Asst Munic Poll Cont $126.26
7100892301 Everyone Eats $144,565.43
7120892304 DED – Relocated and Remote Worker $127,314.33
8100002100 Department of Motor Vehicles $2,482.81
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the Education Fund from the
accounts indicated:
5100010000 Administration $301,041.03
5100050000 State-Placed Students $13,687,528.41
5100090000 Education Grant $359,570.31
5100110000 Small School Grant $593,700.00
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 249 of 277
2025
5100200000 Education – Technical Education $1,802,347.44
5100210000 Education – Flexible Pathways $1,312,334.72
5100892405 AOE – Universal School Meals $6,201,479.69
Sec. F.151 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.100 is amended to read:
Sec. E.100 POSITIONS
* * *
(d) The conversion of eight limited service positions to exempt permanent
status is authorized in fiscal year 2025 as follows:
(1) Office of the Defender General:
(A) one Administrative Services Tech;
(B) two DG IT Specialist II’s;
(C) one ODG Legal Assistant I;
(D) two Staff Attorney I’s;
(E) one Financial Specialist III; and
(F) one Admin Secretary.
* * *
Sec. F.152 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.301 is amended to read:
Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
* * *
(b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
total estimated sum of $24,301,185 $28,307,335 is anticipated to be certified as
State matching funds under Global Commitment as follows:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 250 of 277
2025
(1) $21,295,850 $25,302,000 certified State match available from local
education agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid
services under Global Commitment. This amount, combined with $29,204,150
$34,698,000 of federal funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, equals a
total estimated expenditure of $50,500,000 $60,000,000. An amount equal to
the amount of the federal matching funds for eligible special education school-
based Medicaid services under Global Commitment shall be transferred from
the Global Commitment Fund to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund
created in 16 V.S.A. § 2959a.
(2) $3,005,335 certified State match available from local designated
mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
services provided under Global Commitment.
(c) Up to $4,487,210 $3,614,245 is transferred from the Agency of Human
Services Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer
Fund consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act.
Sec. F.153 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. G.109 is amended to read:
Sec. G.109 PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCAL YEARS 2025 AND
2026
(a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 251 of 277
2025
Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2024 through June
30, 2026; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
Association for the period of July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2026; and salary
increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
agreements shall be funded as follows:
(1) Fiscal year 2025.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
* * *
(2) Fiscal year 2026.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 252 of 277
2025
* * *
Sec. F.154 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 7 is amended to read:
Sec. 7. TELEPHONE TAX; REPEAL; TRANSITION
(a) 32 V.S.A. § 8521 (telephone personal property tax) is repealed on July
1, 2025 2026. The final monthly installment payment of the telephone
personal property tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8521 levied on the net book value of
the taxpayer’s personal property as of December 31, 2024 2025 shall be due on
or before July 25, 2025 2026.
(b) 32 V.S.A. § 8522 (alternative telephone gross revenues tax) is repealed
on January 1, 2026 2027. The final quarterly payment of the alternative tax
under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due on or before January 25, 2026 2027.
(c) Any taxpayer who paid the alternative tax imposed by 32 V.S.A. § 8522
prior to the repeal of the tax on January 1, 2026 2027 shall become subject to
the income tax imposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151 beginning with the
taxpayer’s first income tax year starting on or after January 1, 2025 2026. No
alternative tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due for any period included in
the taxpayer’s income tax filing for tax years starting on or after January 1,
2025 2026.
(d) In fiscal year 2025 2026, the Division of Property Valuation and
Review of the Department of Taxes and all communications service providers
with taxable communications property in Vermont shall be subject to the
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 253 of 277
2025
inventory and valuation provisions prescribed in 32 V.S.A. § 4452, as
applicable.
Sec. F.155 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
* * *
(3) Secs. 8–12 (communications property tax) shall take effect on July 1,
2025 2026 and shall apply to grand lists lodged on or after April 1, 2025 2026.
Sec. F.156 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 166, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION
Notwithstanding 7 V.S.A. § 845(c), in fiscal year 2025:
(1) $500,000.00 is transferred from the Cannabis Regulation Fund
established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 845 to the Cannabis Business Development
Fund established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987; and
(2) $500,000.00 is appropriated from the Cannabis Business 19
Development Fund to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
Department of Economic Development to fund technical assistance and
provide loans and grants pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987.
Sec. F.157 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 78 is amended to read:
Sec. 78. TRANSFERS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), 32 V.S.A. §
9610(c), or any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts in excess of
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 254 of 277
2025
$32,954,775.00 from the property transfer tax shall be transferred into the
General Fund. Of this amount:
(1) $6,106,335.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund.
(2) $1,279,740.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. F.158 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 96 is amended to read:
Sec. 96. APPROPRIATION; RENT ARREARS ASSISTANCE FUND
The sum of $2,500,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Vermont State Housing Authority Department of Housing and Community
Development in fiscal year 2025 for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund
established by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 45.
Sec. F.159 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 182, Sec. 3, as amended by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 75, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.119, and
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 106, is further amended to read:
Sec. 3. MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) Amounts Of the amounts available from the American Rescue Plan Act
– State Fiscal Recovery funds, $4,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of
Housing and Community Development for the Manufactured Home
Improvement and Repair Program and shall be used for one or more of the
following purposes:
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 255 of 277
2025
* * *
Sec. F.160 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 113b is amended to read:
Sec. 113b. APPROPRIATION; NATURAL RESOURCES LAND USE
REVIEW BOARD
The sum of $1,300,000.00 $400,000.00 is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board in fiscal year 2025.
Sec. F.161 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 183, Sec. 24a is amended to read:
Sec. 24a. COMPENSATION FOR OVERPAYMENT
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$29,224.00 a $29,224.00 credit shall be transferred from the Education Fund to
the Town of applied to the Canaan Town School District’s education spending,
as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the
homestead taxpayers of the Town of Canaan Town School District for an
overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to erroneous
accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating average daily
membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made directly to the
Town of Canaan.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$5,924.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Bloomfield in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Bloomfield for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 256 of 277
2025
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Bloomfield.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,575.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Brunswick in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Brunswick for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Brunswick.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$6,145.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of East
Haven in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town
of East Haven for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of East Haven.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,046.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Granby
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Granby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 257 of 277
2025
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Granby.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$10,034.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Guildhall in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Guildhall for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Guildhall.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$20,536.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Kirby
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Kirby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Kirby.
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,402.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Lemington in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Lemington for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 258 of 277
2025
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Lemington.
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$11,464.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Maidstone in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Maidstone for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Maidstone.
(j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$4,349.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Norton
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Norton for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Norton.
(k) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,657.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Victory
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Victory for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 259 of 277
2025
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Victory.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a $68,132.00 credit
shall be applied to the Northeast Kingdom Choice School District’s education
spending, as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to
compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Northeast Kingdom Choice School
District for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership.
Sec. F.162 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1102, as added by 2023
Acts and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 47, is amended to read:
Sec. B.1102 FISCAL YEAR 2023 ONE-TIME TECHNOLOGY
MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2023, funds are appropriated from the Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951) for new and ongoing initiatives as
follows:
(1) $40,010,000 to the Agency of Digital Services to be used as follows:
(A) $11,800,000 for Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system
upgrade of Human Capital Management and core statewide financial
accounting system and integration with the Department of Labor and Agency
of Transportation financial systems;
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 260 of 277
2025
Sec. F.163 3 V.S.A. § 3306 is amended to read:
§ 3306. TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND
* * *
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(2) any interest earned by the Fund.
* * *
Sec. F.164 WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND TRAINING FUND;
REPEAL
(a) 10 V.S.A. § 543 (Workforce Education and Training Fund) is repealed.
Sec. F.165 18 V.S.A. § 9502 is amended to read:
§ 9502. TOBACCO TRUST FUND
(a)(1) The Tobacco Trust Fund is established in the Office of the State
Treasurer for the purposes of creating a self-sustaining, perpetual fund for
tobacco cessation and prevention that is not dependent upon tobacco sales
volume.
(2) The Trust Fund shall comprise be composed of:
(A) appropriations transfers made by the General Assembly; and
(B) transfers from the Litigation Settlement Fund pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this section; and
(C) contributions from any other source.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 261 of 277
2025
(3) The State Treasurer shall not disburse monies from the Trust Fund,
except upon appropriation by the General Assembly. In any fiscal year, total
appropriations from the Trust Fund shall not exceed seven percent of the fair
market value of the Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year.
(4) The Trust Fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The
State Treasurer may invest monies in the Fund in accordance with the
provisions of 32 V.S.A. § 434. All balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal
year shall be carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The
State Treasurer’s annual financial report to the Governor and the General
Assembly shall contain an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings
of the Fund.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by the General Assembly on or before
June 30, 2000, and on June 30 of each subsequent fiscal year, any
unencumbered balance in the Litigation Settlement Fund shall be transferred to
the Trust Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. F.166 32 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
§ 5. ACCEPTANCE OF GRANTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Loan” means a loan that is interest free or below market value.
(2) “State agency” means an Executive Branch agency, department,
commission, office, or board.
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 262 of 277
2025
Sec. F.167 32 V.S.A. § 706 is amended to read:
§ 706. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS
Notwithstanding any authority granted elsewhere, all transfers of
appropriations shall be made pursuant to this section upon the initiative of the
Governor or upon the request of a secretary or commissioner.
(1) With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Finance
and Management may transfer balances of appropriations not to exceed
$50,000.00 $100,000.00 made under any appropriation act for the support of
the government from one component of an agency, department, or other unit of
State government to any component of the same agency, department, or unit.
(2) Except as specified in subdivisions subdivision (1) and (4) of this
section, the transfer of balances of appropriations may be made only with the
approval of the Emergency Board.
(3) For the specific purpose of balancing and closing out fund accounts
at the end of a fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and Management may
adjust a balance within an account of an agency or department in an amount
not to exceed $100.00 $200.00.
* * *
Sec. F.168 32 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. AUTHORIZATION TO BORROW MONEY
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 263 of 277
2025
(b) The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, and principal of and
expenses of preparing, issuing, and marketing of such notes as the same fall
due without further order or authority from the General Fund or from the
Transportation or other applicable funds or from the proceeds of bonds or
notes governmental debt service funds established in section 951a of this
chapter. The authority hereby granted is in addition to and not in limitation of
any other authority. Such notes shall be sold at public or private sale with or
without published notice, as the State Treasurer may determine to be in the
best interests of the State.
Sec. F.169 32 V.S.A. § 951a is amended to read:
§ 951a. DEBT SERVICE FUNDS
(a) Three governmental debt service funds are hereby established:
* * *
(b) Financial resources in each fund shall consist of appropriations by the
General Assembly to fulfill debt service obligations, the transfer of funding
sources by the General Assembly to fulfill future debt service obligations,
bond proceeds raised to fund a permanent reserve required by a trust
agreement entered into to secure bonds, transfers of appropriations effected
pursuant to section 706 of this title, investment income earned on balances held
in trust agreement accounts as required by a trust agreement, and such other
amounts as directed by the General Assembly or that are specifically
authorized by provisions of this title. Each debt service fund shall account for
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 264 of 277
2025
the accumulation of resources and the fulfillment of debt service obligations
within the current fiscal year and the accumulation of resources for debt
service obligations maturing in future fiscal years.
* * *
Sec. F.170 32 V.S.A. § 954 is amended to read:
§ 954. PROCEEDS
(a) The proceeds arising from the sale of bonds, inclusive of any premiums,
shall be applied to the purposes for which they were authorized, and the
purposes shall may be considered to include the expenses of preparing, issuing,
and marketing the bonds and any notes issued under section 955 of this title,
and underwriters’ fees and amounts for reserves, but no purchasers of the
bonds shall be in any way bound to see to the proper application of the
proceeds. The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of,
investment return on, and maturity value of the bonds and notes as the same
fall due or accrue without further order or authority. The State Treasurer, with
the approval of the Governor, may establish sinking funds, reserve funds, or
other special funds of the State as the State Treasurer may deem for the best
interests of the State. To the extent not otherwise provided, the amount
necessary each year to fulfill the maturing principal and interest of, investment
return and maturity value of, and sinking fund installments on all the bonds
then outstanding shall be included in and made a part of the annual
appropriation bill for the expense of State government, and the principal and
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 265 of 277
2025
interest on, investment return and maturity value of, and sinking fund
installments on the bonds as may come due before appropriations for their
fulfillment have been made shall be fulfilled from the applicable debt service
fund.
(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated cost of bond
issuance or issuances to the entities to which funds are appropriated by a
capital construction act and for which bonding is required as the source of
funds. If estimated receipts are insufficient, the State Treasurer shall allocate
additional costs to the entities. Any remaining receipts shall not be expended,
but carried forward to be available for future capital construction acts. If the
source of funds appropriated by a capital construction act is other than by
issuance of bonds, the State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated
cost of ongoing debt management services to the entities to which those funds
are appropriated, including the costs of preparing, issuing, and marketing such
bonds or notes shall be appropriated annually from the funds from which
transfers are made to fund debt service costs.
* * *
Sec. F.171 VERMONT TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY FUND; REPEAL
(a) 33 V.S.A. chapter 78 (Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund) is
repealed.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 266 of 277
2025
Sec. F.172 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 38 is amended to read:
Sec. 38. RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM
(a) Creation; administration. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall
design and implement a Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program and shall
create and administer a revolving loan fund to provide subsidized loans for
rental housing developments that serve middle-income households.
(b) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
* * *
(7) The Agency shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that:
(A) a subsidized unit remains affordable to a household earning the
applicable percent of area median income for the longer of:
(i) seven years; or
(ii) full repayment of the loan plus three years; and
(B) during the affordability period determined pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7), the annual increase in rent for a
subsidized unit does not exceed three percent or an amount otherwise
authorized by the Agency.
* * *
Sec. F.173 32 V.S.A. § 308b is amended to read:
§ 308b. HUMAN SERVICES CASELOAD RESERVE
(a) There is created within the General Fund a Human Services Caseload
Reserve. Expenditures from the Reserve shall be subject to an appropriation
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 267 of 277
2025
by the General Assembly or approval by the Emergency Board. Expenditures
from the Reserve shall be limited to Agency of Human Services caseload-
related needs primarily in the Departments for Children and Families, of
Health, of Mental Health, of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of
Vermont Health Access, and settlement costs associated with managing the
Global Commitment waiver.
(b) The Secretary of Administration may transfer to the Human Services
Caseload Reserve any General Fund carry-forward carryforward directly
attributable to Agency of Human Services caseload reductions and the
effective management of related federal receipts, with the exclusion of the
Department of Corrections.
(c) The Human Services Caseload Reserve shall contain two sub-accounts
subaccounts:
(1) A sub-account subaccount for incurred but not reported Medicaid
expenses. Each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2020, the Department of
Finance and Management shall adjust the amount reserved for incurred but not
reported Medicaid expenses to equal the amount specified in the
Comprehensive Annual Comprehensive Financial Report for the fiscal year
occurring two years prior for the estimated amount of incurred but not reported
Medicaid expenses associated with the current Medicaid Global Commitment
waiver.
* * *
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 268 of 277
2025
Sec. F.174 CHILD CARE CONTRIBUTION SPECIAL FUND;
UNALLOCATED AND UNRESERVED BALANCE
(a) In fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration shall unreserve and
transfer funds from the Human Services Caseload Reserve to the Child Care
Contribution Special Fund established in 32 V.S.A. § 10554 as necessary to
maintain a balance that appropriately supports the State’s statutory obligations
under the Child Care Financial Assistance Program established in 33 V.S.A.
§§ 3512 and 3513.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any unreserved and
unallocated balance in the Child Care Contribution Special Fund shall remain
in the Fund to support the future establishment of a reserve for the Child Care
Financial Assistance Program.
Sec. F.175 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FACILITY WORK
PROGRAMS; STRATEGIC PLAN
(a) Findings and intent.
(1) The General Assembly finds that a significant budget deficit has
developed within previously existing programs despite a wage structure that
pays incarcerated individuals in Vermont at rates ranging from $0.25 to $1.35
per hour, significantly below the federal minimum wage.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all Department of
Corrections facility work programs operate in a manner that is fiscally
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 269 of 277
2025
sustainable to the extent possible within current statutory limitations and
effective in preparing offenders for meaningful employment upon release.
(b) Strategic plan. On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of
Corrections shall, in consultation with the Department of Labor, submit a
strategic plan with proposed benchmarks for improvement to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Corrections and Institutions and the
Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Institutions, and on Judiciary. The
strategic plan shall include:
(1) A business plan to improve program efficiency and self-
sustainability to ensure all facility work programs, including Vermont
Correctional Industries, vocational training programs, and other paid facility
duties, operate without recurring deficits or to clearly identify funding sources
to address the deficits.
(2) A comprehensive evaluation of the skills provided through facility
work programs to determine if those skills are transferable to employment
opportunities post-incarceration. The evaluation shall include consideration of
expanding technical training and certification opportunities that carry
recognized value in the labor market.
(3) An analysis of facility work programs to determine if each program
serves a sufficient portion of the incarcerated population to justify its
administration. The analysis shall also consider whether participants gain
meaningful and valuable work experiences.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 270 of 277
2025
(4) A review of wages paid to facility work program participants, the
implications of wage structures on program outcomes, and the appropriate use
of funds in relation to program objectives.
(c) In fiscal years 2025 and 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
submit timely reports to the House Committees on Appropriations and on
Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Appropriations, on
Institutions, and on Judiciary, or the Joint Fiscal Committee and the Joint
Legislative Justice Oversight Committee when the General Assembly is not in
session, on the development of facility work program deficits. The
Department shall include in these reports any financial or operational actions
taken to address deficits, increase oversight, and prevent future deficits.
Sec. F.176 MEDICAID PROVIDERS WITH STABILIZATION NEEDS;
GRANT ELIGIBILITY
(a) All Vermont Medicaid participating providers with demonstrated
stabilization needs and a plan to achieve sustainability shall be eligible to apply
for funds appropriated pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
B.1100(o)(4), including substance use residential treatment facilities, federally
qualified health centers, residential mental health providers, and other
providers of health care and human services.
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of Vermont Health
Access shall submit a report to the House Committees on Health Care and on
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 271 of 277
2025
Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on
Appropriations. The report shall include:
(1) A detailed account of grants distributed pursuant to the appropriation
made in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100(o)(4), as added by this
act. This shall include the dollar amount and recipient of each grant.
(2) A description of each grant recipient’s financial status prior to
receipt of the grant, a summary of the impact of the grant for each recipient,
and a summary of a revised long-term sustainability plan for each grant
recipient.
(3) An analysis of grant outcomes and any recommendations for
enhancing the financial stability of Vermont Medicaid providers.
Sec. F.177 ADULT DIPLOMA PROGRAM AND HIGH SCHOOL
COMPLETION PROGRAM TRANSITIONAL STUDENTS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 945 and any other provision of law to the
contrary, a high school may award a high school diploma to any student who
meets the following criteria:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2024, the student was participating in the High
School Completion Program as the program existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
(2) The student has met the requirements of the student’s individual
graduation plan and would have been eligible to receive a diploma pursuant to
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 272 of 277
2025
the High School Completion Program as it existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
Sec. F.178 SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
DISCRETIONARY EXEMPTIONS
(a) For the remainder of federal fiscal year 2025, the Department for
Children and Families shall utilize the State’s allocation of discretionary
exemptions in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to the extent
permitted by federal regulation for the purposes of:
(1) extending benefits to Program participants who would otherwise
experience a disruption of benefits; and
(2) ensuring that Program participants are not accruing any time-limited
benefit work requirement countable months.
Sec. F.179 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Secs. 5 and 6 are amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 4 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2023.
(b) Sec. 5 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2025.
(c) All other sections shall take effect 30 calendar days after passage.
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 273 of 277
2025
Sec. F.180 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 82, Sec. 1, as amended by 2024 Acts
and Resolves No. 108, Sec. 3, is further amended to read:
Sec. 1. REIMBURSEMENT TO MUNICIPALITIES OF STATE
EDUCATION PROPERTY TAXES THAT WERE ABATED DUE
TO FLOODING
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Taxes may approve an application by a
municipality for reimbursement of State education property tax payments owed
under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16 V.S.A. § 426. To be eligible for
reimbursement under this section, prior to November 15, 2024 2025, a
municipality must have abated, in proportion to the abated municipal tax,
under 24 V.S.A. § 1535 the State education property taxes that were assessed
on eligible property, after application of any property tax credit allowed under
32 V.S.A. chapter 154.
(2) As used in this subsection, “eligible property” means property lost
or destroyed due directly or indirectly to severe storms and flooding in an area
that was declared a federal disaster between July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023
December 31, 2024, provided the loss or destruction resulted in one or more of
the following:
(A) a 50 percent or greater loss in value to the primary structure on
the property;
(B) loss of use by the property owner of the primary structure on the
property for 60 days or more;
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 274 of 277
2025
(C) loss of access by the property owner to utilities for the primary
structure on the property for 60 days or more; or
(D) condemnation of the primary structure on the property under
federal, State, or municipal law, as applicable.
(b) If a municipality demonstrates that, due to disruption to tax collections
resulting from flooding in an area that was declared a federal disaster between
July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023 December 31, 2024, the municipality
incurred unanticipated interest expenses on funds borrowed to make State
education property tax payments owed under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16
V.S.A. § 426, the municipality may be reimbursed by an amount equal to its
reasonable interest expenses under this subsection, provided the amount of
reimbursed interest expenses shall not exceed eight percent.
* * *
Sec. F.181 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.106 is amended to read:
Sec. E.106 CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND
APPROPRIATIONS; REVERSION AND ESTABLISHMENT
OF NEW SPENDING AUTHORITY
* * *
(b) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall revert all
unobligated American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery
Fund spending authority prior to December 31, 2024. The total amount of
American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 275 of 277
2025
spending authority reverted in accordance with this subsection shall equal the
amount of new spending authority established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 511 for
the following purposes in the following order:
* * *
(3) $30,000,000 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to
provide support and enhance capacity for the production and preservation of:
affordable mixed-income rental housing and homeownership units, including
improvements to manufactured homes and communities,; permanent homes
and emergency shelter for those experiencing homelessness,; recovery
residences,; and housing available to farm workers, refugees, and individuals
who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home and community based
services.
Sec. F.182 CARRYFORWARD AUTHORITY
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law and subject to the approval
of the Secretary of Administration, General Fund, Transportation Fund,
Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund, Education Fund, Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951), Clean Water Fund (21932), and
Agricultural Water Quality Fund (21933) appropriations remaining
unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Executive Branch shall be carried forward
and shall be designated for expenditure.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, General
Fund appropriations remaining unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Legislative
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 276 of 277
2025
and Judicial Branches shall be carried forward and shall be designated for
expenditure.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. G.100 EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. B.1101, C.100, C.101, C.102, C.103, C.104,
C.105, C.106, C.107, E.127.3, E.306.1, E.312.1, E.313.3, F.100, F.101, F.102,
F.103, F.104, F.105, F.106, F.107, F.108, F.109, F.110, F.111, F.112, F.113,
F.114, F.115, F.116, F.117, F.118, F.119, F.120, F.121, F.122, F.123, F.124,
F.125, F.126, F.127, F.128, F.129, F.130, F.131, F.132, F.133, F.134, F.135,
F.136, F.137, F.138, F.139, F.140, F.141, F.142, F.143, F.144, F.145, F.146,
F.147, F.148, F.149, F.150, F.151, F.152, F.153, F.156, F.157, F.158, F.159,
F.160, F.162, F.163, F.164, F.165, F.166, F.167, F.168, F.169, F.170, F.171,
F.172, F.173, F.174, F.175, F.176, F.177, F.178, F.179, F.181, and F.182 shall
take effect on passage.
(b) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Secs. E.111 and E.111.1 shall take
effect retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years
beginning on and after January 1, 2024.
(c) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. E.111.2 shall take effect
retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years beginning on
and after January 1, 2025.
(d) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. E.111.3 shall take effect
retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years and periods
VT LEG #383907 v.1

No. 27 Page 277 of 277
2025
beginning on and after January 1, 2025 and ending on or before December 31,
2025.
(e) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Secs. F.154 and F.155 shall take
effect retroactively on March 31, 2025.
(f) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. F.161 shall take effect
retroactively on July 1, 2024.
(g) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. F.180 shall take effect
retroactively on November 15, 2024.
(h) All remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 21, 2025
VT LEG #383907 v.1